Third Man: Are you familiar with an agent named Fox Mulder?
Scully: Yes, I am.
Third Man: How so?
Scully: By reputation. He's an Oxford educated psychologist, who wrote a 
monograph on serial killers and the occult, that helped to catch Monty Props in 
1988. Generally thought of as the best analyst in the violent crimes section. 
He had a nickname at the academy... Spooky Mulder.
%
Section Chief Blevins: Are you familiar with the so-called X-Files?
Scully: I believe they have to do with unexplained phenomena.
Section Chief Blevins: More or less. The reason you're here, Agent Scully, is 
we want you to assist Mulder on these X-Files. You'll write field reports on 
your activities along with your observations on the validity of the work.
Scully: Am I to understand that you want me to debunk the X-Files Project, sir?
Section Chief Blevins: Agent Scully, we trust you'll make the proper scientific 
analysis.
%
[Scully knocks at the door to Mulder's office.]
Mulder: Sorry, nobody down here but the FBI's most unwanted.
Scully: Agent Mulder. I'm Dana Scully. I've been assigned to work with you.
Mulder: Oh, isn't it nice to be suddenly so highly regarded. So who did you 
tick off to get stuck with this detail, Scully?
Scully: Actually, I'm looking forward to working with you. I've heard a lot 
about you.
Mulder: Oh, really... I was under the impression that you were sent to spy on 
me.
%
Mulder: Do you believe in the existence of extraterrestrials?
Scully: Logically I would have to say no. Given the distances need to travel 
from the of reaches of space the energy requirements would exceed a 
spacecraft's capabilities ...
Mulder: Conventional wisdom...
%
Section Chief Blevins: Agent Mulder. What are his thoughts?
Scully: Agent Mulder believes we are not alone.
%
Scully: So?
Mulder: So you and I are going to the Spud State to investigate a little 
kidnapping.
Scully: I don't get it, Mulder. Does this have something to do with an X-File? 
I thought you only liked those... uh... paranormal-type cases. Am I missing 
something here?
Mulder: Let's just say this case has a... distinct smell to it. A certain... 
paranormal bouquet.
%
Deep Throat: Leave this case alone, Agent Mulder.
Mulder: What?
Deep Throat: The military will not tolerate an FBI investigation.
Mulder: Who are you?
Deep Throat: I, er, can be of help to you. I've had a certain interest in your 
work.
Mulder: How do you know about my work?
Deep Throat: Well, let's just say that I'm in a position to know quite a lot of 
things, er, things about our government.
Mulder: Who are you? Who do you work for?
Deep Throat: It's unimportant, I came here to give you some valuable advice. 
You are exposing yourself and Agent Scully to unnecessary risk, I advise you to 
drop the case.
Mulder: I can't do that.
Deep Throat: You have much work to do, Agent Mulder, don't jeopardise the 
future of your own efforts.
%
Scully: You believe it all, don't you?
Mulder: Why wouldn't I?
Scully: Mulder, did you see their eyes? If I were that stoned -
Mulder: Oooh... if you were that stoned, what?
Scully: Mulder, you could have shown that kid a picture of a flying hamburger 
and he would have told you that's exactly what he saw.
%
MIB: [tapping on window] Please, step out of the car.
Mulder: [to Scully] You think if maybe we ignore him, he'll go away?
MIB: [tapping on window] Please, step out of the car.
Mulder: [to Scully] Guess not.
%
Deep Throat: Mister Mulder, why are those like yourself, who believe in the 
existence of extraterrestrial life on this Earth, not dissuaded by all the 
evidence to the contrary?
Mulder: Because, all the evidence to the contrary is not entirely dissuasive.
Deep Throat: Precisely.
Mulder: They're here, aren't they?
Deep Throat: Mister Mulder, they've been here for a long, long time.
%
Scully: This looks like an X-File.
Agent Colton: Let's not get carried away. I'm going to solve these murders, but 
what I would like from you is to go over the case histories, maybe come down to 
the crime scene.
Scully: Do you want me to ask Mulder?
Agent Colton: Okay, if he wants to come and do you a favour, great. But make 
sure he knows this is my case. Dana, if I can break a case like this one, I'll 
be getting my bump up the ladder. And you, maybe you won't have to be Mrs. 
Spooky any more.
%
Mulder: Why would I make them so uncomfortable?
Scully: It probably has to do with your reputation.
Mulder: Reputation? I have a reputation?
Scully: Mulder, look, Colton plays by the book and you don't. They feel your 
methods, your theories are...
Mulder: Spooky? Do you think I'm spooky?
%
Agent Colton: So, Mulder, what do you think? Does this look like the work of 
little green men?
Mulder: Grey.
Agent Colton: Excuse me?
Mulder: Grey. You said green men. A Reticulan's skin tone is actually grey. 
They're notorious for their extraction of terrestrial human livers. Due to iron 
depletion in the Reticulan galaxy.
Agent Colton: You can't be serious.
Mulder: Do you have any idea what liver and onions go for on Reticula?
%
Scully: Mulder, they don't want you involved, they don't want to hear your 
theories. That's why Blevins has you hidden away down here.
Mulder: You're down here, too.
%
Scully: Oh my god, Mulder. It smells like... I think it's bile.
Mulder: Is there any way I can get it off my fingers quickly without betraying 
my cool exterior?
%
Mulder: She should be encouraged to tell her story, not to keep it inside, it's 
important that you let her.
Darlene: Important to who? I have my daughter back, I don't want any more 
trouble. Besides she can hardly remember anything.
Mulder: But she will remember one day, one way or another, even if it's only in 
dreams. And when she does, she's gonna wanna talk about it, she's gonna need to 
talk about it.
Darlene: Like I did? Listen to me, all of my life I have been ridiculed, for 
speaking my mind.
Mulder: But it was the truth, Darlene.
Darlene: The truth has caused me nothing but heartache, I don't want the same 
thing for her.
%
Mulder: You know when I was a kid, I had this ritual. I closed my eyes before I 
walked into my room, 'cause I thought that one day when I opened them my sister 
would be there. Just lying in bed, like nothing ever happened. You know I'm 
still walking into that room, everyday of my life.
%
Mulder: Hey, that's a nice tattoo, what is that?
Bartender: What's it look like?
Mulder: Flying saucer. You don't really believe in that stuff, do ya?
Bartender: I take it you don't.
Mulder: No, I think it's all just a bunch of crazy people howling at the moon.
%
Scully: At least if we had a legitimate source...
Mulder: This is the essence of science. You ask an impertinent question and 
you're on your way to a pertinent answer.
%
Mulder: I know I should be afraid, but I'm not.
Dr. Werber: Do you know why?
Mulder: Because of the voice... The voice in my head.
Dr. Werber: What's it telling you?
Mulder: Not to be afraid. It's telling me that no harm will come to her and 
that one day she'll return.
Dr. Werber: Do you believe the voice?
Mulder: I want to believe.
%
Scully: Mulder, it's the same story I've heard since I was a kid. It's a folk 
tale, a myth.
Mulder: I heard the same story when I was a kid too. Funny thing is I believed 
it. Fact is we've got a cannibalized body in New Jersey. Someone or something 
out there is hungry.
%
Ellen: And, of course, it helps if you can find a man.
Scully: Know of any?
Ellen: Yeah, they're disappearing faster than the Brazilian rain forest. What 
about that guy you work with?
Scully: Mulder?
Ellen: I thought you said he was cute.
Scully: He's a jerk. He's not a jerk. He's, um... he's obsessed with his work.
%
Scully: He was perfectly in his rights. The FBI has no overriding jurisdiction 
in a murder case. Anyway, you'd feel the same way if someone was horning in on 
your work.
Mulder: Yeah, chances are he's without a clue. He'll probably be scratching his 
head when they bring the next body in.
Scully: You missed your opening Mulder, you could've really humiliated him and 
er, told him who the perpetrator was, The Jersey Devil.
Mulder: Hey whatta you say, we grab a hotel, take in a floor show, drop a few 
quarters in the slots, do a little digging on this case.
Scully: You're kidding, right?
Mulder: OK, we can skip the floor show.
%
Mulder: What if it is a female, Scully? How close is she to you or me? Does she 
feel emotion? Or are her days just spent looking for food?
Scully: Maybe, she spends her day shopping.
Mulder: Eight million years out of Africa, I don't think we're all that 
different.
Scully: Mulder, we've put men into space, we've built computers that work 
faster than the human mind.
Mulder: While we over-populate the world and create new technologies to kill 
each other with. Maybe we're just beasts with big brains.
%
Mulder: Who was that on the phone?
Scully: A guy.
Mulder: A guy. Same guy as the guy you had dinner with the other night?
Scully: Same guy.
Mulder: You going to have dinner with him again?
Scully: I don't think so.
Mulder: No interest?
Scully: Not at this time.
Mulder: [walking to the door] What are you doing?
Scully: Going with you to the Smithsonian.
Mulder: Don't you have a life, Scully?
Scully: Keep it up, Mulder, and I'll hurt you like that beast woman.
Mulder: Eight million years out of Africa...
Scully: [holding door open for him] And look who's holding the door.
%
Scully: I think Howard Graves faked his own death.
Mulder: Do you know how hard it is to fake your own death? Only one man has 
pulled it off: Elvis.
%
Mulder: I would never lie. I willfully participated in a campaign of 
misinformation.
%
Scully: Are you saying Lauren Kyte crashed our car?
Mulder: Either that or a poltergeist.
Scully: They're heeeere...
%
Scully: How can the oesophagus be crushed without the neck even being touched?
Mulder: Psychokinetic manipulation.
Scully: Psychokinesis? You mean how Carrie got even at the prom?
%
Mulder: Hey, Scully. Do you believe in the afterlife?
Scully: I'd settle for a life in this one.
Mulder: Have you ever seen the Liberty Bell?
Scully: Yes.
Mulder: You know, I've been to Philadelphia a hundred times and I've never seen 
it.
Scully: You're not missing much. It's just a big bell with a big crack, and you 
have to wait in a long line.
Mulder: Yeah, but I'd really like to go.
Scully: Why now?
Mulder: I don't know. How late do you think they stay open?
%
Scully: How come you two went your separate ways?
Mulder: I’m a pain in the ass to work with.
Scully: Seriously.
Mulder: I’m not a pain in the ass?
%
Scully: Brad Wilczek? We're with the FBI.
Brad Wilczek: What took you guys so long? Oh, and do you mind taking off your 
shoes.
%
Scully: So the machine killed Drake out of self-defense?
Mulder: Self-preservation. It's the primary instinct of all sentient beings.
Scully: Mulder, that level of artificial intelligence is decades away from 
being realized.
Mulder: Then why was our government trying to usurp Wilczek's research?
%
Mulder: You're afraid of the government but you're willing to accept the risk 
that your machine will kill again.
Wilczek: The lesser of two evils.
Mulder: What about a third option? You created that machine. Now you tell me 
how to destroy it.
%
Deep Throat: You won't find him.
Mulder: They can't just take a man like Brad Wilczek without an explanation.
Deep Throat: They can do anything they want.
Mulder: Where is he?
Deep Throat: In the middle of what we in the trade call "hard bargaining".
Mulder: Wilczek won't deal. He'll never work for them.
Deep Throat: Loss of freedom does funny things to a man.
%
Bear: You folks the ones going up to Icy Cape?
Mulder: Yeah.
Bear: Then I'm the one flying you. My name's Bear. The plane's across the way, 
provisions are loaded. Grab your gear.
Hodge: Oh, could we see some credentials?
Bear: Credentials. The only credentials that I have is that I'm the only pilot 
willing to fly you up there. You don't like those credentials... walk.
%
Mulder: [taking his shirt off for a physical exam] Before anyone passes 
judgment, may I remind you - we are in the Arctic.
%
Hodge: Alright, parasitic diagnostic procedure requires that each of us provide 
a blood and a stool sample.
Bear: A stool sample?
Murphy: Well, this kind of travel always makes that kind of tough... for me.
Mulder: Okay, anyone got the morning sports section handy?
Bear: I ain't dropping my cargo for no one.
%
Mulder: We're all wired and hypersensitive, it'll be good to get a fresh start 
in the morning.
Scully: Mulder, I don't want to waste a second trying to find a way to kill 
this thing.
Mulder: I don't know if we should kill it. This area of the ice sheet was 
formed over a meteor crater. The worm lived in ammonia. It survived sub-zero 
temperatures. Theorists in alternative life-designs believe in 
ammonia-supported life systems on planets with freezing temperatures.
Scully: No.
Mulder: The meteor that crashed here a quarter of a million years ago may have 
carried that type of life to earth.
%
Mulder: It's still there, Scully, two hundred thousand years down in the ice.
Scully: Leave it there.
%
Scully: Why would somebody want to sabotage the Space Shuttle?
Mulder: Well, if you were a terrorist, there probably isn't a more potent 
symbol of American progress and prosperity. And if you're an opponent of big 
science, NASA itself represents a vast money trench that exists outside the 
crucible and debate of the democratic process. And of course there are those 
futurists who believe the Space Shuttle is a rusty old bucket that should be 
mothballed. A dinosaur spacecraft built in the 70's by scientists setting their 
sights on space in an ever declining scale.
Scully: And we thought we could rest easy with the fall of the Soviet Union.
Mulder: Not to mention certain fringe elements who accuse our government itself 
of space sabotage. The failure of the Hubble Telescope and the Mars Observer 
are directly connected to a conspiracy to deny us evidence.
Scully: Evidence of what?
Mulder: Alien civilization.
Scully: Oh. Of course.
%
Mulder: Hey, Scully, we send those men up into space to unlock the doors of the 
universe, and we don't even know what's behind them.
%
Mulder: You never wanted to be an astronaut when you were a kid, Scully?
Scully: Guess I missed that phase.
%
Mulder: [after seeing a shuttle launch from the control room] I have to admit, 
that fulfilled one of my boyhood fantasies.
Scully: Yeah, it ranks right up there with getting a pony and learning how to 
braid my own hair.
%
Scully: Mulder, the hearing is tomorrow at 10 o'clock.
Mulder: So that gives us 24 hours to investigate.
Scully: My assignment is to bring you back, not help you dig yourself in deeper.
Mulder: "The Last Detail" starring Dana Scully.
%
Mulder: You really believe that story?
Scully: That story happens to be highly classified.
Mulder: It's a highly classified lie.
%
Mulder: Then what can I say? How can I disprove lies that are stamped with an 
official seal?
Section Chief McGrath: That will be all, Mr Mulder.
Mulder: You can deny all the things I've seen, all the things I've discovered, 
but not for much longer because too many others know what's happening out 
there. And no one, no government agency, has jurisdiction over the truth.
%
Deep Throat: Mulder, the continental United States is surrounded by an 
electronic fence that reaches 15,000 miles into space. We use it to track and 
monitor the 7,087 man-made objects that orbit the earth. Last night at 23:17 
that fence was breached.
%
Section Chief McGrath: Why did you countermand my decision? Mulder's conduct 
was in clear violation not only of bureau procedures but of federal law.
Deep Throat: Yes.
Section Chief McGrath: I don't understand. The committee's case was air tight. 
You've ruined the last best chance we had to get rid of him.
Deep Throat: I appreciate your frustration, but you and I both know Mulder's 
work is a singular passion-- poses a most unique dilemma. But his occasional 
insubordination is in the end, far less dangerous.
Section Chief McGrath: With respect sir, less dangerous than what?
Deep Throat: Than having him exposed to the wrong people. What he knows... what 
he thinks he knows... Always keep your friends close, Mr. McGrath... but keep 
your enemies closer.
%
Deep Throat: Actually I was just in the neighborhood... Wondered if I ever told 
you about the Lichfield Experiments.
Mulder: No you haven't.
Deep Throat: Well, it was the most interesting project. Highest level of 
classification. All records have since been destroyed. And those who knew of 
it, denied knowledge of its existence. It existed during the height of the cold 
war. We got wind the Russians were fooling around with Eugenics. Rather 
primitively, I might add. Trying to crossbreed top scientists, athletes... to 
come up with the superior soldier. Naturally, we jumped on the band wagon.
%
Mulder: One girl was just abducted.
Scully: Kidnapped.
Mulder: Potato, potahto.
Scully: She was kidnapped from the social services home around 11:00pm last 
night. Looks like someone was afraid she might remember too much.
Mulder: Someone or something, Scully?
Scully: Connecticut state troopers set up roadblocks within half an hour. 
Nothing.
Mulder: Maybe they weren't looking in the right direction. (points up at the 
sky)
%
Eve 6: You and you. You have 46 chromosomes. The Adams and the Eves... we have 
56. We have extra chromosomes. Number 4, 5, 12, 16, and 22. This replication of 
chromosomes also produces additional genes. Heightened strength. Heightened 
intelligence.
Mulder: Heightened psychosis.
Eve 6: Save the best for last.
%
Eve 6: Cut off the chains... then we'll talk.
Mulder: They're probably there for a good reason.
Eve 6: No. Bad reason. I paid too much attention to a guard. Bit into his 
eyeball. I meant it as a sign of affection.
%
Eve 10: Hello, Eve 8.
Eve 9: We've been waiting ...
Eve 8: How did you know I'd come for you?
Eve 10: We just knew.
Eve 9: We just knew.
%
Mulder: There's something else I haven't told you about myself, Scully. I hate 
fire. Hate it. Scared to death of it.
Scully: Mulder? Are you sure you don't want me to help you out on this one?
Mulder: Sooner or later, a man's got to face his demons.
%
Mulder: But there have been cases of pyrokinetics, people who can control and 
conduct fire.
Beatty: Well, I've seen fire bend around corners, seen it bounce like a rubber 
ball. Fire's got a certain genius, you know? A certain demon poetry. It's like 
it's got a mind of it's own. But I've never seen one that can defy the laws of 
physics, not when you figure it out.
%
Beatty: There have been some arson fires in Seattle lately and, uh, 
Pennsylvania that burn so hot that the firemen can't put them out. 7,000 
degrees. I mean, hosing that down just makes it worse.
Mulder: How's that?
Beatty: Uh, the, uh, reaction is so intense that it splits the water into 
hydrogen and oxygen. Just adds fuel to the fire.
%
Mulder: Ten years it's taken me to forget about this woman and she shows up in 
my life with a case like this.
Scully: So she shows up knowing the power she has over you and then she makes 
you walk through fire, is that it?
Mulder: Phoebe is fire.
%
Mulder: Well, that's one of the luxuries of hunting down aliens and genetic 
mutants. You rarely get to press charges.
%
Mulder: Why did you lie in your police report?
Scully: I thought it would be a better explanation under the circumstances.
Mulder: What you're really saying is that you didn't want to go on record 
admitting that you believed in Boggs! The bureau would expect something like 
that from "Spooky" Mulder, but not Dana Scully.
Scully: I thought that you'd be pleased that I opened myself to extreme 
possibilities.
Mulder: Dana... open yourself up to extreme possibilities only when they're the 
truth.
%
Mulder: Dana, after all you've seen, after all the evidence, why can't you 
believe?
Scully: I'm afraid. I'm afraid to believe.
%
Scully: Last time you were that engrossed, it turned out you were reading the 
Adult Video News.
%
Scully: You set us up. You’re in on this with Lucas Henry. This was a trap 
for Mulder because he helped put you away. Well, I came here to tell you that 
if he dies because of what you’ve done, four days from now, no one will be 
able to stop me from being the one that will throw the switch and gas you out 
of this life for good, you son of a bitch!
Boggs: Dana... [in Mulder's voice] You're the one who believed me.
Scully: No! No, I do not believe you!
Boggs: If you don't believe me, maybe you'll believe yourself.
%
Scully: Did Boggs confess?
Mulder: No, no, it was five hours of Boggs "channeling." After three hours I 
asked him to summon up the soul of Jimi Hendrix and requested 'All Along the 
Watchtower'. You know, the guy's been dead for 20 years but he hasn't lost his 
touch.
%
Scully: There's something up there, Mulder.
Mulder: Ooh, I've been saying that for years.
%
Scully: I don't understand, how can they just disappear? They have no means of 
transportation.
Mulder: No earthly means of transportation.
%
Scully: The 65-year-old female teller was pistol-whipped. Died from a massive 
subdural hemorrhage all because she didn’t put the money in the bag fast 
enough.
Mulder: Lovely couple.
%
Mulder: Can you at least accept the possibility that during his near-death 
experience some kind of psychic transference occurred?
Scully: Can't you accept the possibility that this isn't an X-File?
%
Mulder: Do you believe he's predisposed to this type of psychotic episode?
Scully: I believe it's a long way from saying Jack had a near death experience 
to saying his body's been inhabited by Warren Dupre. A long way.
%
Mulder: Two men died in that crash room, Scully. One man came back. The 
question is... which one?
%
Bruskin: Okay, everyone, Mulder says he's got something.
Daniels: What? An alien virus or new information on the Kennedy assassination?
Bruskin: Hey, Mulder's all right. If you'd pay attention, you might learn 
something from the man.
%
Scully: Mulder, I know what you did wasn't by the book.
Mulder: Tells you a lot about the book, doesn't it?
%
Mulder: Steve Wallenberg had a wife and two kids. One of his boys is an 
all-star on his football team now. I pulled that trigger two seconds earlier 
and Wallenberg would be here to see his kid play. Instead, I've got some dead 
man robbing jewelry stores and sending me haikus.
%
Scully: What are you going to do?
Mulder: I know what I'm not going to do. I'm not going to hang around and wait 
for Barnett to send me another valentine.
%
Mulder: Thanks, Henderson, I owe you one.
Henderson: Promises, promises.
%
Deep Throat: I know why you've contacted me. Listen and I'll explain. I am not 
particularly proud of the way in which this matter was handled, but, like it or 
not, John Barnett is a fact of life.
Mulder: I wish Agent Perdue were around to appreciate the irony.
%
Deep Throat: The world's reaction to such knowledge would be far too dangerous.
Mulder: Dangerous. You mean in a sense of outrage, like the reaction to the 
Kennedy assassinations or M.I.A.s or radiation experiments on terminal 
patients, Watergate, Iran-Contra, Roswell, the Tuskegee experiments, where will 
it end? Oh, I guess it won't end as long as…men like you decide what is truth.
%
Byers: That's why we like you, Mulder. Your ideas are weirder than ours.
%
Deep Throat: You're awfully quiet, Mr. Mulder.
Mulder: I'm wondering which lie to believe.
%
Scully: From the trucker’s description, the shape he fired on could 
conceivably have been a mountain lion.
Mulder: Conceivably.
Scully: The National Weather Service last night reported atmospheric conditions 
in this area that were possibly conducive to lightning.
Mulder: Possibly.
Scully: It is feasible that the truck was struck by lightning, creating the 
electrical failure.
Mulder: It’s feasible.
Scully: And you know, there’s a marsh over there. The lights the driver saw 
may have been swamp gas.
Mulder: Swamp gas?
Scully: It’s a natural phenonemon in which phospine and methane rising from 
decaying organic matter ignite, creating globes of blue flame.
Mulder: Happens to me when I eat Dodger Dogs.
%
Scully: Those were the most paranoid people I have ever met. I don’t know how 
you could think that what they say is even remotely plausible.
Mulder: I think it’s remotely plausible that someone might think you’re hot.
%
Mulder: I think I saw some of these same people at Woodstock.
Scully: Mulder, you weren't at Woodstock.
Mulder: I saw the movie!
%
Scully: Maybe we should head backstage and see what the Reverend has to say.
Mulder: No, wait. This is the part where they bring out Elvis.
%
Sheriff Daniels: Ninety-nine percent of the people in this world are fools ... 
and the rest of us are in great danger of contagion.
%
Scully: I was raised a Catholic. I have a certain... familiarity with the 
scripture. And God never lets the Devil steal the show.
Mulder: You must've really liked The Exorcist.
Scully: One of my favorite movies.
%
Scully: You've got that look on your face, Mulder.
Mulder: What look is that?
Scully: The kind when you've forgotten your keys and you're trying to figure 
out how to get back in the house.
%
Ish: I could smell you a mile away.
Mulder: Well, they told me that even though my deodorant is made for a woman, 
it's strong enough for a man.
%
Ish: I sense you are different, FBI. You're more open to Native American belief 
than some Native Americans. You even have an Indian name - Fox. You should be 
Running Fox, or Sneaky Fox.
Mulder: Just as long as it's not Spooky Fox.
%
Scully: What do you think?
Mulder: I think I'm going to suggest we sleep with the lights on.
%
Scully: What kind of an insect could have gotten a man all the way up into that 
tree?
Mulder: Itsy-bitsy spider.
%
Mulder: 30 loggers working a clear-cutting contract in Washington state. 
Rugged, manly men in the full bloom of their manhood.
Scully: Right, but what am I looking for?
Mulder: Anything strange, unexplainable, unlikely ... boyfriend?
%
[trying to distract Eugene Tooms]
Mulder: I'm looking for my dog. His name is Heinrich. He's a Norwegian 
Elkhound. I use him to hunt moose!
%
Mulder: You think they would have taken me more seriously if I wore the grey 
suit?
%
Scully: But sir, the very nature of the X-Files cases often precludes orthodox 
investigation.
Skinner: Are you suggesting that the bureau adopt separate standards for you 
and Agent Mulder?
Scully: No, sir.
Skinner: Are you suggesting that Agent Mulder obstructs you from proper 
procedure?
Scully: No, sir. If anything, I'm suggesting that these cases be reviewed 
with... an open mind.
%
Mulder: If there's an ice tea in that bag, could be love.
Scully: Must be fate, Mulder. Root beer.
%
Mulder: They're out to put an end to the X-Files, Scully. I don't know why, but 
any excuse will do. Now, I don't really care about my record, but you'd be in 
trouble just for sitting in this car and I'd hate to see you to carry an 
official reprimand in your file because of me.
Scully: Fox....
Mulder: I... I... even made my parents call me "Mulder".
Scully: Mulder, I wouldn't put myself on the line for anybody but you.
%
Scully: Do me a favor, Mulder. Let me say it. Reincarnation.
Mulder: Metempsychosis, transmigration, reimbodiment, call it what you will.
Scully: All based on the coincidence that Michelle Bishop and Officer Morris 
both practice the obscure art of paper folding?
Mulder: Well, what about the composite drawing and the dolls and the fact that 
Michelle was witness to two deaths that can be tied to Charlie Morris?
Scully: So what, you think he's back like Peter Proud to avenge his murder?
Mulder: It's not so far-fetched, Scully. Reincarnation is a basic tenet of many 
major religions.
Scully: That still doesn't explain how an eight-year-old girl can kill two 
grown men.
Mulder: Well, individuals with strong past-life memories often exhibit enhanced 
psychic abilities - ESP, telekinesis.
Scully: So where does that leave us?
Mulder: One short step away from proving the pre-existence of the human soul.
%
Mulder: Why is it still so hard for you to believe, even when all the evidence 
suggests extraordinary phenomena?
Scully: Because sometimes ...
Mulder: What?
Scully: ... looking for extreme possibilities makes you blind to the probable 
explanation right in front of you.
%
Scully: Looks like a match.
Det. Lazard: Yeah. Name's Charlie Morris. Officer Charlie Morris. Used to work 
narcotics out at the two-seven.
Scully: Do you know him?
Det. Lazard: No. Before my time.
Scully: Where is he now? Has he been transferred?
Det. Lazard: You could say that. Agent Scully, this guy's been dead for nine 
years. Which means that little girl saw... a ghost.
%
Mulder: ... and check for burns or lesions on Barbala's body.
Scully: Why?
Mulder: Psychokinesis is usually associated with an electrical charge.
Scully: Are you saying Michelle possesses the ability to psychically project 
her own will?
Mulder: How else could a 60-pound kid throw a 200-pound detective out the 
window?
%
Det. Lazard: I was right outside. I'm telling you, there was nobody else there 
except for Barbala and the kid.
Mulder: So you didn't get a description of who the kid saw?
Det. Lazard: I'm telling you, there was no one else. Listen. The department is 
treating this as a suicide, but I gotta tell you. I knew this guy. There's no 
way he did himself.
Scully: Was he depressed or under psychiatric care of any kind?
Det. Lazard: No. Only time he ever looked at himself was in the mirror. And he 
always liked what he saw.
Mulder: Plus jumpers tend to open the window before they jump.
%
Mrs. Stodie: How could this happen? Roland never exhibited any violent 
tendencies.
Mulder: It's my belief that he wasn't acting under his own volition.
Mrs. Stodie: What do you mean?
Mulder: This is the work of Arthur Grable, Roland's brother. It's a new theory 
of jet propulsion, unfinished at the time of his death. In the last two weeks, 
Roland has completed the calculations.
Mrs. Stodie: How?
Scully: We're not sure, Mrs. Stodie. All we know is that Roland was somehow 
able to finish his brother's research.
%
Scully: Arthur and Roland Grable, born at Puget Presbyterian to Mr. and Mrs. 
Louis Grable on July 15, 1952. Arthur was four minutes older than Roland.
Mulder: Identical twins.
Scully: Which means that they're the result of a single egg fertilized by a 
single sperm.
Mulder: I've read studies which suggest that in some cases the identical twin 
arises very early in the embryonic stage when a mutation in one cell is 
rejected by the other cells as foreign.
Scully: So that maybe Roland's condition is the result of a damaged chromosome 
rejected by one of Arthur's cells?
Mulder: In a way, that would explain Arthur's genius and Roland's strange 
mathematical gift.
%
Mulder: You got a brother, don't you, Scully?
Scully: Yeah, I've got an older one and a younger one.
Mulder: Well, have you ever thought about calling one of them all day long and 
then all of a sudden the phone rings and it's one of them calling you?
Scully: Does this pitch somehow end with a way for me to lower my long distance 
charges?
Mulder: I believe in psychic connections, and evidence suggests that it's 
stronger between family members, strongest of all between twin siblings that 
shared the same womb.
Scully: OK, maybe. But in this case, one sibling has closer ties to a frozen 
fudgesicle than he does to his own brother.
Mulder: Arthur Grable is not dead. He's in a state of consciousness that no 
human has ever returned from. And what if that state allows one to develop 
psychic ability to a potential that the conscious mind is too preoccupied to 
explore or believe in? He could use that ability to control his brother to kill 
those scientists.
%
Barrington: This is Arthur Grable. Uh, because of the massive internal damage 
to his body caused by the car accident, we could only preserve the head.
Scully: Wouldn't your client find it somewhat inconvenient to be thawed out in 
the future, only to discover he had no functional mobility?
Barrington: We believe that by the time science figures a way to revive our 
clients...
Mulder: ... you'll also know how to clone new bodies for them.
Barrington: Exactly. This technology is progressing faster than anyone thought 
possible. Ask anyone here at the university. So, while for us the passing of 
each second brings our bodies closer to death, for our clients it brings them 
closer to life.
%
Scully: You don't really think that Roland ...
Mulder: Besides Nollette and Keats, he's the only person we can prove was in 
the lab that night.
Scully: Yes, but we're talking about a sophisticated fluid dynamics equation. 
Roland Fuller barely has an IQ of 70.
Mulder: Well, you saw his facility with mathematics. Don't some autistic 
individuals display unusual abilities?
Scully: Yes, but even savants behave only as human calculators. I mean, they 
can perform certain functions but they can't tell you the value of anything or 
even the meaning of a number.
%
Mulder: I don't believe you.
Deep Throat: There are limits to my knowledge, Mr. Mulder.
%
Scully: Who is this "Deep Throat" character? I mean, we don't know anything 
about him. What his name is, what he does...
Mulder: He's in a delicate position. He has access to information and 
indiscretion could expose him.
Scully: You don't know that this isn't just a game with him. He's toying with 
you. Rationing out the facts.
Mulder: You think he does it because he gets off on it?
Scully: No. I think he does it because you do.
%
Scully: Okay, Mulder. But I'm warning you, if this is monkey pee, you're on 
your own.
%
Deep Throat: [last words] Trust no one.
%
Scully: Mulder, there are thousands of scientists working on the Human Genome 
project.
Mulder: Yeah, but only one who decided to go bungee jumping with medical gauze 
wrapped around his neck.
%
Mulder: We wanted to believe... we wanted to call out. On August 20th and 
September 5th 1977, two spacecraft were launched from the Kennedy Space Flight 
Center, Florida. They were called Voyager. Each one carries a message. A 
gold-plated record depicting images, music and sounds of our planet, arranged 
so that it may be understood if ever intercepted by a technologically mature 
extraterrestrial civilization. Thirteen years after its launch, Voyager I 
passed the orbital plane of Neptune and essentially left the solar system. 
Within that time there were no further messages sent, nor are any planned. We 
wanted to listen. On October 12th 1992 NASA initiated the high resolution 
microwave survey. A decade long search by radio telescope scanning ten million 
frequencies for any transmission by extraterrestrial intelligence. Less than 
one year later first term Senator Richard Brian successfully championed an 
amendment which terminated the project. I wanted to believe, but the tools had 
been taken away. The X-Files had been shut down. They closed our eyes... our 
voices have been silenced.... our ears now deaf to the realms of extreme 
possibilities.
%
Mulder: Deep Throat said "trust no one." And that's hard, Scully. Suspecting 
everyone, everything, it wears you down. You even begin to doubt what you know 
is the truth. Before, I could only trust myself. Now, I can only trust 
you...and they've taken you away from me.
%
Mulder: It should be right here. The entire tape is blank.
Scully: You know, an electrical surge in the outlet during the storm may have 
degaussed everything, erasing the entire tape. You still have nothing.
Mulder: I may not have the X-Files, Scully, but I still have my work. And I've 
still got you. And I still have myself.
%
Matheson: I take it you're familiar with the high-resolution microwave survey?
Mulder: The search for extraterrestrial radio signals. They shut it down.
Matheson: You have to get to the radio telescope at Arecibo, Puerto Rico. I'll 
try to delay them as long as I can but my guess is you'll have at least 
twenty-four hours. After that, I can no longer hold off the Blue Beret U.F.O. 
Retrieval Team. And they have been authorized to display terminal force.
Mulder: What am I looking for?
Matheson: Contact.
%
Mulder: Have you ever been to San Diego?
Scully: Yeah.
Mulder: Did you check out the Palomar observatory?
Scully: No.
Mulder: From 1948 until recently, it was the largest telescope in the world. 
The idea and design came from a brilliant and wealthy astronomer named George 
Ellery Hale. Actually, the idea was presented to Hale one night. while he was 
playing billiards, an elf climbed in his window and told him to get money from 
the Rockefeller Foundation for a telescope.
Scully: And you're worried that all your life, you've been seeing elves?
Mulder: In my case... little green men.
Scully: But, Mulder... during your time with the X-Files, you've seen so much.
Mulder: That's just the point. Seeing is not enough, I should have something to 
hold onto. Some solid evidence. I learned that from you.
%
CSM: Your time is over and you leave with nothing.
Skinner:Get out.
%
CSM looks over at Skinner*
Skinner: I said get the hell out.
%
Scully: Flatworms are what are known as obligate endoparasites. They live 
inside of the host entering the body through ingestion of larvae or eggs. They 
are not creatures that go around attacking people.
Mulder: That's good. I didn't wanna tell Skinner his murder suspect was a giant 
bloodsucking worm.
%
Scully: Mulder, this is amazing! [looking at the flukeman] Its vestigial 
features seem parasitic, but it has primate physiology. Where the hell did it 
come from?
Mulder: I don't know. But it looks like I'm gonna have to tell Skinner that his 
suspect is a giant bloodsucking worm after all.
%
Scully: Somebody shoved this under my door. I guess you really do have a friend 
in the FBI. And, Mulder, when you see Skinner to hand in field report, I hope 
that you know that I'd consider it more than a professional loss if you decided 
to leave.
%
Scully: Is this seat taken?
Mulder: No, but I should warn you I'm experiencing violent impulses.
Scully: Well, I'm armed. So I'll take my chances. I hear you really endeared 
yourself to Assistant Director Skinner today.
Mulder: You know, sometimes, it just gets really hard to smile through it when 
they ask you to bend down and grab your ankles. You know?
Scully: It's not exactly as if you've ever tried to fit into the program.
%
Mulder: Scientist say three species become extinct everyday. Who knows how many 
new ones are being created?
%
Mulder: Have you ever come across this chemical compound?
Langly: L.S.D.M. Obviously, you haven't read our August edition of "T.L.G."
Mulder: Oh, sorry boys. It arrived the same day as my subscription to 
"Celebrity Skin."
%
Frohike: So, Mulder, where's your little partner?
Mulder: She wouldn't come. She's afraid of her love for you.
Frohike: She's tasty.
Mulder: You know, Frohike, it's men like you that give perversion a bad name.
%
Mulder: They've done it before. D.D.T. in the 50's, Agent Orange, germ warfare 
on unsuspecting neighborhoods.
Scully: Yes, but why, Mulder? Why would they intentionally create a populace 
that destroys itself?
Mulder: Fear. It's the oldest tool of power. If you're distracted by fear of 
those around you, it keeps you from seeing the actions of those above.
%
Byers: In our April edition of "The Lone Gunman," we ran an article on the 
C.I.A.'s new CCDTH-twenty-one thirty-eight fiber-optic-lens micro-video camera.
Langly: Small enough to be placed on the back of a fly.
Mulder: Imagine being one of those flies on the wall of the Oval Office.
Frohike: Been there, done that.
%
Spencer: Things like this aren't supposed to happen here.
Mulder: A forty-two year old real estate agent murders four strangers with his 
bare hands? That's not supposed to happen anywhere.
%
Krycek: Reassigning them to other areas seems to have only strengthened their 
determination. Scully's a problem. A much larger problem than you described.
The Cigarette Smoking Man: Every problem has a solution.
%
Mulder: All right, what do you want to know?
Krycek: What's the truth? There are things you're not telling me that I need to 
know.
Mulder: It's just that my ideas usually aren't very popular.
Krycek: I told you, I want to believe. But I need a place to start.
%
Krycek: Hey , I don't like being ditched like somebody's bad date.
Mulder: Oh stop, or your gonna hurt my feelings
Krycek: Look, you don't know the first thing about me.
Mulder: Exactly.
%
Scully: Sounds like your new partner's working out.
Mulder: He's all right. He could use a little more seasoning and some wardrobe 
advice. But he's a lot more open to extreme possibilities than...
Scully: Than I was?
Mulder: ...than I assumed he would be.
Scully: Must be nice not having someone question your every move, poking holes 
in all your theories.
Mulder: Oh yeah, it's---it's great. I'm surprised I put up with you so long.
%
Mulder: [Mr. X hands Mulder an envelope] What's this?
Mr. X: Data from a top secret military project. Born of the idea that sleep was 
the soldier's greatest enemy.
Mulder: Grissom was conducting sleep deprivation experiments on Parris Island?
Mr. X: Not deprivation. Eradication.
Mulder: Why?
Mr. X: Why else? To build a better soldier. Sustained wakefulness dulls fear, 
heightens aggression. Science had just put a man on the moon. So now they 
looked to science to win a losing war.
Mulder: And Willig and Cole were the lab rats.
Mr. X: Lab rats with the highest kill ratio in the Marine Corps. Four 
thousand-plus confirmed kills for a thirteen-man squad.
Mulder: You think Cole's behind what's happening now?
Mr. X: I'm not here to do your thinking, Agent Mulder. All I know is, that 
Augustus Cole hasn't slept in twenty-four years.
...
Mulder: So how do I contact you?
Mr. X: You can't
Mulder: I may still need more.
Mr. X: You still don't get it, do you? Closing the X-Files, separating you and 
Scully was only the beginning. The truth is still out there, but it's more 
dangerous. The man we both knew paid for that information with his life, a 
sacrifice I'm not willing to make.
%
Salvatore Matola: They said it'd be like living two lifetimes. At- at first, 
that's what it was like. Not having to sleep at all made us feel like nothin' 
could touch us, you know? We'd do 24 hour patrols, night ambushes, you know, 
and that type of thing.
Mulder: And you never got tired?
Salvatore Matola: No. Not so that we had to sleep. And then, nothing that the 
pills couldn't fix.
Mulder: Serotonin?
Salvatore Matola: Yeah.
Mulder: How long did this go on?
Salvatore Matola: Quite a while, I'd say. Quite a while - until we stopped 
taking orders from the company commander in Saigon.
Krycek: You mean the entire squad went AWOL?
Salvatore Matola: Yeah, somethin' like that.
Mulder: Well, then who did you take orders from?
Salvatore Matola: We just made up missions as we went along, until it didn't 
matter anymore who we were killing. Farmers, women. Outside of Phu Bai, there 
was this school...they were just kids.
%
Lucy Kazdin: You really believe in this stuff, Agent Mulder?
Mulder: Is that a problem?
Lucy Kazdin: We're here to save lives. You'll begin negotiations immediately. 
Every three hours, we'll reevaluate your progress and let our tactical 
commander advise and update on the use of force.
Mulder: If this man is an abductee, I need to know more about him, his personal 
history. Each abduction case is different.
Lucy Kazdin: That material's not been made available to us.
Mulder: And nobody's thought to call the hospital for records?
Lucy Kazdin: Look, Agent Mulder. The guy's a psycho. Your object is to keep him 
on the phone. The longer you do, the more chance he's not going to kill 
anybody. We stop to do a Freudian analysis, next thing we know, we've got four 
dead hostages. So whatever crap you got to make up about space men or UFOs, 
just keep him on the phone.
%
Duane Barry: They're, uh... they're talking to Duane Barry. But they don't 
speak. He can hear what they're saying. They can... read his mind.
Mulder: That's right. Abductees call it mindscan. It's a kind of telepathy.
Duane Barry: I'm telling 'em I don't want to go... but they never listen. They 
know what I'm saying. But they just... go right on about their business.
[He stands up slowly and points to Hakkie]
Duane Barry: Tell him what their business is. Tell him.
Mulder: They take you aboard the ship to perform the tests.
Duane Barry: They... drilled my teeth. They drill holes in my damn teeth!
%
Scully: Sometimes when you want to believe so badly, you end up... looking too 
hard.
Lucy Kazdin: I actually called you down here for another reason, Agent Mulder. 
Uh... in the x-rays, the surgeon found several pieces of metal. In his gums, in 
his sinus cavity, and one in the abdomen. I had them checked, I felt you'd want 
to know... and there were tiny drill holes in his left and right rear molars. A 
dentist who examined them said they could not have been done with any of the 
current equipment in use... not without chipping or damaging the tooth. 
Anyway... I thought you ought to know.
%
Scully: Where's Mulder?
Krycek: He traded himself for one of the hostages.
Scully: What?
Krycek: He's in with Duane Barry.
Scully: You've got to get him out of there.
Krycek: Well, they're working on it.
Scully: No, you've got to get him out of there now or he's going to be killed!
Krycek: How can you be sure?
Scully: Because Duane Barry is not what Mulder thinks he is.
%
Scully: Mulder, it's me. I just had something incredibly strange happen. This 
piece of metal that they took out of Duane Barry, it has some kind of code on 
it. I ran it through a scanner, and some kind of serial number came up. What 
the hell is this thing, Mulder? It's almost as if... it's almost as if somebody 
was using it to catalog him... Mulder! I need your help! Mulder! [shouts] 
Mulder!
%
Mulder: I found this. [He shows a cross] It's something I... I never considered 
about her. If she was... if she was such a skeptic, why did she wear that?
Margaret Scully: I gave it to her on her fifteenth birthday.
Mulder: Don't you want to keep it?
Margaret Scully: When you find her, give it to her.
%
Mulder: Who are these people who can just murder with impunity and we can't do 
anything about it?
Skinner: Let it go, Agent Mulder.
Mulder: Like hell.
Skinner: There's nothing you can do.
Mulder: What can you do about it?
Skinner: There's only one thing I can do, Agent Mulder. As of right now, I'm 
reopening the X-Files. That's what they fear the most.
%
Mulder: [holding up a cigarette butt] I found this in Agent Krycek's car. He 
doesn't smoke. Agent Krycek was the last person with Duane Barry before he 
died. He was also the last person to see the tram operator before he 
disappeared. When I got to the top of Skyland Mountain, I saw an unmarked 
helicopter working the area. I believe that Agent Krycek gave away the 
whereabouts of Duane Barry and Agent Scully to whoever he's working with.
Skinner: And who is that?
Mulder: I don't know, the military? Some covert organization within the 
government? Whoever it is that man who smokes those cigarettes works for.
Skinner: Why?
Mulder: Because Agent Scully got too close to whatever it is they're trying to 
deny. Because she had hard and damning evidence, that metallic implant in her 
possession. Or because her termination would prevent further involvement with 
me and my work.
%
Mr. X: This reaches beyond any of us, Mister Mulder. Even my predecessor.
Mulder: I want an answer!
Mr. X: Why kill Duane Barry if there was nothing to hide?
Mulder: You mean the government?
Mr. X: There are no answers for you, Mister Mulder. They only have one 
policy... Deny everything.
...
Mr. X: You've wasted a trip, Mister Mulder. There's nothing the Senator can do 
for you now.
Mulder: What?
Mr. X: Not without committing political suicide.
Mulder: Why? Do they have something on him?
Mr. X: They have something on everyone, Mister Mulder. The question is when 
they'll use it.
%
Krycek: If Mulder is such a threat, why not eliminate him?
The Cigarette Smoking Man: That's not our policy.
Krycek: It's not? After what you had me do?
The Cigarette Smoking Man: Kill Mulder and you risk turning one man's religion 
into a crusade.
%
Commander Carver: Eternal life. Smashed mirrors. Blood drinking. Should I be 
issuing my men stakes and cloves of garlic?
Mulder: Only if they're hungry.
%
Kristen Kilar: Are you about to ask what a normal person like me is doing in a 
place like this?
Mulder: How do you define normal?
Kristen Kilar: Misha, red wine... I don't. How do you?
Mulder: All I know is... normal is not what I feel.
Kristen Kilar: You've lost someone. Not a lover... a friend.
%
Mulder: It's a stiff price, though. Look at yourself - drinking blood, living 
in darkness, unable to see your reflection in a mirror. Or is that just a myth?
John: I can't be seen in a mirror. Look… anything worth anything has a price 
and when I'm standing next to your deathbed looking as young as I look right 
now and I see that fear in your eyes at the moment of death … then, then tell 
me the price is too stiff.
Mulder: It's more likely I'll be looking in your eyes at the moment before they 
lead you into the gas chamber. That's a moment you won't have to face if you 
tell me where the others are.
John: Why would I? They're the only ones that can kill me.
Mulder: Well, if you are what you say you are, I know what can kill you.
%
The Son: Don't you want to live forever?
Mulder: Not if drawstring pants come back in style.
%
John: Look, what nobody realizes is that there is no afterlife. I know this. 
Listen, listen, I know this because when we prolong our lives by taking theirs 
all I see is such …horror in their eyes and that's because at that moment 
they're face-to-face with death and then suddenly they realize there's nothing 
else. There's no heaven. There's no soul. There's just rot and there's just 
decay. And I will never, ever, ever, ever have to face that.
%
Mulder: Get that gun out of my face!
Mr. X: This high-capacity compact Sig Sauer .40 caliber weapon is pointed at 
your head to stress my insistence that your search for who put your partner on 
that respirator desist immediately!
Mulder: You ignore my call for help and then you expect me to do what you say-- 
you go to hell!
Mr. X: You got him killed! You got her killed! That’s not going to happen to 
me! You’re my tool, you understand? I come to you when I need you! Right now, 
you’re heading in a direction that can lead them right here.
Mulder: What the hell are you talking about?
Mr. X: You’re not supposed to know. That’s the point.
Mulder: I owe her more than just sitting around doing nothing.
Mr. X: She was a good soldier, Mulder, but there’s nothing you can do to 
bring her back.
Mulder: She’s not dead.
Mr. X: [laughing] Listen to you. Listen. You’re a damn schoolboy, Mulder. You 
have no idea. No idea!
Mulder: Okay, then tell me. Tell me!
Mr. X: ...I used to be you. I was where you are now. But you’re not me, 
Mulder. I don’t think you have the heart. Walk away. Grieve for Scully and 
then never look back. You will be able to live with yourself, Mulder... on the 
day you die.
%
Skinner: There is no police report of this incident, Agent Mulder, and there is 
no body. You know that.
Mulder: Since I am unfamiliar with any such incident, sir, no, how would I know 
that?
Skinner: Knock it off!
Mulder: How's it feel? Constant denial of everything, questions answered with a 
question.
Skinner: I want to know what happened, damn it.
Mulder: Him. That's what happened. CANCER MAN! He's responsible for what 
happened to Scully!
Skinner: How do you know that?
Mulder: It's a rumor. Who is he?
Skinner: It's not your...
Mulder: Oh, you can have it all, you can have my badge, you can have the 
X-Files, just tell me where he is.
Skinner: And then what? He sleeps with the fishes? We're not the mafia, Agent 
Mulder. I know it's easy to forget but we work for the Department of Justice.
Mulder: That's what I want.
Skinner: Agent Scully was a fine officer. More than that... I liked her. I 
respected her. We all know the field we play on and we all know what can happen 
in the course of a game. If you were unprepared for all the potentials, then 
you shouldn't step on the field.
%
Melissa Scully: I don't have to be psychic to see that you're in a very dark 
place. Much darker than where my sister is. Willingly walking deeper into 
darkness cannot help her at all. Only the light...
Mulder: [disgustedly] Oh, enough! - with the harmonic convergence crap, okay, 
you're not saying anything to me.
Melissa Scully: [angrily] Why don't you just drop your cynicism and your 
paranoia and your defeat. You know, just because it's positive and good, 
doesn't mean it's silly or trite.
%
Skinner: When I was eighteen, I, uh... I went to Vietnam. I wasn't drafted, 
Mulder, I- I enlisted in the Marine Corps the day of my eighteenth birthday. I 
did it on a blind faith. I did it because I believed it was the right thing to 
do. I don't know, maybe I still do. Three weeks into my tour, a ten-year-old 
North Vietnamese boy walked into camp covered with grenades and I, uh... I blew 
his head off from a distance of ten yards. I lost my faith. Not in my country 
or in myself, but in everything. There was just no point to anything anymore. 
One night on patrol, we were, uh... caught... and everyone- everyone fell. I 
mean, everyone. I looked down at my body from outside of it. I didn't recognize 
it at first. I watched the V.C. strip my uniform, take my weapon and I remained 
in this thick jungle... peaceful... unafraid... watching my- my dead friends. 
Watching myself. In the morning, the corpsmen arrived and put me in a body bag 
until... I guess they found a pulse. I woke in a Saigon hospital two weeks 
later. I'm afraid to look any further beyond that experience. You? You are not. 
Your resignation is unacceptable.
Mulder: [realizing] You. [exhales heavily] You gave me Cancer Man's location. 
You put your life in danger.
Skinner: Agent Mulder, every life, every day, is in danger. That’s just life.
%
Margaret Scully: Hello, Fox.
Scully [smiles] Not Fox. Mulder. [opens her eyes]
Mulder: How you feeling?
Scully: Mulder, I don't remember anything. After Duane Barry...
Mulder: [shakes his head] Doesn't... doesn't matter.
%
Mulder: [voice-over] Scully and I are in the third day of a month-long 
quarantine, undergoing level 4 decon procedures. We are so far without symptoms 
of fungal contamination. All our specimens and field notes were confiscated by 
the military biohazard corps prior to our evacuation. Their presence has 
delayed for an indefinite period the arrival of the USGS data retrieval team. I 
suspect, though, that there will be little left for them to retrieve. There are 
no plans at present to explore further any of the hundreds of volcanically 
active mountains in the Cascade Range, including Mount Avalon. All access 
points to that volcano have been sealed off by army engineers.... Of the 
members of the Firewalker descent team, only Trepkos and O'Neil remain 
unaccounted for. They are presumed dead, and the search for them has been 
abandoned. Firewalker, however, was recovered, though its sensory and 
locomotive systems were found to be irreparably damaged. The data it collected 
from the earth's interior will never be known. And of the events that occurred 
at Mount Avalon between the 11th and 13th of November, 1994, mine stands as the 
only record.
%
Mulder: I'm going to find Trepkos.
Scully: What if he's already dead?
Mulder: Then he'll have a lot of trouble answering my questions.
%
Trepkos: You still believe you can petition heaven and get some penetrating 
answer. If you found that answer, what would you do with it?
%
Mulder: Scully? I don't think it's a good idea for you to go.
Scully: Mulder, I appreciate your concern - but I'm ready. I want to work.
Mulder: Well, maybe you should take some time off.
Scully: I've already lost too much time.
%
Trepkos: [on video] Scientific data? We're talking about revisiting the very 
origin of the earth, peering into the fire where it all began - a human 
endeavor more important even than man's exploration of space.
%
Mazeroski: There's something I think you ought to see first. They call 
themselves the Church of the Red Museum. They're followers of a guy named Odin 
that moved out here from California three years ago and bought a ranch.
Scully: What's the significance of the name "Red Museum?"
Mazeroski: Well, Odin and the rest of them are a bunch of vegetarians. They 
drove the ranch right into the ground, turned 500 head of beef cattle into 
pets. Calls it a monument to barbarism.
Mulder: Probably went over big with the local ranchers.
Mazeroski: Well, you gotta admit, it takes some big ones to set down in the 
middle of cow country and start a church like his.
%
Old Man: Business changed. People changed too.
Mulder: In what way?
Old Man: Competition. Used to get by with fifty milk cows. Now, you got to have 
five hundred. Used to turn them out to pasture, now you keep them in pens and 
grain feed them.
Scully: You said you wanted to show us something.
Old Man: You're looking at it. See those men over there? Well, they're 
injecting the cattle with something called B.S.T. Bovine somatotrophin.
Scully: A genetically-engineered growth hormone.
Old Man: Yeah, shoot them up and the cow will produce ten percent more milk. 
Feed it to beef cattle, more meat on the hoof. Changed the business. Changed a 
whole lot of things.
Scully: How do you mean?
Old Man: Well, that, uh, fracas in town this afternoon. Ten, even five years 
ago, never would have happened. People around here have changed... gotten 
mean... spiteful... dog-eat-dog. We had seven rapes here last year by high 
school boys. Well, that, um... this, this business of the kids being found in 
the woods... well, I think that you're going to find it all comes from the same 
root source.
Mulder: The growth hormone.
%
Mulder: You know, for a holy man, you've got quite a knack for pissing people 
off.
%
Scully: So, you started to tell me about walk-ins but I'm not sure if I grasped 
the finer points.
Mulder: Well, it, it's kind of a new age religion based on an old idea. That if 
you, uh, lose hope or despair and want to leave this mortal coil, you become 
open and vulnerable.
Scully: To inhabitation by a new spirit.
Mulder: A new enlightened spirit. According to the literature, Abe Lincoln was 
a walk-in. And Mikhail Gorbachev and Charles Colson, Nixon's advisor.
Scully: But not Nixon?
Mulder: No. Not even they want to claim Nixon.
%
Scully: I just got the toxicology report back on the broken vial. The residual 
substance couldn't be analyzed because it contained synthetic corticosteroids 
with unidentified amino acids. That's "Purity Control," Mulder.
Mulder: Do you know what you're saying, Scully?
Scully: The man who died in that plane crash was inoculating those kids with 
antibodies derived from what may have been an extraterrestrial source.
Mulder: He's been injecting those kids with alien DNA.
Scully: No, Mulder, that was never proven conclusively.
Mulder: But it's the same substance we found in the Erlenmeyer flask, isn't it? 
The same material my Deep Throat contact died for.
Scully: Yes.
Mulder: It all makes sense. The money in the briefcase, they've been conducting 
an experiment here. Somebody's been paying to have those kids injected with 
alien DNA to see how they'd react. It's been going on for years.
%
Scully: Good morning.
Mulder: Whatever tape you found in that VCR, it isn't mine.
Scully: Good, because I put it back in that drawer with all those other videos 
that aren't yours.
%
Scully: [playing a video tape] This is Michelle Charters. She's a registered 
nurse at a convalescent home in Worchester, Massachusetts.
Mulder: What happened to her?
Scully: According to Miss Charters, she was raped. The abrasions and contusions 
here would be consistent with her claims as would be the medical report which 
cites the kind of injury and tearing associated with sexual trauma.
Mulder: Where did you get this? Violent Crimes?
Scully: No. The woman made the video herself. It seems that no one will believe 
her story.
Mulder: Why not?
Scully: Because she claims to have been raped by an invisible entity. A spirit 
being.
Mulder: I have several X-Files that document similar cases.
Scully: I know. I've been here since 6:00 this morning going through them.
Mulder: Well, then you know none of them have ever been substantiated.
Scully: Not surprisingly.
Mulder: Given the emotional and psychological violence of rape, the face or 
identity of the attacker is often blurred or erased from memory. That he could 
be perceived as invisible is a logical leap for me.
Scully: Yes. But this case is different.
Mulder: Why?
Scully: The victim has filed a lawsuit against the government. She seems to be 
certain who the spirit being is.
%
Mulder: I think you're right, Scully.
Scully: About?
Mulder: What's been happening is the result of the medication, but not the 
medication the Doctor's been giving them.
Scully: Mulder, mushrooms aren't medication. They taste good on hamburgers, but 
they don't raise the dead.
Mulder: Shamans have used them for centuries to gain entrance to the spirit 
world.
Scully: I think you've been reading too much Carlos Castaneda.
Mulder: Ask any anthropologist then.
Scully: I know --- a shaman gets intoxicated, he has dreams or hallucinations, 
and he interprets them. I don't think it's any more magical than that.
Mulder: I don't know how else to explain what's happening here.
Scully: Well, I think, if anything, these mushrooms are a poison to the system 
and I think that's what killed Hal Arden.
Mulder: And raped Michelle Charters and killed those two orderlies? Something's 
been unleashed here, Scully. I don't know how to explain it, but it has 
something to do with those pills.
%
Mulder: I...I think you're looking too hard, Scully, for something that's not 
there. I think Michelle Charters concocted this story to get out of a job she 
hates.
Scully: Her lip required 13 stitches. The blow to her head resulted in a 
subdural hematoma. That's quite a concoction.
%
Scully: What if there's a connection?
Mulder: Between the rape case and the Alzheimer's? When they're not drawing 
childlike pictures they're brutal sex offenders?
Scully: Dr. Grago's therapy produces acetylcholine. Too much cholinergic 
activity causes a psychotic state similar to schizophrenia.
Mulder: You think that Michelle Charters was raped by a 74-year-old 
schizophrenic?
Scully: It's possible.
Mulder: An invisible 74-year-old schizophrenic?
Scully: Well, maybe it's not in the medication. Maybe it's the place itself.
Mulder: Are you saying that the building's haunted? If you are, you've been 
working with me for too long, Scully.
Scully: I'm talking about an environmental reason behind what's happening 
there. Even the disinfectant couldn't mask that smell. Who knows what's 
breeding behind the walls or in the sub-structure. Some fungal contaminants 
have been known to cause delusions, dementia, violent behavior.
%
Scully: What's your interest in this case?
Mulder: During their time, Chaney's and Ledbetter's ideas weren't very well 
received by their peers. Using psychology to solve a crime was something like, 
um ...
Scully: Believing in the paranormal?
Mulder: Exactly. There's another mystery.
Scully: Which is?
Mulder: Well, I'd like to know why this policewoman would suddenly drive her 
car into a field the size of Rhode Island and for no rhyme or reason dig up the 
bones of a man who's been missing for fifty years. I mean, unless there was a 
neon sign saying "Dig Here" --
Scully: I guess that's why we're going to Aubrey.
Mulder: Yes, and also I've always been intrigued by women named B.J.
%
Mulder: Well, on a basic cellular level, we're the sum total of all our 
ancestors' biological matter. But what if more than biological traits get 
passed down from generation to generation? What if I like sunflower seeds 
because I'm genetically predisposed to liking them?
Scully: But children aren't born liking sunflower seeds. Environments shape 
them; behavior patterns are taught.
Mulder: There are countless stories of twins separated at birth who end up in 
the same occupation, marrying the same kind of people, each naming their child 
Waldo.
Scully: Waldo?
Mulder: Jung wrote about it when he talked about the collective unconscious. 
It's genetic memory, Scully.
%
Scully: Mulder, I don't think B.J. was in the woods that night because of 
engine failure.
Mulder: What are you talking about?
Scully: Well, the Motel Black would have been a perfect meeting place. Away 
from town, away from his wife.
Mulder: What do you mean?
Scully: It's obvious B.J. and Tillman are having an affair.
Mulder: How do you know?
Scully: A woman senses these things.
%
Mulder: Listen to this, Scully. "One must wonder how these monsters are 
created." Chaney wrote this. "Did their home life mold them into creatures that 
must maim and kill, or are they demons from birth?"
Scully: Well, that's poetic but it doesn't help us much. What did he say about 
the 1942 homicides?
Mulder: Well, the press called the murderer "The Slash Killer." His three 
victims were all young women aged twenty-five to thirty. He disabled them with 
a blow to the head. He would carve the word "SISTER" on their chests and paint 
it on the wall with their blood.
%
Mulder: I've always figured that dreams are answers to questions we haven't 
figured out how to ask yet.
%
Mulder: [voiceover] The conquest of fear lies in the moment of its acceptance. 
And understanding what scares us most is that which is most familiar, most 
common place... It's been said that the fear of the unknown is an irrational 
response to the excesses of the imagination. But our fear of the everyday, of 
the lurking stranger, and the sound of foot-falls on the stairs, the fear of 
violent death and the primitive impulse to survive, are as frightening as any 
X-file, as real as the acceptance that it could happen to you.
%
Scully: I know these things. I'm conscious of them. I know the world is full of 
predators, just as it has always been. And I know it's my job to protect people 
from them. And I've counted on that fact to give me faith in my ability to do 
what I do... I want that faith back... I need it back.
%
Scully: You think you find a way to deal with these things. In med school, you 
develop a clinical detachment to death. In your FBI training, you are 
confronted with cases, the most terrible and violent cases. You think you can 
look into the face of pure evil. And then you find yourself paralyzed by it.
%
Scully: [voiceover] Death is a recorded event. For reasons natural or 
unnatural, when a body ceases to function, the cause of the effect can be 
clearly reconstructed. A body has a story to tell... If the victim was 
strangled, an examination of the veins in the eyes will reveal this. If the 
victim was shot, entry wounds and gunpowder residue can be used to reconstruct 
the events leading to death and help to establish a possible motive. Body 
temperature, preferably the temperature of the spleen, is an accurate indicator 
of the time of death. As are rigor, livor and levels of sodium in the blood. If 
the body was moved, sand, small rocks, vegetable debris, even pollen can be 
removed and analysed to determine the location of the original crime scene and 
place the position of the body at the time of death. Extracutenous stains and 
residues can indicate the use of poison or toxins. Hair and fibres, slivers of 
glass, plastic, even insect casings can serve to recreate the circumstances 
under which death occurred... It may be an irony only understood by those of us 
who conduct these examinations, who use these pieces to rebuild a narrative, 
that death, like life itself, is a drama with a beginning, middle and end.
%
Scully: [voiceover] A complete model or psychological profile of the death 
fetishist does not exist. Extrapolating from material on file at the FBI's 
Behavioral Science Unit, the compulsion is the result of a complex misplacement 
of values and a deviation from cultural norms and societal mores - often 
accompanied by extreme alienation from normal social interaction and 
traditional avenues for interaction with others. He is more likely to be white, 
male and of average to above average intelligence. Cases of fetishists with IQs 
over 150 have been documented. The progression of the pathology can be traced 
from the fantasy stage to the eventual acting out of fetishistic impulses, 
including opportunistic homicide.... Agent Mulder believes strongly that the 
suspect in this case is escalating toward this action. It is my opinion from 
reading these case files that death fetishism may play a stronger role than 
suspected in cases of serial murder. That once he begins to murder, it is the 
killing that draws attention away from a deeper motive. A motive which most 
people, including law enforcement professionals, dare not imagine. It is 
somehow easier to believe, as Agent Bocks does, in aliens and UFOs, than in the 
kind of cold-blooded inhuman monster who could prey on the living to scavenge 
from the dead.
%
Ausbury: My religion, my family, Agent Mulder, goes back in this town seven 
generations. They fled persecution from people being persecuted, all in the 
name of religion. I was raised to believe Christianity was synonymous with 
hypocrisy. Man's natural tendency was to do as thou wilst, not do unto others. 
We believe... Man is nothing but an animal, no better, no worse, than those who 
walk on four legs. And though I believed our faith kept us powerful in the 
community, wealthy, good health, I... I came to see hypocrisy in the 
others...in myself.
%
Mulder: The water...
Scully: What's wrong with it?
Mulder: It's going down the drain counter-clockwise! Coriolis force in the 
Northern Hemisphere dictates that it should go down clockwise.
Scully: That isn't possible.
Mulder: Something's here, Scully. Something is making these things possible.
%
Mulder: Did you really think you could call up the Devil and ask him to behave?
%
[Mulder and Scully are in the basement looking at Ausbury's skeleton]
Mulder: There are tracks in the dirt... like from a snake.
Scully: That's impossible. It would take a large python hours to consume and 
weeks to digest a human being.
Mulder: You really do watch The Learning Channel.
%
Scully: I mean, there's nothing weird about...
[toads start falling from the sky, then stop]
Mulder: So... lunch?
Scully: Mulder, toads just fell from the sky!
Mulder: I guess their parachutes didn't open. You were saying something about 
this place not feeling "odd"?
%
Mulder: Private John McAlpin, he was one of the few, the proud... the dead. 
Last week he wrapped his car around a tree, died on impact.
%
Scully: Mulder, voodoo only works by instilling fear among its believers. You 
saw the way Bauvais tried to intimidate me. The power of suggestion is 
considerable, I'll admit.. But this is no more magic than a pair of fuzzy dice.
%
Mulder: I was surprised to get your card. I had assumed our last contact... 
would be our last. Why are you here?
Mr. X: Your investigation is faltering, Agent Mulder.
Mulder: I've got a renegade Marine who may be violating every human rights 
provision...
Mr. X: These people have no rights. In 24 hours all access to Folkstone will be 
restricted to military personnel. No press, no third-party monitoring.
Mulder: What about Scully and me?
Mr. X: You'll be called back to Washington on a priority matter.
Mulder: They're making the camp invisible. Why?
Mr. X: In case you haven't noticed, Agent Mulder, the Statue of Liberty is on 
vacation. The new mandate says if you're not a citizen you'd better keep out.
%
Mulder: What do you know about zombies?
Scully: Well I hope you don't intend to tell Robin McAlpin that she married one.
%
Mulder: I have lived with a fragile faith built on the ether of vague memories 
from an experience that I can neither prove nor explain. When I was twelve, my 
sister was taken from me, taken from our home by a force that I came to believe 
was extraterrestrial. What happened to me out on the ice has justified every 
belief. If I should die now, it would be with the certainty that my faith has 
been righteous. And if, through death, larger mysteries are revealed, I will 
have already learned the answer to the question that has driven me here... that 
there is intelligent life in the universe other than our own... that they are 
here among us... and that they have begun to colonize.
%
Scully: Our friend from the CIA is about as unbelievable as his story... as is 
everything about this case. I mean, whatever happened to "trust no one", Mulder?
Mulder: Oh, I changed it to "trust everyone". I didn't tell you?
%
Scully: [voiceover] Transfusions and a treatment with antiviral agents have 
resulted in a steady but gradual improvement in Agent Mulder's condition. Blood 
tests have confirmed his exposure to the still-unidentified retrovirus, whose 
origin remains a mystery. The search team that found Agent Mulder has located 
neither the missing submarine nor the man he was looking for. Several aspects 
of this case remain unexplained, suggesting the possibility of paranormal 
phenomena. But I am convinced that to accept such conclusions is to abandon all 
hope of understanding the scientific events behind them. Many of the things I 
have seen have challenged my faith and my belief in an ordered universe, but 
this uncertainty has only strengthened my need to know, to understand, to apply 
reason to those things that seem to defy it. It was science that isolated the 
retrovirus Agent Mulder was exposed to, and science that allowed us to 
understand its behavior. And ultimately, it was science that saved Agent 
Mulder's life.
%
Scully: Thanks for ditching me.
Mulder:I'm sorry, I, uh... I couldn't let you risk your life on this.
Scully: Did you find what you were looking for?
Mulder: No... no. But I found something I thought I'd lost.
[Scully gives him a questioning look]
Mulder: Faith to keep looking.
%
Mr. X: You'll only win the war if you pick the right battles, Agent Mulder. 
This is a battle you can't win.
%
Mr. X: You wanted to see me?
Mulder: How was the opera?
Mr. X: Wonderful. I've never slept better. I don't like these hasty public 
meetings, Agent Mulder.
Mulder: I'm sorry. I need your help.
Mr. X: It's over. The fat lady is singing.
%
Mulder: Just tell me where she is!
Alien Bounty Hunter: She's alive...can you die now?
%
Mulder: I'd be willing to admit the possibility of a tornado, but it's not 
really tornado season. I'd even be willing to entertain the notion of a black 
hole passing over the area or some cosmic anomaly but it's not really black 
hole season either . . . If I were a betting man, I'd say it was . . .
Scully: An invisible elephant?
Mulder: I saw David Copperfield make the Statue of Liberty disappear once.
%
Kyle: All animals should run free.
Scully: Even if that means trampling a man to death?
Kyle: Maybe he should have gotten out of the way.
Mulder: I'm sure he would have if he had seen it coming.
%
Frohike: If that's the lovely Agent Scully, let her know I've been working out 
... I'm buff!
%
Byers: Langly couldn't join us. He has a philosophical aversion to having his 
image bounced off a satellite.
%
Scully: Something very strange is going on here, Mulder.
Mulder: Did they let you in to see Lieutenant Harper?
Scully: Yeah I saw somebody, but whether it was actually the Lieutenant...
Mulder: What do you mean?
Scully: He looked about 90 years old. Off by about half a century. You don't 
seem too surprised.
%
Mulder: Scully, what do you know about the Philadelphia Experiment?
Scully: It was a program during World War II, to render battleships invisible 
to radar.
Mulder: On July 8, 1944, the USS Eldridge did more than just hide from radar 
screens. It vanished from the Philadelphia Navy Yard... Only to reappear 
minutes later, hundred of miles away in Norfolk, Virgina.
%
Scully: I found a children's book of Norse legends. From what I can tell, the 
pictures show the end of the world - not in a sudden firestorm of damnation as 
the Bible teaches us, but in a slow covering blanket of snow. First the moon 
and the stars will be lost in a dense white fog, then the rivers and the lakes 
and the sea will freeze over. And finally a wolf named Skoll will open his jaws 
and eat the sun, sending the world into an everlasting night. I think I hear 
the wolf at the door.
%
Scully: Mulder...When they found me, after the doctors and even my family had 
given up, I experienced something that I never told you about. Even now it's 
hard to find the words. But there's one thing I'm certain of. As certain as I 
am of this life, we have nothing to fear when it's over.
%
Mulder: I always thought when I got older I'd maybe take a cruise somewhere. 
This isn't exactly what I had in mind. The service on this ship is terrible, 
Scully.
%
Mulder: I could be mistaken. Maybe it was another bald-headed, 
jigsaw-puzzle-tattooed, naked guy I saw.
%
Mulder: (Upon being told that Dr. Blockhead could make his testicles shrivel up 
inside him) Oh, mine are doing that as we speak.
%
Mulder: I got the impression that Glazebrook wasn't the only sideshow performer 
residing here.
%
Hepcat Helm: Who are the rubes?
Sheriff Hamilton: These are FBI agents Scully and Mulder. This is Hepcat Helm, 
he operates a carnival funhouse.
Hepcat Helm: Oh man, how many times have I told you not to call it that. It's 
not some rinky dink carny ride. People go through it, they don't have fun, they 
get the hell scared out of them. It's not a funhouse, it's a tabernacle of 
terror.
Sheriff Hamilton: It's a funhouse.
%
Mulder: Tell me, have you done much circus work in your life?
Mr. Nut: And what makes you think I've ever spectated a circus? Much less been 
enslaved by one?
Mulder: I know that many of the citizens here are former circus hands, and I 
just thought that...
Mr. Nut: You thought that because I am a person of short stature, that the only 
career I could procure for myself would be one confined to the so-called 'Big 
Top'. You took one quick look at me, and decided that you could deduce my 
entire life. Never would it have occurred to you that a person of my height 
could have possibly obtained a degree in Hotel Management.
Mulder: I'm sorry. I meant no offence.
Mr. Nut: Well then why should I take offence? Just because it's human nature to 
make instantaneous judgements of others based solely upon their physical 
appearances? Why I've done the same thing to you, for example. I've taken in 
your all-American features, your dour demeanour, your unimaginative necktie 
design, and concluded that you work for the government; an FBI agent... but do 
you see the tragedy here? I have mistakenly deduced you to a stereotype. A 
caricature, instead of regarding you as a specific, unique individual.
Mulder: But I am an FBI agent.
%
Lanny: Mr. Nut, the kind-hearted manager here, convinced me that to make a 
living by publicly displaying my deformity lacked dignity. So... now I carry 
other people's luggage. I believe these are your trailers; if they are not... 
then I am wrong.
[Mulder takes the suitcases from Lenny and tips him]
Lanny: Oh, that's most considerate. Thank you very much.
[Mulder shows Scully that he still has the tip in his hand]
Lanny: Good night, sleep tight, don't let the bedbugs bite. No, no, that's... 
that's not what I meant... I... I didn't mean to imply that we had bedbugs... 
I... I meant to say don't let... don't let the...
Mulder: The 'Fiji Mermaids' bite?
Lanny: Yes, that's right... The 'Fiji Mermaids'...
%
[Mulder and Scully watch as Dr. Blockhead hammers a long nail up his nose]
Mulder: Have you ever performed this... act on anyone else?
Dr. Blockhead: What, are you sick? I tell my audiences that if they're stupid 
enough to try this on themselves they'll end up with a slight lobotomy. I am a 
professional.
Mulder: Exactly how does one become a professional blockhead?
%
Sheriff Hamilton: [to Scully] Are you sure it was the brother you saw? Maybe it 
was the Fiji Mermaid who jumped in the sea and swam back to Fiji.
Mulder: [to Scully] Now you know how I feel.
%
Mr Nut: You'd be surprised how many women find my size alluring.
Mulder: You'd be surprised how many men do as well.
%
Dr. Blockhead: I don't speak to any police without my lawyer.
Mulder: Who's your lawyer?
'Dr. Blockhead: I represent myself.
%
Skinner: For every step you take they're three steps ahead.
Mulder: What about you, where do you stand?
Skinner: I stand right on the line you keep crossing.
%
Scully: According to the briefing, the prisoners escaped while hiding in a 
laundry cart.
Mulder: I don't think the guards have been watching enough prison movies.
%
Scully: There's no sign of him, Mulder. Maybe he's moved on. What are you 
looking at?
Mulder: On the videotape, Dr. Banton kept staring at the floor. I've been 
trying to figure out what he might have been looking at.
Scully: Well, maybe the exposure affected his mind. Nonsensical repetitive 
behavior is a common trait of mental illness.
Mulder: You trying to tell me something?
%
Mulder: He believes the government is out to get him.
Mr. X: It's tax season - so do most Americans.
%
Scully: Neat trick, Mulder; for your birthday I'll buy you a utility belt.
%
Frohike: I don't think we've been followed.
Mulder: Who would follow you?
Byers: Multinational black ops unit. Code name Garnett.
Langly: Trained killers. School of the American Alumni.
Mulder: Have you boys been defacing library books again?
%
Mulder: My father's dead, Scully. They killed him.
%
Albert Hosteen: [Intro narration] There is an ancient Indian saying that 
something lives only as long as the last person who remembers it. My people 
have come to trust memory over history. Memory, like fire, is radiant and 
immutable while history serves only those who seek to control it, those who 
douse the flame of memory in order to put out the dangerous fire of truth. 
Beware these men for they are dangerous themselves and unwise. Their false 
history is written in the blood of those who might remember and of those who 
seek the truth.
%
Deep Throat: [standing over an unconscious Mulder] I was first struck by the 
absence of time, having depended on it so completely as a measure of myself and 
my life. Moving backwards into the perpetual night - it consumes purpose, 
indeed, all passion and will. I come to you, old friend, with the dull clarity 
of the dead, not to beckon, you but to feel the fire and intensity that still 
live in you... and the heavy weight of your burdens which I had once borne. 
There is truth you know, friend, if that's all you seek, but there's no justice 
or judgment, without which truth is a vast... dead... hollow. Go back. Do not 
look into the abyss or let the abyss look into you; awaken the sleep of reason 
and fight the monsters within and without.
%
Frohike: He was a good friend. A redwood among mere sprouts. I guess this means 
he's passing you the torch?
Scully: Uh, I'm afraid not. I'm soon to be out of a job.
Frohike: Those sons of bitches! They're rigging the game.
Scully: And like rats they just scatter back into the wood pile.
Frohike: The rats that killed the cat.
%
Well Manicured Man: We predict the future. And the best way to predict it, is 
to invent it.
%
William Mulder: Hello, son. I did not dare hope to see you so soon, nor ever 
again hope to broker fate with a life to which I gave life. The lies I told you 
were a pox and poison to my soul, and now you are here because of them. Lies I 
thought might bury forever a truth I could not live with. I stand here ashamed 
of the choices I made so long ago when you were just a boy. You are the memory, 
Fox. It lives in you. If you were to die now, the truth will die. And only the 
lies survive us.
%
Scully: I went to your father's funeral. I told your mother that you were going 
to be okay.
Mulder: How did you know?
Scully: I just knew.
%
Scully: I need something to put my back up against, Mulder.
Mulder: I know. I feel the same way. I feel that we've lost so much... but 
we've got The X-Files, and I believe what we're looking for is in them. I'm 
more certain than ever the truth is out there, Scully.
Scully: I've heard the truth, Mulder. Now what I want are the answers.
%
The Cigarette Smoking Man: What is this?
Skinner: This is where you pucker up and kiss my ass!
The Cigarette Smoking Man: Listen -
Skinner: (Interrupting) Now, you listen to me, you son of a bitch! This man's 
name is Albert Hosteen. You should remember that. Because if Agents Mulder and 
Scully come down with so much as a case of the flu, Albert is prepared to 
recite, chapter and verse, file for file, everything on your precious tape.
The Cigarette Smoking Man: It's a nice try, Skinner.
Skinner: I'm sure you're thinking Albert is an old man and there are plenty of 
ways you might kill him too. Which is why, in the ancient oral tradition of his 
people, he's told twenty other men the information on those files. So unless 
you kill every Navajo living in four states... that information is available 
with a simple phone call. (Smirks) Welcome to the wonderful world of high 
technology
%
Scully: So, what are we supposed to charge him with, 'assaulting a cellular 
phone'?
%
Clyde Bruckman: How can I see the future if it didn't already exist?
Mulder: Then if the future is written, then why bother to do anything?
Clyde Bruckman: Now you're catching on.
%
Clyde Bruckman: Well, you see, that's another reason I can't help you catch 
this guy. I might adversely affect the fate of the future. I mean, his next 
victim might be the mother of the daughter whose son invents the time machine. 
Then the son goes back in time and changes world history and then Columbus 
never discovers America, man never lands on the moon, the U.S. never invades 
Grenada. Or something less significant, resulting in the fact that my father 
never meets my mother and consequently, I'm never born.
%
Clyde Bruckman: You know, there are worse ways to go, but I can't think of a 
more undignified way than autoerotic asphyxiation.
Mulder: Why are you telling me that?
Clyde Bruckman: Look, forget I mentioned it. It's none of my business.
%
Clyde Bruckman: You're looking down. You stepped in a pie that's fallen to the 
floor. The killer comes up to you and... coconut cream.
Mulder: What?
Clyde Bruckman: The pie... eh, coconut cream, or, is it lemon meringue? I don't 
know, it's... not sure, it's, it's hazy. As long as you're looking down, he 
comes up with the knife and... banana cream! Definitely banana cream.
%
Scully: So, how do I die?
Clyde Bruckman: You don't.
%
Mulder: Ok, but imagine if it was true, Scully. Imagine if you can come back 
[from the dead] and take out five people, who caused you to suffer. Who whould 
they be?
Scully: I only get five?
Mulder: [looks up at her] I've remembered your birthday this year, didn't I, 
Scully?
%
Mulder: The man was obsessed with reincarnation.
Scully: Being obsessed with it doesn't mean you can do it.
Mulder: No. Unless he knew something we don't.
Scully: Like what? The secret password?
%
Scully: Woman gets lonely. Sometimes she can't wait around for her man to be 
reincarnated.
%
Scully: From a dry skin sample, you're concluding what, that he's some kind of 
a fat-sucking vampire?
%
Mulder: Come on in.
Scully: What are you watching?
Mulder: Something that just came in the mail.
Scully: That's not your usual brand of entertainment... What is it?
Mulder: According to the magazine ad I answered, it's an alien autopsy. 
Guaranteed authentic.
Scully: You spent money for this?
Mulder: Twenty-nine ninety-five ..... plus shipping.
Scully: Mulder, this is even hokier than the one they aired on the Fox network, 
you can't even see what they're operating on!
Mulder: But it does look authentic, I mean the settings, the procedures. I mean 
it does look as if an actual autopsy is being prepared, doesn't it?
Scully: Well, technically, I don't know why they would be wearing gas masks.
Mulder: Well, maybe it's because of this green substance they seem to be 
extracting from the subject. Can you identify that?
Scully: Olive oil? Snake oil? I suppose you think it's alien blood?
Mulder: It's widely held that aliens don't have blood, Scully.
Scully: I guess this begs the question; if this is an alien autopsy...
Mulder: - where's the alien. But what so intriguing to me is the striking lack 
of detail here.
Scully: Well, what do you expect for $29.95?
%
Scully: I went to go see those MUFON members to find out about that woman, 
Betsy Hagopian.
Mulder: And what did you find?
Scully: I found out that she's dying. Along with a lot of other women who claim 
to be dying too. All of them who say that they've had these implanted in them. 
It's the same thing that I had removed from my own neck.
Mulder: But you're fine aren't you, Scully?
Scully: Am I? I don't know, Mulder. They said that they know me. That they've 
seen me before. It was freaky. They know things about me, about my 
disappearance.
Mulder: That is disturbing. But I don't think you should freak out until we 
find out what this thing is.
%
Mulder: (pouting to Scully, after she runs a bath for Kevin) You never draw my 
bath.
%
Mulder: (about religious fanatics) They give bona fide paranoids like myself a 
bad name.
%
Scully: I'm afraid that God is speaking and no one is listening.
%
Mulder: Yeah, did you know that the ancient Egyptians worshipped the scarab 
beetle and possibly erected the pyramids to honor them, which may be just giant 
symbolic dung heaps?
Scully: Did you know the inventor of the flush toilet was named Thomas Crapper?
%
Scully: I'm not going to ask you if you just said what I think you just said, 
because I know it's what you just said.
%
Dr. Berenbaum: Well, it's my theory that UFOs are actually insect swarms. I 
don't know if you know anything about UFOs...
Mulder:[lets out a small faint murmur, turns head vaguely]
Dr. Berenbaum:... but all the characteristics of a typical sighting are shared 
with nocturnal insects swarming through an electrical air field... the sudden 
appearance of a colored, glowing light hovering in the night sky, moving in a 
nonmechanical matter, possibly humming... creating interference with radio and 
television signals... then suddenly disappearing.
Mulder: As, uh... as nocturnal insect swarms. That's, uh... that's fascinating.
%
Mulder: Bambi also has this theory I've never come acro--
Scully: Who?
Mulder: Doctor Berenbaum. Anyway, her theory is--
Scully: Her name is Bambi?
Mulder: Yeah. Both her parents were naturalists. Her theory is that UFOs are 
actually nocturnal insect swarms passing through electrical air fields.
Scully: Her name is Bambi?
%
Mulder: Yeah, I had a praying mantis epiphany and, as a result, I screamed. No, 
not... not a girlie scream, but the scream of someone being confronted by some 
before unknown monster that had no right existing on the same planet I 
inhabited. Did you ever notice how a praying mantis' head resembles an alien's 
head? I mean, the mysteries of the natural world were revealed to me that day, 
but instead of being astounded, I was... repulsed.
Scully: Mulder... are you sure it wasn't a girlie scream?
%
Scully: [Watching Dr. Berenbaum and Ivanov walking away] Well, think of it this 
way, Mulder. By the time there's another invasion of artificially-intelligent, 
dung-eating robotic probes from outer space, maybe their uber-children will 
have devised a way to save our planet.
Mulder: You know, I never thought I'd say this to you, Scully... but you smell 
bad.
%
Detective White: These are good kids we're talking about. Outstanding students. 
And the details they gave... I doubt they could have made them up.
Scully: Let me guess. They told you about a wild beast entering in on a black 
mass, the drinking of blood, the sacrifice of an infant or a blond virgin.
Detective White: Yeah. That's right. Excuse me.
Scully: Where's she going?
Mulder: You don't suppose she's a virgin, do you?
Scully: I doubt she's even a blond.
%
Mulder: I was hoping you could help me solve the mystery of the horny beast.
%
[Scully and Mulder both reach for the latex gloves]
Mulder: Go ahead.
Scully: No, you go ahead.
Mulder: No, no, no. Be my guest. I know how much you like snapping on the latex.
%
Mulder: Let me drive.
Scully: I’m driving.
Mulder: Scully, it’s not what you think.
Scully: I didn’t see anything anyway.
Mulder: Will you let me drive!?
Scully: I’m driv-- why do you always have to drive? Because you’re the guy? 
Because you’re the big macho-man?
Mulder: No. I was just never sure your little feet could reach the pedals.
%
Mulder: Eh, Scully, if I’m not mistaken, we’re gonna be taking a left up 
here... eh, there’s an intersection up here, you’re gonna wanna... Scully! 
You’re gonna, wanna...! You just... ran a stop sign back there, Scully.
Scully: Shut up, Mulder.
Mulder: Sure, fine, whatever.
%
Scully: Sure, fine, whatever.
%
About Mulder not telling Scully he was going to follow up a lead with Detective 
White.
Scully: Look, we've been working together for what two years now, we have 
differing opinions, but I didn't expect you to ditch me.
Mulder: I didn't ditch you.
Scully: Fine, whatever.
%
Mulder: I wouldn't want to disappoint you by not disappointing you.
%
[about Mulder's encounter with a gargoyle]
Scully: Maybe you're just seeing what you wanted to see.
Mulder: What makes you think I'd want to see that?
%
Morgan: What the hell is that?
Mulder: Looks like the fuselage of a plane.
Scully: It's a North American P-51 Mustang.
Mulder: I just got very turned on.
%
Johansen: Conscience is just the voices of the dead trying to save us from our 
own damnation.
%
[Skinner is in the hospital, recovering from a gunshot wound]
Scully: How are you feeling?
Skinner: Like someone's been inside my stomach redecorating.
%
Mulder (enters the hospital in body armour holding the gun): Federal agent. Go 
about your business as usual.
%
Mulder: Let's go, G-woman.
%
Scully (to Mulder): Please explain to me the scientific nature of the "whammy".
%
Pusher (to A.D. Skinner) Take a walk, Mel Cooley.
%
Mulder: How many dishes do you have to break before your boss tosses you in an 
oven?
%
JOSE CHUNG: Still, as a storyteller, I'm fascinated how a person's sense of 
consciousness can be... so transformed by nothing more magical than listening 
to words. Mere words.
Harold Lamb: Oh, Chrissy, thank God you're all right.
Chrissy Giorgio: How dare you come here!
Harold Lamb: Chrissy, I did everything I could.
Chrissy Giorgio: Don't I know it, you bastard!
Harold Lamb: Chrissy! Don't you remember?
Mr. Giorgio: What the hell is going on up there?
Harold Lamb: Chrissy! I love you!
%
Man in black: No other object has been misidentified as a flying saucer more 
often than the planet Venus.
Roky Crikenson: Really?
Man in black: Even the former leader of your United States of America, James 
Earl Carter Jr., thought he saw a UFO once... But it's been proven he only saw 
the planet Venus.
Roky Crikenson: I'm a republican.
Man in black: Venus was at its peak brilliance last night. You probably thought 
you saw something up in the sky other than Venus, but I assure you, it was 
Venus.
Roky Crikenson: I know... What I saw.
Man in black: Your scientists have yet to discover how neural networks create 
self-consciousness, let alone how the human brain processes two-dimensional 
retinal images into the three-dimensional phenomenon known as perception. Yet 
you somehow brazenly declare seeing is believing? Mister Crikenson, your 
scientific illiteracy makes me shudder, and I wouldn't flaunt your ignorance by 
telling anyone that you saw anything last night other than the planet Venus, 
because if you do, you're a dead man.
Roky Crikenson: You... can't threaten me.
Man in black: I just did.
%
Blaine: (about Scully and Mulder) One of them was disguised as a woman, but 
wasn't pulling it off. Like, her hair was red, but it was a little too red, 
y'know? And the other one, the tall, lanky one, his face was so blank and 
expressionless. He didn't even seem human. I think he was a mandroid.
%
Jose Chung: Aren't you nervous telling me all this? Receiving all those death 
threats?
Blaine: Well, hey, I didn't spend all those years playing Dungeons and Dragons 
and not learn a little something about courage.
%
Jose Chung: And though we may not be alone in the universe, in our own separate 
ways, on this planet we are all alone.
%
[In the posh apartment of a Madame]
Scully: Business is booming.
Mulder: I think you mean banging.
%
Scully: I called him Ahab and he called me Starbuck. So I named my dog 
Queequeg. It's funny, I just realized something.
Mulder: It's a bizarre name for a dog, huh?
Scully: No. How much you're like Ahab. You're so... consumed by your personal 
vengeance against life, whether it be its inherent cruelties or its mysteries, 
that everything takes on a warped significance to your megalomaniacal cosmology.
Mulder: Scully, are you coming on to me?
%
Mulder: Don't lay this off on me, you sneaky son of a bitch, you pulled me into 
this situation because you didn't have the courage to reveal the truth yourself.
X: Feel better now?
Mulder: You're a coward! You work in the shadows, you feed me scraps of 
information, hoping that I can piece it together. You make me risk my life, you 
risk my partner's life and you never risk your own! [Mulder aims and cocks his 
gun at X] You're not walking away from this.
X: You're risking your life right now. You failed. This is your success? 
Killing me? The truth is... you need me, Agent Mulder.
%
[Mulder shoves Cigarette Smoking Man against a wall in a hospital and points a 
gun in his face]
Mulder: You wanna smoke that, or do you wanna smoke on this?
Cigarette Smoking Man: Are you giving me a choice?
Mulder: I should shoot you right here, but they probably would be able to save 
you.
Cigarette Smoking Man: Do it, do it Agent Mulder.
Mulder: Or maybe shoot a bullet through your brain so you'd be bedridden for 
the rest of your life.
Cigarette Smoking Man: How is she?
Mulder: What do you care?
Cigarette Smoking Man: I've known your mother since before you were born, Fox.
%
The Alien Bounty Hunter: Everything dies.
%
Scully: Nothing happens in contradiction to nature, only in contradiction to 
what we know of it. And that's a place to start. That's where the hope is.
%
Scully: (Listing the evidence she's found at the scene while Mulder plays with 
a baseball.) The angle of movement and deeper indentation on the right side of 
the mark suggest a left-handed individual. I've collected soil specimens and 
although numerous shoe impressions remain from the sandlot game, I think a 
couple of stone casts would prove invaluable to the investigation. (Pauses for 
response; he ignores her) Meanwhile, I've quit the FBI and have become a 
spokesperson for the ab-roller.
Mulder: Smell that. (Holds the baseball in front of her nose.) It's perfume. 
God this brings back a lot of memories of my sister... All-day pickup games out 
on the vineyard. Ride your bikes down to the beach, eat bologna sandwiches. 
Only place you had to be on time was home for dinner. Never had to lock your 
doors. No modems, no faxes, no cell phones.
Scully: Mulder, if you had to do without a cell phone for two minutes, you'd 
lapse into catatonic schizophrenia.
Mulder: Scully, you don't know me as well as you think you do. You know I'm a 
working man and I live in a big city, but if I had to settle down? Build a 
home? It'd be in a place like this.
Scully: (Dryly) It'd be like living in Mayberry.
%
Sheriff: This is my deputy, Barney.
Mulder: Fife?!
Barney: (Sighing, frustrated) Pastor!
%
Scully: (Discussing the murdered baby's long list of birth defects) Imagine all 
a woman's hopes and dreams for her child, and for Nature to turn so cruel... 
What must a woman go through?
Mulder: Apparently not much in this case, if she'd just throw it out with the 
trash.
Scully: (Sadly) I- I guess I was just projecting on myself.
Mulder: Why, is there a history of genetic abnormalities in your family?
Scully: No.
Mulder: (Grinning) Well, just find yourself a man with a spotless genetic 
makeup and a really high tolerance for being second-guessed and start pumping 
out the little uber-Scullys.
Scully: (Smiles back) What about your family?
Mulder: Aside from the need for corrective lenses and the tendency to be 
abducted by extraterrestrials involved in an international governmental 
conspiracy, the Mulder family passes genetic muster.
%
Scully: We all have a natural instinct to propagate.
Mulder: Do we?
%
Mulder: Scully. (She stops walking and turns around. He smiles.) I never saw 
you as a mother before.
%
Mrs. Peacock: Right arm was torn off. Saw it sitting there across my dead 
husband's lap. Boys took me home... sewed me up just like the family learnt in 
the War of Northern Aggression. Whole time, felt the same as if been making 
breakfast...They're such good boys.
Scully: Mrs. Peacock, they murdered Sheriff Taylor and his wife. And Deputy 
Pastor.
Mrs. Peacock: I can tell you don't have no children. Maybe one day you'll 
learn... the pride... the love... when you know your boy will do anything for 
his mother.
%
Scully: I think the way it goes here is that Edmund is both the father and 
brother of the other two.
Mulder: Does that mean that when Edmund was a kid, he got to ground his 
brothers for playing with his things?
%
Melissa/Sarah: I am he that liveth and was dead. And behold, I am alive, 
forevermore. (Revelations 1:18) ((Said in a whisper as Mulder and Scully look 
out over a misty field the woman claims her past life died in.))
%
Mulder: At times I almost dream I too have spent a life the sages' way, and 
tread once more familiar paths. Perchance I perished in an arrogant 
self-reliance an age ago. And in that act a prayer for one more chance went up 
so earnest, so... Instinct with better light let in by death that life was 
blotted out not so completely, but scattered, wrecks enough of it to remain dim 
memories, as now, when seems, once more, the goal in sight again. (Robert 
Browning, "Paracelsus") ((Mulder at both the beginning and end of the episode, 
as he looks at aged photographs in the field where he died in a past life, 
remembering that life.))
%
The Cigarette-Smoking Man: Life... is like a box of chocolates. A cheap, 
thoughtless, perfunctory gift that nobody ever asks for. Unreturnable, because 
all you get back is another box of chocolates. So, you're stuck with this 
undefinable whipped-mint crap that you mindlessly wolf down when there's 
nothing else left to eat. Sure, once in a while, there's a peanut butter cup, 
or an English toffee. But they're gone too fast, the taste is fleeting. So you 
end up with nothing but broken bits, filled with hardened jelly and 
teeth-shattering nuts, and if you're desperate enough to eat those, all you've 
got left is a... is an empty box... filled with useless, brown paper wrappers.
%
The Cigarette-Smoking Man: They [the Buffalo Bills] will never win the Super 
Bowl as long as I'm alive.
%
Caller ID: Saddam Hussein Line 2.
The Cigarette-Smoking Man: Call back.
%
Lone Gunman: (About Cigarette Smoking Man, as he listens over the wiretap.) 
He's the most dangerous man alive, not so much because he believes in his 
actions, but because he believes these actions are the only ones life allows 
him.
%
The Cigarette-Smoking Man: I could kill you whenever I please. But not today.
%
Krycek: We gotta get outta here. They’re gonna torture us.
Mulder: How do you know?
Krycek: They questioned me. Trying to get me to confess.
Mulder: To what?
Krycek: To being a spy.
Mulder: (Pins Krycek against the cell wall) What did you tell them?
Krycek: That we were stupid Americans, lost in the woods. Mulder, you’re 
gonna need me in here. Don’t touch me again.
%
Scully: (to Mulder) You said it yourself, once - "a dream is an answer to a 
question we haven't learned how to ask."
%
Scully: Don't you think the car might've been searched at least once already?
Mulder: Not by me.
%
El Camino owner: (Excited) Honest to God? A serial killer owned my car? For 
real?
%
John Lee Roche: (Referring to the number of murders he confessed to) 13 sounds 
more magical.
%
Scully: What are we doing here, Mulder?
Mulder: Did I mention that Mr Betts had no head?
%
Mulder: You check out how he died, I wanna see how he lives.
Scully: (Correcting him) Lived.
Mulder: Lived.
%
Mulder: (Scully wants a desk; Mulder is trying to figure out how to fit it in 
their tiny shared office) We'll put 'em really close together, face to face... 
maybe we could play some BATTLESHIP!
%
Mulder: (Explaining how he knew where to find Scully) I checked where we always 
stay in Philadelphia. I was sure you wouldn't abandon me.
%
Mulder: (Making fun of Scully's new tattoo) I was thinking of having an NY 
tattooed on my ass to commemorate the Yankees' World Series victory.
%
Mulder: (To Scully) Congrats on making a personal appearance in the X-Files for 
the second time!
%
[writing in her journal, to Mulder]
Scully: For the first time, I feel time like a heart beat, the seconds pumping 
in my breast like a reckoning. The numinous mysteries that once seemed so 
distant and unreal threatening clarity in the presence of a truth entertained 
not in youth, but only in its passage. I feel these words as if their meaning 
were weight being lifted from me, knowing that you will read them and share my 
burden as I have come to trust no other. That you should know my heart, look 
into it, finding there the memory and experience that belong to you–that are 
you–is a comfort to me now as I feel the tethers loose and the prospects 
darken for the continuance of a journey that began not so long ago, and which 
began again with a faith shaken and strengthened by your convictions. If not 
for which I might never have been so strong now as I cross to face you and look 
at you, incomplete, hoping that you will forgive me for not making the rest of 
the journey with you.
%
Mulder: I refuse to believe that.
Scully: For all the times that I've said that to you, I am as certain about 
this as you have ever been.
%
Skinner: (About Mulder's tiny office) At least he doesn't take an elevator up 
to get to work.
Cigarette Smoking Man: (Snarky smile) You think I'm the devil?
%
Skinner: You can't ask the truth of a man who trades in lies.
%
Mulder: The truth will save you, Scully. I think it'll save both of us.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: You wish to bargain for Agent Scully's life?
Skinner: (shouting) WHAT WILL IT TAKE?!
%
Skinner: (on the phone with Mulder) There's always another way. [Hangs up; 
camera pans around to reveal Cigarette Smoking Man]
Cigarette Smoking Man: Yes, I think there is. If you're willing to pay the 
price.
%
Mulder: I am hesitant to speculate.
Scully: (rolls eyes)
%
Scully: (to Mulder, sarcastically) You sure know how to make a girl feel 
special on her birthday.
%
Mulder: Does your policy cover the acts of extraterrestrials?
%
Mulder: (About to scuba dive to the bottom of a lake) Once, I got a quarter off 
the deep end at the Y pool!
%
Scully: (looking through Max's trailer) I think you were actually kindred 
spirits in some deep, strange way.
Mulder: What do you mean?
Scully: Men with Spartan lives, simple in their creature comforts, and willing 
to allow for the complexity of their passions.
%
Mulder: More people are trying to get their hands on this than a Tickle-Me-Elmo 
doll.
%
Skinner: Is this man on the plane?
Mulder: I think he got the connecting flight.
%
Scully: I, uh... actually, I was thinking about the- this gift that you gave me 
for my birthday. (takes out the Apollo 11 pendant/keychain and looks at it) You 
never got to tell me why you gave it to me or what it means. But I think I 
know. I think that you appreciate that there are extraordinary men and women 
and extraordinary moments when history leaps forward on the backs of these 
individuals. That what can be imagined can be achieved. That you must dare to 
dream, but that there's no substitute for perseverance and hard work. And 
teamwork, because no one gets there alone. And while we commemorate the 
greatness of these events and the individuals who achieved them, we cannot 
forget the sacrifice of those who make these achievements and leaps possible.
Mulder: ...I just thought it was a pretty cool keychain.
%
Scully: (sarcastically) What else about this interests you? Could it be... 
[reading from magazine cover] "visitors from space?"
%
Scully: Do you know who the father of your baby is?
Amanda: His name is Luke Skywalker. He's what's known as a 'Jedi knight.'
Scully: ...did he have a lightsaber?
Amanda: No, he didn't bring it. He did sing a song for me though. (sings "Star 
Wars" theme)
Scully: How many times have you seen "Star Wars," Amanda?
Amanda: 368. I should break 400 by Memorial Day.
%
Mulder: Take your best shot, Scully, but I think there's more going on here 
than Luke Skywalker and his lightsaber.
%
Mulder: How would this happen?
Scully: The birds and the bees and the monkey babies, Mulder.
%
[Mr and Mrs Neiman, parents of one of the "monkey babies," are arguing as they 
head toward their doctor's office.]
Mrs Neiman: We're going to find the best lawyer we can, because I definitely 
plan to sue, that's all I'm saying, Fred!
Mr Neiman: Baboo, look, just let me do the talking, all right? [Mulder and 
Scully join the couple in walking toward the doctor's office entrance.]
Mrs Neiman: Just tell him we're gonna sue!
Mr Neiman: (to Mulder and Scully) Oh, you too, huh? [They exchange a confused 
look.]
%
Mulder: I have a theory. Do you wanna hear it?
Scully: Van Blundht somehow physically transformed into his captor and walked 
out the door, leaving no one the wiser?
Mulder: (pleased) Scully, should we be picking out china patterns or what?
%
Scully: So what are you saying, that Van Blundht's an alien?
Mulder: (grinning) Not unless they have trailer parks in space.
%
Mulder: Hey Scully, if you could be somebody else for a day, who would it be?
Scully: Hopefully myself.
Mulder: So boring! I mean, wouldn't you be tempted to try on somebody else's 
existence for a day, live your life as somebody else?
Scully: Looking like someone else, Mulder, and being someone else are 
completely different things.
Mulder: Well maybe it's not. I mean, everybody else around you would treat you 
like you were somebody else. I mean, ultimately, maybe it's other people's 
reactions to us who make us who we are.
Scully: (pauses for a while as they walk, thinking) All right then. Eleanor 
Roosevelt.
Mulder: (regretful) Ay. Can't be a dead person.
Scully: (slightly annoyed) Why the hell not?
Mulder: (as if it is a perfectly acceptable explanation) Because.
%
Mulder: (a decaying body just fell out of the ceiling) You think the fall 
killed him?
%
Eddie Van Blundht: (annoyed, looking at Mulder's "I Want To Believe" poster in 
his office, as Mulder) Good night! This is where my tax dollars go?!
%
Eddie Van Blundht: [As Mulder, walks in to Mulder's apartment and looks around] 
Where the hell do I sleep?!
%
Eddie Van Blundht: [To himself, as Mulder, looking in the mirror. Holds up FBI 
badge, practicing.] FBI. (slowly, exaggerated) F. ... B. ... I. FBI. (puts 
badge away; dramatically) You lookin' at me? There ain't nobody else here, you 
must be lookin' at me. You want a piece of this? (practices getting out his gun 
quickly; drops the clip as he does so; awkwardly puts it away again; sighs) 
You're a damn good lookin' man.
%
Scully: (pouring them each a glass of wine) Seriously, Mulder, what's going on? 
Are you okay?
Eddie Van Blundht: (as Mulder) Just kind of... knockin around. Just thinking. 
We never really, uh, talk, do we?
Scully: Well- what do you mean? Really talk? No, no we don't, Mulder.
Eddie Van Blundht: Well, what's stopping us?
[She pauses for a moment, as if considering. Scene cuts to the two of them 
drinking the last of the bottle of wine.]
Scully: So there we are, at 2 o'clock in the morning, me in my taffeta dress, 
and Marcus, wherever the hell he was, he was wearing a, uh, a tux. It had a... 
kelly green cumberbund on it. Anyway, so, I know that Marcus is thinking that 
it's now or never, and I'm thinking...
Eddie Van Blundht: (smiling) What are you thinking?
Scully: I'm thinking, "What is that siren I hear getting louder?"
Eddie Van Blundht: No way! Who called the cops?
Scully: Well it wasn't the cops, it was the fire department - my friend Silvia 
and her idiot prom date-
Eddie Van Blundht: Burwood?!
Scully: -had built this campfire that went totally out of control and so we all 
had to ride back on the, um... what do you call it, the, um- the pumper truck! 
("Mulder" laughs) Marcus was the 12th grade love of my life. (Starts to take a 
sip of wine, then starts laughing) I can't believe I'm telling you this.
Eddie Van Blundht: I can't believe you haven't told me before.
Scully: Now I'm seeing a whole new side of you, Mulder.
Eddie Van Blundht: (hopeful) Is that a good thing?
Scully: I like it.
Eddie Van Blundht: Do you ever wish things were different?
Scully: What do you mean?
Eddie Van Blundht: The person you wanted to be when you grew up when you were 
in high school. How far off from that did you end up?
Scully: Career wise? Miles off target.
Eddie Van Blundht: No no, not just that. Do you ever wish... that you could go 
back and do it all differently?
Scully: (curious) Do you?
[Looks at her silently, scoots closer to her on the couch, then leans in close 
enough to kiss her. When he's about an inch from her lips, Scully closes her 
eyes, then the door is thrown open by the real Mulder. Scully makes a disgusted 
noise and pushes Van Blundht away; he sighs and turns back into himself. Scully 
looks horrified, he shrugs apologetically.]
%
Scully: I don't imagine you need to be told this, Mulder, but you're not a 
loser.
Mulder: Yeah, but I'm no Eddie Van Blundht either, am I.
%
Skinner: I have handled this like I've handled everything else you've asked me 
to do.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: You're in no position to question the terms of our 
arrangement.
Skinner: Then we have no arrangement.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: A man digs a hole, he has to fall into it.
%
Skinner: (to Cigarette Smoking Man) If anything happens to her, I will expose 
you! I don't care what happens to me!
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: Only yesterday you said you wouldn't be party to murder, 
and now, here you are.
%
Scully: (talking to her psychiatrist about Mulder) I guess I never realized how 
much I rely on him before this. His passion... he's been a great source of 
strength that I've drawn on.
%
Scully: Although cleared of any wrongdoing in the deaths of Amy and David 
Cassandra, Agent Mulder still has no recollection of the events that lead to 
their deaths. His seizures have subsided, with no evidence of permanent 
cerebral damage, but I am concerned this experience will have a lasting effect. 
Agent Mulder undertook this treatment hoping to lay claim to his past, that by 
retrieving memories lost to him he might finally understand the path he's on. 
But if that knowledge remains elusive, and if it's only by knowing where he's 
been that he can hope to understand where he's going, then I fear Agent Mulder 
may lose his course. And the truths he's seeking from his childhood will 
continue to evade him, driving him more dangerously forward in impossible 
pursuit.
%
Scully: Four years ago, Section Chief Blevins assigned me to a project you all 
know as the X Files. As I am a medical doctor with a background in hard 
science, my job was to provide an analytical perspective on the work of Special 
Agent Fox Mulder, whose investigations into the paranormal were fueled by a 
personal belief that his sister had been abducted by aliens when he was 12. I 
come here today, four years later, to report on the illegitimacy of Agent 
Mulder's work. That it is my scientific opinion that he became over the course 
of these years a victim. A victim of his own false hopes and of his belief in 
the biggest of lies.
%
Scully: Mulder, everything this man [Kritschgau] described...you can't just 
guess at these details. I'm sorry, but the facts here completely overwhelm any 
argument against them!
Mulder: Facts overwhelmed by the lies created to support them!
Scully: Mulder, the only lie here is the one that you continue to believe.
Mulder: After all I've seen and experienced, I refuse to believe that it's NOT 
true!
Scully: Because it's easier to believe the lie. Isn't it?
%
Scully: Early this morning, I got a call from the police asking me to come to 
Agent Mulder's apartment. The detective asked me...he needed me to identify a 
body...
Section Chief Blevins: Agent Scully...
Scully: Agent Mulder died... late last night... from an apparent self-inflicted 
gunshot wound to the head.
%
Mulder: Level Four. That means I get to dine at the Officer's Club?
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: (angrily) I created Mulder!
Fat Man: Agent Mulder is dead. Our FBI source confirmed it this morning. Mulder 
killed himself.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: I never underestimated Mulder. I still don't.
%
Scully: The very existence of this cure would mean with certainty that I had 
believed in a lie from the start.
%
Scully: It's got to happen. Everything in my life depends on it.
%
Skinner: (to Scully) Yes, I am afraid. But I'm only afraid for you.
%
Skinner: When you compound the lies, you compound the consequences.
Scully: All lies lead to the truth.
%
Skinner: Silence won't save you. If you lie, I don't know if anything can.
Scully: Except the truth.
%
Mulder: I was depending on Scully to tell her story, to weave her tale, to make 
them believe the lie.
%
Skinner: Agent Mulder...Where you going?
Mulder: I.C.U.
Skinner: You're moving pretty good for a dead man.
Mulder: No, I'm only half-dead.
%
Mulder: Please tell me you're here with severe chest pains.
Cigarette Smoking Man: I'm here tonight as a friend, Agent Mulder.
%
Scully: Why'd you come here if you'd already made up your mind?
Mulder: (smiling) Because I knew you'd talk me out of it if you thought I'd 
made a mistake.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: But I've come today not to ask, but to offer. To offer 
you the truths that you so desperately sought - about the project, about the 
men who conspired to protect it...
Mulder: I know the truth.
Cigarette Smoking Man: Do you?
Mulder: I spoke to one of your men.
Cigarette Smoking Man: How do you know he's not a liar?
Mulder: I've seen enough to know he's not a liar, yeah.
Cigarette Smoking Man: You've seen but scant pieces of the whole.
Mulder: What more can you show me?
Cigarette Smoking Man: This man you spoke to - Michael Kritschgau. He's 
deceived you with beautiful lies. He's told you that everything you ever 
believed about the existence of extraterrestrial life is untrue.
Mulder: (nods) What are you saying?
Cigarette Smoking Man: As I said, I'm offering you the chance to know the truth.
Mulder: In exchange for what?
Cigarette Smoking Man: Quit the FBI. Come work for me. You can make your 
problems go away.
Mulder: (pauses) No deal.
Cigarette Smoking Man: (smiles) After all I've given you?
Mulder: (in disbelief) What have- What have you given me? The claim of a cure 
for Scully? Is she cured? You show me my sister only to take her right back? 
You've given me nothing.
Cigarette Smoking Man: I intend to keep my promises. I just need something from 
you.
Mulder: You murdered my father. You killed Scully's sister. And if Scully dies, 
I will kill you. I don't care whose father you are, I will put you down.
Cigarette Smoking Man: Well you're certainly capable, so I've been told. I 
understand you have a hearing tomorrow, where you'll have to testify to these 
murderous impulses of yours. [Mulder walks away] When you reconsider, the offer 
still stands.
%
Bill Scully: You really believe this crap, don't you?
Mulder: Yes, I do.
Bill Scully: You see, she's your big defender, but...I think the truth is, she 
just doesn't wanna disappoint you.
Mulder: Well, if it works, I don't care what you think she thinks.
Bill Scully: You're a real piece of work, you know that, Mr. Mulder?
Mulder: Why is that? Because I don't think the way you think? Because I won't 
just sit passively back and watch the family tragedy unfold?
Bill Scully: You're the reason for it. And I've already lost one sister to this 
quest you're on. Now I'm losing another. Has it been worth it? To you, I mean. 
Have you found what you've been looking for?
Mulder: No.
Bill Scully: No. You know how that makes me feel?
Mulder: In a way, I think I do. I lost someone very close to me--I lost a 
sister...I lost my father--all because of this thing I'm looking for.
Bill Scully: This what? Little green aliens?
Mulder: Yeah. Little green aliens.
Bill Scully: You're one sorry son of a bitch. Not a whole lot more to say. 
(leaves)
Mulder: (after his phone rings) One sorry son of a bitch speaking.
%
Mulder: Four years ago, while working on an assignment outside the FBI 
mainstream I was paired with Special Agent Dana Scully who I believe was sent 
to spy on me. To debunk my investigations into the paranormal. That Agent 
Scully did not follow these orders is a testament to her integrity as an 
investigator, a scientist, and a human being. She has paid dearly for this 
integrity.
Section Chief Scott Blevins: Agent Mulder, Agent Scully lied straightfaced to 
this panel about your death.
Mulder: She lied because I asked her to. Because I had evidence of a 
conspiracy, a conspiracy against the American people.
Senior Agent: We've already heard testimony to these allegations Agent Mulder.
Mulder: AND a conspiracy intended to destroy the lives of those who would 
reveal its true purpose. To conduct experiments on unwitting victims to further 
a secret agenda for someone within the government operating at levels without 
restraint or responsibility, without morals or conscience. Men who pretend to 
honor as they deceive, the price of this betrayal the lives and reputations of 
those deceived. Agent Scully...is lying in a hospital bed right now, diagnosed 
with terminal cancer. A victim of these same tests, conducted without her 
knowledge or consent. By these same men, who as they try to cover their tracks, 
who suborne and persecute the same people they have used in their plot, I will 
NOW call by name.
Senior Agent: Agent Mulder did you, or did you not shoot the man found dead in 
your apartment?
Mulder: I will answer that question, Sir.
Section Chief Scott Blevins: Did you shoot Scott Ostlehoff? Employee of the 
Department of Defense?
Mulder: I will answer that question, Sir.
Senior Agent: Answer the question asked, Agent Mulder!
Mulder: I will answer the question after I name the man!
Section Chief Scott Blevins: AGENT MULDER!
Mulder:I will answer that question after I name the man who's responsible for 
Agent Scully! The same man who directed that my apartment be surveilled by the 
DoD. A man I want to see prosecuted for his crimes! Who's sitting in this very 
room as I speak!
Senior Agent: Agent Mulder, the Section Chief has asked you a question you are 
going to answer!
Mulder: I can't do that, sir!
Senior Agent: You can and you will!
Mulder: I can't do that, sir...because the Section Chief is the man I'm about 
to name!
%
[Mulder is sitting on a chair in the hospital. Skinner approaches and sits next 
to him.]
Skinner: The Smoking Man's dead.
Mulder: How?
Skinner: Shot through his window. [Hands Mulder a photo of young Mulder and 
Samantha] Forensics found it at the scene. We're assuming it's his blood.
Mulder: Assuming?
Skinner: Well no body was found, though there was too much blood lost for 
anyone to have survived. (sighs) This afternoon when you named Blevins... how 
did you know?
Mulder: I didn't. I just guessed.
Skinner: Well it was a hell of a guess. Blevins had been on payroll for four 
years to a biotechnology company called Roush, which is somehow connected to 
all this.
Mulder: Well, I'm sure whatever connections there were, they're being erased 
right now.
Skinner: They're cleaning up, taking everything away.
Mulder: Not everything. Scully's cancer's gone into remission.
Skinner: (looks shocked) That's unbelievable news.
Mulder: (grins) It's the best news I could have ever heard.
Skinner: What turned it around?
Mulder: I don't know. I don't think we'll ever know.
Skinner: Can I see her?
Mulder: Yeah, she's in there with her family right now, but I'm sure she'd love 
to see you.
[Skinner heads in to her room, where Scully and her family are waiting. She 
smiles at him. He enters and shuts the door; Mulder sits outside staring at the 
picture of himself and Samantha and begins to cry.]
%
Frohike: (to Langly) With that long blonde hair, you'll be the first one in 
here who gets traded for cigarettes, and I'm gonna be laughing my ass off.
%
Frohike: Me and the narc have a proposition for you.
Langly: What proposition?
Frohike: The coolest hack in the world.
Langly: [smiles] Say it. [Frohike hesitates] Say it...
Frohike: [grudgingly] ...Your kung fu is the best.
%
Langly: Last week, I got into the Maryland DMV to change my endorsements so I 
could handicap park.
%
Lieutenant: Here's a tip - aluminum foil makes a lovely hat, and it blocks out 
the government's mind control rays. Keep you guys outta trouble.
%
Agent Kinsley: Last year was something of a personal revelation. We were doing 
an exercise called "Team Builders," where we were given two minutes to build a 
tower out of ordinary office furniture.
Agent Stonecypher: When I stood on Mike's shoulders and I put that electric 
pencil sharpener on top of the pile, we both knew - we could never have done it 
alone.
Mulder: (leaning over to Scully, whispering) Kill me now.
Agent Kinsley: You ever been to one of these team seminars, Agent Scully?
Scully: Um... I think I went to a constructive problem-solving course when I 
first joined the bureau.
Agent Stonecypher: Oh did you play that game where you can't use any negative 
words?
Agent Kinsley: I couldn't believe how hard it was not to use the word "but!"
Mulder: (falsely enthusiastic) I'm having that same problem right now!
Agent Stonecypher: Have you ever been to a team seminar, Agent Mulder?
Mulder: (grinning at Scully) No. You know, unfortunately around this time of 
year, I always develop a severe hemorrhoidal condition.
Agent Kinsley: Well, it builds muscles you didn't even know you had.
Agent Stonecypher: Communication. That's the key.
[A police officer waves them down and the car stops.]
Officer: Sorry folks, it'll be a few minutes.
Agent Kinsley: What's going on?
Officer: Got a little situation, that's all.
Mulder: (opens the car door and bolts) Thank you, Jesus.
Agent Kinsley: [The three left in the car watch as Mulder walks off] Where's he 
goin'?
%
Scully: [Approaches Mulder in the woods as Michele Fazekas walks away] Mulder? 
We've got this conference. They're waiting.
Mulder: Yeah. How do I say this without using any negative words, Scully?
Scully: You want me to tell them that you're not gonna make it to this year's 
teamwork seminar.
Mulder: See? [Puts his hands on her arms and grins.] We don't need that 
conference! We have communication like that unspoken! You know what I'm 
thinking!
Scully: [Smiles and shakes her head]
%
[Mulder is on his computer when there's a knock on the door.]
Mulder: It's open.
[Scully enters with a tray with a bottle of wine, two glasses, and some cheese]
Mulder: Who cut the cheese?
Scully: (rolls eyes, explains) Since you won't be making it to the conference.
Mulder: Mmm! Par-tay!
Scully: However, I must remind you that this goes against the bureau's policy 
of male and female agents consorting in the same motel room while on assignment.
Mulder: Try any of that "Tailhook" crap on me, Scully, I'll kick your ass.
%
Scully: Where are you going?
Mulder: I've gotta check something out.
Scully: You know, Mulder, sometimes I think some work on your communication 
skills wouldn't be such a bad idea.
Mulder: I'll be back soon, and we can build a tower of furniture. (grins) Okay?
[Scully shakes her head, smiles and drinks her wine]
%
Mulder: (about whatever monster is lurking in the forest) Maybe it can regulate 
its temperature. You don't know of any animal that can?
Scully: Ticks. I've heard they can halt their metabolism for up to 18 years, 
essentially going in to suspended animation until something warm-blooded comes 
along.
Mulder: That's interesting.
Scully: Why is that interesting?
Mulder: Thirty years ago, the town of Point Pleasant, West Virginia, was 
terrorized for over a year by something. Killing livestock, terrorizing the 
people. Witnesses described them as primitive-looking men with red, piercing 
eyes. Became known as the "Moth Men." I've got an X-File dating back to 1952 on 
it.
Scully: (dryly) What would that be filed next to? "The Cockroach that Ate 
Cincinnati?"
Mulder: No, "The Cockroach that Ate Cincinnati" is in the "C"s. Moth Men's over 
in the "M"s.
%
Scully: (trying to start a fire with stones) You were an Indian guide. Help me 
out here.
Mulder: (leaning against a log, as he's been injured) Indian guide says maybe 
you should run to the store and get some matches.
Scully: I would, but I left my wallet in the car. [Sits next to him, gets out 
her gun]
Mulder: What are you doing?
Scully: Trying to open my gun. [Takes the clip out] If I can separate the shell 
from the casing, maybe I can get the powder to ignite.
Mulder: Mm. And maybe it'll start raining weenies and marshmallows.
Scully: Do I detect a hint of negativity?
Mulder: No! Yes, actually. Yeah.
Scully: Mulder, you need to keep warm. Your body's still in shock.
Mulder: I was told once that the best way to regenerate body heat is to crawl 
naked into a sleeping bag with somebody else who was already naked. (scoots 
closer to her)
Scully: (grinning) Maybe if it rained sleeping bags, you'll get lucky. [Mulder 
looks up at Scully in surprise; she continues working on getting the bullet 
apart.] You ever thought seriously about dying?
Mulder: Yeah, once, when I was at the Ice Capades.
Scully: [Gives him a look, then goes back to the bullet.] When I was fighting 
my cancer, I was angry at the injustice of it, and its meaninglessness. Then I 
realized that that was a struggle - to give it meaning, to make sense of it. 
It's like life.
Mulder: I think nature is supremely indifferent to whether we live or die. I 
mean, if you're lucky, you get 75 years, if you're really lucky you get 80 
years, and if you're extraordinarily lucky, you get to live 50 of those years 
with a decent head of hair.
Scully: (chuckles) I guess it's like Las Vegas. The house always wins. [The 
bullet suddenly pops open.] Oh! (sings) Ta-da!
Mulder: Go girl! [Scully gets up to pour the gunpowder from the bullet into the 
makeshift campfire.] Hey, who did you identify with when you were a kid - Wilma 
or Betty?
Scully: I identified with Betty's bustline.
Mulder: Yes! I did too.
Scully: I could never have been married to Barney though. The kids were cute.
Mulder: Yeah. But where are they today?
Scully: [Uses the rocks to strike a spark into the gunpowder, which instantly 
burns up and doesn't light the sticks. Looks at Mulder.] Moth Men? Really?
Mulder: Yeah. But there seem to be only two of 'em. [Scully sighs and goes back 
to sit next to Mulder, then puts an arm around his shoulder and starts pulling 
him closer.] I don't wanna wrestle!
Scully: (laughs) Get over here. I'm gonna try and keep you warm. [She pulls him 
over so he's curled up on her lap, her arms around him.] Sorry.
Mulder: One of us has got to stay awake, Scully.
Scully: You sleep, Mulder.
Mulder: If you get tired, you wake me.
Scully: I'm not gonna get tired.
Mulder: Why don't you sing something?
Scully: (firmly) No, Mulder.
Mulder: If you sing something, I'll know you're awake.
Scully: Mulder, you don't want me to sing. I can't carry a tune.
Mulder: It doesn't matter. Just sing anything.
Scully: (sighs; sings, out of tune) Jeremiah was a bullfrog, was a good friend 
of mine. Never understood a single word he said, but I helped him drink his 
wine.
Mulder: Chorus.
Scully: (continues singing) Joy... to the world. All the boys and girls. Joy to 
the fishes in the deep blue sea. Joy to you and me.
%
Scully: Why are you humoring them, Mulder?
Mulder: I'm not humoring them, Scully. This is a very serious crime.
Scully: So is perjury. So is calling out FBI. agents under false pretenses.
Mulder: For the purpose of what?
Scully: Isn't it obvious? I think what we're seeing here is an example of a 
culture for whom daytime talk shows and tabloid headlines have become a reality 
against which they measure their lives. A culture so obsessed by the media and 
a chance for self-dramatization that they'll do anything in order to gain a 
spotlight.
Mulder: I am alarmed that you would reduce these people to a cultural 
stereotype. Not everybody's dream is to get on Jerry Springer.
Scully: Psychologists often speak of the denial of an unthinkable evil or a 
misplacement of shared fears, anxieties taking the form of a hideous monster 
for whom the most horrific human attributes can be ascribed. What we can't 
possibly imagine ourselves capable of we can blame of the ogre, on the 
hunchback, on the lowly half-breed. Common sense alone will tell you that these 
legends, these unverified rumors, are ridiculous.
Mulder: But nonetheless, unverifiable and, therefore, true in the sense that 
they're believed to be true.
Scully: Is there anything that you don't believe in, Mulder?
%
Scully: It begins where it ends...in nothingness. A nightmare born from deepest 
fears, coming to me unguarded...whispering images unlocked from time and 
distance. A soul unbound - touched by others but never held. On a course 
charted by some unseen hand. The journey ahead promising no more than my past 
reflecting back upon me. Until at last, I reach the end, facing a truth I can 
no longer deny. Alone, as ever.
%
Physical therapist: That gunshot wound did a hell of a lot of damage. (looks at 
Mulder, realizing) ...you're the officer that shot him.
%
Mulder: [Looking around at room covered in painted kanji symbols.] I'm gonna 
take a wild stab here and guess this is a clue.
%
Mulder: Scully, just trace the call and cut off any access that woman has to a 
phone! I'm heading back now.
Scully: Mulder, I'm not at the safe house.
Mulder: You're not?
Scully: We're at the Chaimbridge Mall investigating a suicide.
Mulder: (frustrated) Why isn't anybody picking up at the safehouse switchboard?!
Scully: (sighs and hangs up; turns to US Marshalls) Back in the trucks.
%
Mulder: What happened?!
Skinner: (sigh) You were told to go home, Mulder.
Mulder: WHAT. HAPPENED?!
%
Scully: (sarcastically) That's one hell of a plan, Mulder. The serial killer 
makes us believe that he's guilty, in turn diverting suspicion away from the 
real estate lady?
%
Skinner: Mulder, a moment please? [Mulder pauses, turns around; Skinner 
approaches.] I just wanted to say you did a good job.
Mulder: How's that?
Skinner: Nobody could've figured this out but you. You knew it was Linda Bowman 
and not Modell. You were way ahead of me.
Mulder: I almost killed my partner.
Skinner: Mulder, despite that, you prevailed. You won her game.
Mulder: How come I feel like I lost?
%
Mulder: (about man who died after swallowing 12 pounds of mud; smiling) Is it 
possible that he took the term "mud pie" literally?
%
Scully: His mother said that Bobby can't make friends. He's been in therapy for 
his anger since 1995.
Mulder: (grin) That could be me.
%
[Mulder comes in carrying a plastic evidence bag.]
Bobby: What is that?
Mulder: (points to word "Evidence" clearly written on the bag) Evidence.
%
Mulder: (as he climbs a tree) Hey, Scully, is this demonstration of boyish 
agility turning you on at all?
%
Mulder: I don't think this was an act of grave robbing, Scully.
Scully: No, that's what we were doing.
%
Mulder: Maybe you don't know what you're looking for.
Scully: Like evidence of conjury or the black arts or shamanism, divination, 
Wicca or any kind of pagan or neo-pagan practice. Charms, cards, familiars, 
bloodstones, or hex signs or any of the ritual tableaux associated with the 
occult, Santeria, Voudoun, Macumba, or any high or low magic?
Mulder: Scully?
Scully: Yes?
Mulder: Marry me.
Scully: I was hoping for something a little more helpful.
%
Scully: (objecting as Mulder starts using a laptop taken from a crime scene) 
Mulder, that's evidence!
Mulder: Gee, I hope so.
%
Scully: (chasing after him) Mulder?
Mulder: [moves the lips on the boy he just staked to reveal vampire fangs] Look 
at that! Eh? [Scully taps the fangs to show that they're just plastic. Mulder 
looks horrified.] Oh sh- [Credits roll.]
%
Scully: Skinner wants a report in one hour. What are you going to tell him?
Mulder: What do you mean what am I gonna tell him? I'm gonna tell him exactly 
what I saw. What are you gonna tell him?
Scully: I'll tell him exactly what I saw.
Mulder: Now, how is that different? Look, Scully, I'm the one who may wind up 
going to prison here. I gotta know if you're gonna back me up or what.
Scully: (annoyed) First of all, if the family of Ronnie Strickland does indeed 
decide to sue the FBI for, I think the figure is $446 million, then you and I 
both will most certainly be co-defendants. And second of all... I don't even 
have a second of all, Mulder! 446 million dollars! I'm in this as deep as you 
are, and I'm not even the one that overreacted! I didn't do the [stabbing 
motion] with the thing!
Mulder: I did not overreact. Ronnie Strickland was a vampire!
Scully: Where's your proof?
Mulder: You're my proof! You were there!
[Scully sighs]
Mulder: Okay, now you're scaring me. I want to hear exactly what you're going 
to tell Skinner.
Scully: Oh, you want our stories straight.
Mulder: No, no, no. I didn't say that. I just want to hear it the way you saw 
it.
Scully: I don't feel comfortable with that.
Mulder: Prison, Scully. Your cell mate's nickname is going to be Large Marge. 
She's going to read a lot of Gertrude Stein.
%
Scully: Yesterday morning, when I arrived at work, you were... 
characterstically exuberant.
Mulder: (slams tickets down on the desk excitedly) Hope you brought your cowboy 
boots!
Scully: You want us to go to Dallas?
Mulder: Yee-haw! Actually a town called Cheney, about 50 miles south of there. 
Population: 361. By all accounts, very rustic and charming. But as of late, 
ground zero, the locus for a series of mysterious nocturnal exsanguinations.
Scully: Exsanguinations? Of whom?
Mulder: [Flashes a slide of a dead cow.] How does that grab ya?
Scully: It's a-
Mulder: Dead cow! Exactly. Or more specifically, a dead 900 pound Holstein. Its 
body completely drained of blood, as was this one, (flashes slides) this one, 
this one, this one, and so on. Six, all in all, approximately one a week over 
the past six weeks.
Scully: Is there any sign of-
Mulder: Two small puncture wounds on the neck?
Scully: That's not what I was gonna ask.
Mulder: (excitedly) Too bad! We got em! Check it out. (flashes slide)
Scully: Well, these may be syringe marks, their placement meant to emulate 
fangs. Such ritualistic bloodletting points towards cultists of some sort, in 
which case- what?
Mulder: (laughing) Yeah, that's probably it. Satanic cultists. Come on, Scully!
Scully: You're not gonna tell me this is that Mexican goat sucker.
Mulder: El Chupacabra? No, they've got four fangs, not two. And they suck 
goats, hence the name.
Scully: So instead this would be...?
Mulder: Classic vampirism.
Scully: Of a bunch of cows?
Mulder: And one dead human! Last night - a vacationer from New Jersey- come on, 
we gotta go. [Grabs his coat and runs off]
Scully: Why the hell didn't you tell me that from the beginning?!
Mulder: (from offscreen) Lock the door on your way out!
Scully: (sighs)
%
Scully: It was there that we were met by a representative of local law 
enforcement, Sheriff-
Sheriff Lucius Hartwell: Lucius Hartwell. You the FBI agents?
Scully: Yes, I'm-
Mulder: Agents Mulder and, uh... (snaps fingers, trying to remember) Scully. 
What do you say we go take a look at your victim?
Sheriff Lucius Hartwell: Yeah, by all means. After you.
Mulder: Come on, Scully, get those little legs movin! Come on!
%
Mulder: (looking at the tourist's ugly shirt, sarcastically) Nice threads!
%
Mulder: (pulling on dead man's collar to reveal two apparent bite marks) Your 
Satanic cultists have some sharp little teeth.
Sheriff Lucius Hartwell: What satanic cultists?
Mulder: Go ahead, tell him your, heh, (makes quotation marks in the air, 
mockingly) "theory."
%
Sheriff Lucius Hartwell: You really know your stuff, Dana.
Mulder: (disbelief) Dana?! [Cuts back to Mulder's office; he laughs] He never 
even knew your first name!
Scully: (embarrassed) You gonna interrupt me, or what?
Mulder: No, go ahead. (grinning) Dana.
%
Mulder: [Investigating a body] Have you noticed that this man's shoes are 
untied?
Scully: Mulder, what's your point?
Mulder: This means something... Sheriff, do you have an old cemetery in town, 
off the beaten path, the creepier the better?
Sheriff Lucius Hartwell: Uh, yeah.
Mulder: (snaps his fingers at him) Take me there now! Scully, we're gonna need 
a complete autopsy on this man, the sooner the better.
Scully: Whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa! What am I even looking for?
Mulder: (puts his hands on her shoulders; looks at her intently) I don't know. 
(walks off)
Scully: (looks at the sheriff, who seems confused; tries to explain) He does 
that.
%
Scully: [speaking into a tape recorder] 4:54 p.m. begin autopsy on one white 
male, age 60, who is arguably having a worse time in Texas than I am...although 
not by much.
[She picks up the scalpel provided to her and the blade falls off]
Scully: Yee-haw.
%
Scully: But I just put money in the "magic fingers"!
Mulder: [hops on bed] I won't let it go to waste!
%
Mulder: Yesterday morning began like any other morning. You arrived at the 
office characteristically less than exuberant. [Cuts to Mulder putting plane 
tickets on the desk, speaking quietly and calmly] I hope you brought your 
cowboy boots.
Scully: (whiny) Why are we going to Dallas?
%
Mulder: But as always, I-I'm very eager to hear your opinion.
Scully: (annoyed) Well, it's obviously not a vampire.
Mulder: Well why not?
Scully: (like it should be obvious) Because they don't exist?
Mulder: Well, that's one opinion and I respect that.
%
Scully: (objecting) He had big buck teeth?
Mulder: He had a slight overbite
Scully: And that's significant? How?
Mulder: I was just trying to be thorough!
%
Sheriff Hartwell: Yeah. Okay. Uh... what she said, that's what I'm thinking, 
and, uh... Yeah.
%
Mulder: Historically, cemeteries were thought to be a haven for vampires, as 
are castles, catacombs and swamps, but unfortunately, you don't have any of 
those.
Sheriff Hartwell: We used to have swamps, only the EPA made us take to calling 
'em "wetlands."
%
Mulder: Anyway, skipping ahead...
Scully: Why skipping ahead? (no response) Mulder... you shot out the tires, 
what then?
Mulder: Well, here's something you may not know - shooting out the tires on a 
runaway RV is a lot harder than it looks. I then tried a different approach. 
[Cuts to Mulder being dragged behind the RV as he attempts to hold on to it, 
screaming loudly]
%
Mulder: (voiceover) Tired, frustrated, and lacking a solid lead, I just wanted 
to get cleaned up. I had the sheriff drop me at the motel, which is where I ran 
into you.
Scully: (sitting on the vibrating bed, yelling at Mulder) What do you mean you 
want me to do another autopsy?! Why do I have to do it now?! I just spent hours 
on my feet doing an autopsy, all for you! I do it all for you, Mulder! You know 
I haven't eaten since 6 o'clock this morning, and that was half a cream cheese 
bagel. And it wasn't even real cream cheese, it was light cream cheese! Now you 
want me to run off and do another autopsy?! (finally notices how beaten up he 
looks) What the hell happened to you?
Mulder: (voiceover) Finally you left.
Scully: (leaving the motel room) Don't you touch that bed!
%
[Mulder throws his sunflower seeds at Ronnie, which forces him to pick them up] 
Oh man! What'd you have to go and do that for?! You are in big trouble.
%
(Scully finds Mulder barely conscious in their hotel room)
Mulder: Who's the black private dick that's a sex machine to all the chicks? 
Shaft!
(outside Skinner's office, as he reacts to Scully's version of the story)
Mulder: I did not!
%
Scully: You're saying that I actually hit him two times.
Mulder: Square in the chest. No effect.
Scully: ...and then he sort of flew at me like a flying squirrel.
Mulder: I don't think I'd use the phrase "flying squirrel" when I talk to 
Skinner, but... yeah, that's what happened.
%
Coroner: Probable cause of death... [looking at Ronnie Strickland's body with a 
stake through the heart] Gee, that's a tough one.
%
[Mulder and Scully are awaiting outside Skinner's office]
Scully: Mulder, please just keep reminding him you were drugged.
Mulder: Would you stop that?
Scully: It wouldn't hurt.
Mulder: Stop it.
[Skinner sticks his head out of his office]
Skinner: Scully, Mulder-
[Mulder jumps to his feet]
Mulder: I was drugged!
%
Walter Skinner: Ronnie Strickland's body has gone missing from the morgue; in 
conjunction with this the coroner's been attacked. His throat was bitten.
Scully: The coroner's dead?
Skinner: [uncomfortably] No... his throat was... bitten. It was sort of... 
gnawed on. (Mulder and Scully exchange a look) Daylight's burning, agents.
Scully: [bewildered] But... he was dead!
Mulder: [bemused] I noticed that.
Scully: He had a stake through his heart!
Mulder: I noticed that too.
%
Scully: Mulder, he had fake fangs. Why would a real vampire need fake fangs? I 
mean, for the sake of argument?
Mulder: Fangs are very rarely mentioned in the literature; they're more or less 
an invention of Bram Stoker's. I think you were right before when you said this 
was about a guy who's watched too many Dracula movies. It's just that he 
happens to be a real vampire.
%
Mulder: (to the sheriff) You can stay behind here with Agent Scully and keep an 
eye on things where I go check something out. (to Scully, with a bad southern 
accent) Don't say I never did nothin' for ye!
%
Sheriff Lucius Hartwell: He's just not who we are anymore. I mean we pay taxes, 
we're good neighbors. Old Ronnie... he just can't seem to grasp the concept of 
low profile. But, though he may be a moron, he is one of our own.
%
Skinner: So that's it. They simply disappeared without a trace. And that's 
exactly what happened from start to finish.
Scully: Well I can neither confirm nor deny Agent Mulder's version of events 
which occurred outside my presence.
Mulder: And I can neither confirm nor deny Agent Scully's version of events, 
but, uh...
Scully: Anyway... I was drugged.
Mulder: That is, essentially exactly the way it happened.
Scully: Essentially.
Mulder: Except for the part about the buck teeth.
%
Mulder: Before the exploration of space, of the moon and the planets, man held 
that the heavens were the home and province of powerful gods, who controlled 
not just the vast firmament but the earthly fate of man himself, and that the 
pantheon of powerful warring deities was the cause and reason for the human 
condition, for the past and future, and for which great monuments would be 
created, on earth as in heaven. But in time man replaced these gods with new 
gods and new religions that provided no more certain or greater answers than 
those worshipped by his Greek or Roman or Egyptian ancestors. And while we've 
chosen now our monolithic and benevolent gods and found our certainties in 
science, believers all, we wait for a sign, a revelation. Our eyes turn 
skyward, ready to accept the truly incredible, to find our destiny written in 
the stars. But how do we best look to see? With new eyes or old?
%
Werber: The regression hypnosis work I did with you-
Mulder: No, I'm not questioning your methods, Dr Werber. I'm questioning 
myself, and how I was tricked. How I was led to believe, through an elaborate 
staging of events, that my sister had been abducted.
Werber: A man with faith can indulge in the luxury of skepticism.
Mulder: I don't think you understand. There's just too much evidence that it's 
all been a lie. The conspiracy is not to hide the existence of 
extraterrestrials. It's to make people believe in it so completely that they 
question nothing.
Werber: So, you and I have been advocates of insanity all along? Is this the 
extreme possibility you believe in now?
%
Mulder: One more anal-probing gyro-pyro levitating ecoplasm alien anti-matter 
story and I'm going to take out my gun and shoot somebody.
%
[Scully throws a newspaper at Mulder.]
Scully: Shouldn't that be my picture next to the headline? [A picture of Mulder 
with the headline, "All this conjecture about little green men - false, 
dangerous, delusional."] Or is that just you having a little fun?
Mulder: Do I look like I'm having fun, Scully?
Scully: You look constipated, actually.
Mulder: That would make sense. I've had my head up my rear end for the last 
five years.
%
Krycek: Well, look who's answering the bat-phone.
%
[Mulder stands next to Scully, who is laying on a bed in the hospital, and move 
a strand of her bangs out of her eyes. She begins to wake up.]
Scully: Mmm. [Opens her eyes.] What time is it?
Mulder: (laughing) "What time is it?" It's time to thank your lucky stars.
Scully: Why are you laughing?
Mulder: I'm not laughing at you! (smiles) I'm just very happy to be standing 
here talking to you, that's all.
Scully: (getting concerned) Mulder, what am I doing here?
Mulder: You were airlifted here in vasogenic shock.
Scully: From what?
Mulder: You've got some first-degree burns, and scorching on your hands and 
face.
Scully: (touches face, not understanding) From what?
Mulder: You don't remember?
Scully: Mulder... [Looks at the tv, which is showing a report about the attack, 
along with images of many of the dead bodies found at the scene.]
Mulder: Is any of this coming back to you?
Scully: I was there? [Mulder sighs.] Well, doing what?
Mulder: I was hoping you were going to answer that question for me.
%
Scully: But it doesn't explain why they would want to kill me. And it doesn't 
explain why I survived.
Mulder: It all comes down to a question, one that hasn't been answered or I 
don't think honestly addressed. Who made that chip in your neck? That chip was 
found in a military research facility. Our government made that chip, implanted 
it in your neck as part of a secret military project to develop a biochemical 
weapon, to monitor your immunity or to destroy you like a lab rat... if the 
truth were to be exposed. Your cancer, your cure. Everything that's happening 
to you now. It all points to that chip. The truth I've been searching for? That 
truth is IN you.
Scully: (pauses, looks down) Mulder, when I met you five years ago, you told me 
that your sister had been abducted... by aliens. That that event had marked you 
so deeply that nothing else mattered. I didn't believe you, but I followed 
you... on nothing more than your faith that the truth was out there, based not 
on facts, not on science, but on your memories that your sister had been taken 
from you. Your memories were all that you had.
Mulder: I don't trust those memories now.
Scully: Whether you trust them or not, they led you here, and me. But I have no 
memories to either trust or distrust. And if you ask me now to follow you 
again, to stand behind you in what you now believe, without knowing what 
happened to me out there... without those memories, I can't. I won't.
Mulder: [Stands and goes to window, pauses, then looks back at her.] If I could 
give you those memories, if I could prove that I was right and that what I 
believed for so long was wrong-
Scully: Is that what you really want?
%
[Scully is under hypnosis]
Scully: There's... there's another one. There's another ship. They see it. They 
were attacking them.
Weber: Who were they attacking, Dana?
Scully: The... the faceless men. They're... oh my God, I can't...
Weber: Do you want to stop, Dana?
Scully: No. Now it's coming at us. Oh my God! No! Cassandra! Where's Cassandra? 
They're... they're taking her. They're... oh my God.
%
Krycek: You must be losing it, Mulder. I can beat you with one hand.
Mulder: Isn't that how you like to beat yourself?
[Krycek cocks gun]
Mulder: If those were my last words, I can do better.
Krycek: I'm not here to kill you, Mulder. I'm here to help you.
Mulder: (sarcastically) Hey, thanks.
Krycek: You know, if it wasn't in my best interests, I would just as soon 
squeeze the trigger.
Mulder: What's stopping you?
Krycek: Hear this, agent Mulder. Listen very carefully, because what I'm 
telling you is deadly serious. There is a war raging, and unless you pull your 
head out of the sand, you and I and about 5 billion other people are gonna go 
the way of the dinosaur. I'm talking planned invasion- the colonization of this 
planet by an extraterrestrial race.
Mulder: (laughing) I thought you were serious.
Krycek: Kazakhstan, Skyland Mountain, the site in Pennsylvania, they're all 
alien lighthouses where the colonization wil be gin, but where now a battle is 
being raged, a struggle for heaven and earth where there is one law: fight or 
die. And one rule: resist or serve.
Mulder: Serve who?
Krycek: No, not who. What.
Mulder: Krycek, you're a murderer, a liar and a coward. Just because you stick 
a gun in my chest, I'm supposed to believe you're my friend?!
Krycek: (smiles) Get up. I was sent by a man... a man who knows, as I do, that 
resistance is in our grasp, and in yours. The mass incinerations were strikes 
by an alien rebellion, to upset plans for occupation. One of these rebels is 
being held captive. And if he dies, so does the resistance. [Leans forward and 
seems to kiss him on the cheek?, then puts his gun away and starts to leave.] 
(in Russian) Good luck to you, my friend.
%
Scully: Mulder? What are you doing sitting here in the dark?
Mulder: Thinking.
Scully: Thinking about what?
Mulder: Well, the usual. Destiny, fate, how to throw a curveball. The 
inextricable relationships in our lives that are neither accidental nor... 
somehow in our control either.
%
Guard: Yes, sir?
Mulder: We're federal agents requesting permission to enter the base.
Guard: Do you have any paperwork to go with that, Agent "Muldar?"
Mulder: (annoyed) It's Mulder.
%
Mulder: And why would God allow this to happen? Why do bad things happen to 
good people? Religion has masqueraded as the paranormal since the dawn of time 
to justify some of the most horrible acts in history.
Scully: I was raised to believe that God has His reasons however mysterious.
Mulder: He may well have His reasons, but He seems to use a lot of psychotics 
to carry out His job orders.
%
Mulder: [Speaking to Father Gregory who is praying inside an interrogation 
room] What are you asking for, Father? Mercy or forgiveness? You know... they 
say when you talk to God it's prayer, but when God talks to you it's 
schizophrenia. What is your God telling you, Father?
%
Mulder: [leaving the room to go under cover] If you don't hear from me by 
midnight... (pauses) feed my fish.
%
Mulder: You have to be willing to see.
Scully: I wish it were that simple.
Mulder: Scully, you have to believe me. Nobody else on this whole damn planet 
does or ever will. You're my one in five billion.
%
Mulder: What did you tell him?
Scully: The truth … as well as I understand it.
Mulder: Which is?
Scully: Folie a deux. A madness shared by two.
%
Mulder: One more anal-probing gyro-pyro levitating ecoplasm alien anti-matter 
story and I'm going to take out my gun and shoot somebody.
%
Mulder: You know, when I first met you I figured you were just ambitious. Then 
this morning my opinion changed and I thought you were arrogant. Now I'm 
beginning to wonder what you're protecting.
FBI Special Agent Jeffrey Spender: I'm just trying to run this thing right. Not 
like some ridiculous, paranormal free-for-all.
Mulder: You're insulting me when you should be taking notes. Somehow you got 
the big assignment, but just because you're wearing the suit doesn't mean it 
fits.
%
Skinner: So this kid is a human oddity. Tell me why anyone would go to such 
lengths as to kill him?
Mulder: This kid may be the key not just to all human potential, but to all 
spiritual unexplained paranormal phenomena. The key to everything in The 
X-Files.
%
AD Maslin: Agent Mulder... Agent Mulder, I'm reading here a very pie-in-the-sky 
report about global domination plans by vicious, long-clawed spacelings? Is 
there going to be data to back this vague, omnibus account?
Mulder: Yes.
AD #1: I see your renowned arrogance has been left quite intact.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: There was some sloppiness in Phoenix where they found 
the body. The local PD got involved. These were taken at the scene by a crime 
reporter.
First Elder: These were run in the press?
Cigarette Smoking Man: I trumped up a story about a crazy Indian on the loose. 
Never underestimate the public's willingness to blame the Red Man for... 
anything they can't explain.
%
Scully: Mulder, I just want to remind you that by not informing local PD we are 
in technical violation of state laws prohibiting contamination of a crime 
scene. (Mulder pays no attention to her; mutters) Why do I bother?
%
Mulder: [Scrapes nail from wall] Ah. Somebody broke a nail.
Scully: Is it an animal?
Mulder: Well, it ain't RuPaul.
%
Mulder: What does it take? For this thing to come up and bite you on the ass? I 
saw these creatures. I saw them burst to life. You would've seen them, too but 
you were infected with that virus. You were passed out over my shoulder.
Scully: Mulder, I know what you did. I know what happened to me but without 
ignoring the science, I can't... Listen, Mulder... (takes his hand) You told me 
that my science kept you honest. That it made you question your assumptions. 
That by it, I'd made you a whole person. If I change now... It wouldn't be 
right... or honest.
Mulder: I'm talking about extraterrestrial life alive on this planet in our 
lifetime. Forces that dwarf and precede all human history. I'm sorry, Scully, 
but this time your science is wrong. (walks away)
%
Mulder: Why are you here?
Gibson: They were using me 'cause I can communicate with it.
Scully: Communicate with what?
Gibson: You already know. You just don't want to believe it.
[Mulder and Scully glance at each other]
%
Spender: You're not supposed to come here. It's what was agreed to. It's the 
deal you made.
Cigarette Smoking Man: I had to congratulate you. Commend how you handled 
things. How you handled Mulder.
Spender: I did what I was asked.
Cigarette Smoking Man: You did well, son. He's on very thin ice now, you know?
Spender: Mulder will be back. As long as he lives, he won't give up.
Cigarette Smoking Man: Well, there's solutions, of course. Simple but extreme 
solutions. I've used these methods. They have their place. But not here.
Spender: (surprised) You've killed men?
Cigarette Smoking Man: You can kill a man but you can't kill what he stands 
for... Not unless you first break his spirit. That's a beautiful thing to see.
%
Mulder: It would help if you'd shut the door. It would make it harder for them 
to see that I'm totally disregarding everything I was told.
Scully: (closing the door) Everything we were told, Mulder.
Mulder: They can't take away the X-Files, Scully. They tried.
Scully: You know, Agent Fowley's report to OPR painted the facts in an 
interesting way. I hope you haven't been betrayed.
Mulder: (not looking at her) Agent Fowley's report was a means to an end. 
Trying to protect the work. Protect the X-Files.
Scully: Mulder, Agent Fowley's report states that the man you saw attacked was 
bludgeoned by an unknown subject. She makes no mention of a little boy who as 
it happens, is nowhere to be found. It would seem that her report protects 
everything but you.
Mulder: Agent Fowley took me to that plant at great risk to herself where I saw 
something that you refuse to believe in. Saw it again, Scully. And though it 
may not say it in her report, Diana saw it, too. And no matter what you think 
she's certainly not going to go around saying that just because science can't 
prove it isn't true.
Scully: I don't doubt what you saw, Mulder. I don't doubt you. I'm willing to 
believe, but not in a lie and not in the opposite of what I can prove. It comes 
down to a matter of trust. [He looks up at her] I guess it always has.
Mulder: You asking me to make a choice?
Scully: I'm asking you to trust my judgment. To trust me. [Hands him a folder]
Mulder: I can't accept that. Not if it refutes what I know to be true.
Scully: Mulder, these are test results. DNA from the claw nail we found 
matching exactly the DNA from the virus you believe is extraterrestrial.
Mulder: [Takes the folder and looks at the papers inside] That's the connection.
Scully: Which matches exactly DNA that was found in Gibson Praise.
Mulder: Wait a minute. I don't understand. You're saying that Gibson Praise is 
infected with the virus?
Scully: No. It's a part of his DNA. In fact, it's a part of all of our DNA. 
It's called a genetic remnant. It's inactive junk DNA. Except in Gibson it's 
turned on.
Mulder: So if that were true, that would mean that Gibson is in some part 
extraterrestrial.
Scully: It would mean that all of us are.
%
Scully: Uh, Virgil Nokes? I'm Agent Scully. This is Agent Mulder. We're with 
the FBI.
(Mulder, in dark sunglasses, leans against one of the porch supports very bored 
and petulant, eating sunflower seeds.)
Farmer: Jehovah's Witness?
Scully: No, sir. Federal Bureau of Investigation.
Mulder: But we do have a free copy of the Watchtower for you if you'd like.
%
Farmer: I figure I got better things to do with my fertilizer than going around 
blowing government buildings sky high.
Scully: Yeah. Well, as we said, sir this is just routine.
Mulder: (quietly to Scully) So routine, it numbs the mind.
%
Scully: (firmly) Mulder, we're not going to Nevada.
Mulder: Come on, Scully. Just one quick side trip.
Scully: No. Sorry, Mulder. We have a whole new assignment.
Mulder: Running down people that buy fertilizer? This is scut work, bozo work - 
the FBI equivalent of being made to wear an orange jumpsuit and pick up trash 
by the side of the highway. They mean to humiliate us.
Scully: Look, Mulder, like it or not, humiliated or not, we're on domestic 
terrorism now and, yes, this is... This is a punishment, but if we want to get 
back to where we want to be we have to follow orders. We can't freelance.
Mulder: You saw that news report. What did you make of that?
Scully: I think that the obvious assumption is that the woman was shot, 
regardless of what the police say. Maybe it was a sniper.
Mulder: In the words of their captain, "she just sort of popped." And what 
about this guy who supposedly tried to take her hostage, her husband? Looked to 
me like he was trying to warn the cops before she died. Now, the sun will rise 
in America tomorrow regardless of whether or not we're at yet another farm 
investigating yet another enormous pile of doo-doo. We can be in and out in a 
day. Nobody has to know.
[Scully seems to consider the idea. Mulder waggles his eyebrows at her.]
%
[Mulder stops the car at a stoplight; Crump screams.]
Crump: What are you doing?!
Mulder: What? What am I doing?
Crump: What the hell are you doing?!
Mulder: (sarcastically) I'm composing a sonnet. I'm slowing down for a light!
%
Mulder: Crump? Crump, what else can you tell me about what's happening to you?
Crump: Mr. Crump. You call me by my last name, you say "mister" in front of it.
Mulder: "Mister." I got you.
Crump: Not Crump. Mr. Crump.
Mulder: I can think of something else I'd like to call you. I could put 
"mister" in front of that, too if you'd like.
Crump: You know, what kind of name is Mulder, anyway? What is that, like... 
like, Jewish?
Mulder: (disbelieving) Excuse me?
Crump: Jewish... It is, right?
Mulder: (annoyed) It's Mr. Mulder to you, you peanut-picking bastard. Now, Mr. 
Crump what can you tell me about what's happening to you?
%
Mulder: On behalf of the International Jewish Conspiracy, I've got to inform 
you that we're almost out of gas.
%
Crump: Hey, uh... The Jew stuff? No offense. I mean, uh... A man can't help who 
he's born to.
Mulder: (sarcastic) That was an apology, right? Gee, I don't know if I can see 
to drive my eyes are tearing up so bad.
%
Scully: Lieutenant Breil? My name is Dana Scully. I called in regard to the 
electrical equipment the Navy is maintaining in the town of Montello.
Lieutenant Breil: Right. I don't know if there's been some miscommunication 
between you and your Washington office, but, uh...
Scully: My Washington office?
Lieutenant Breil: Yeah. I was under the impression that I'd explained this to 
the FCC's satisfaction.
Scully: Oh, I'm... I'm so sorry to make you run through it again, uh... For my 
official report to the, uh... To the FCC.
%
Scully: (on phone) Mulder, are you okay?
Mulder: (on phone) Yeah, aside from terminal cell phone withdrawal... That, and 
I got to pee.
%
AD Kersh: "Justice department jet: 2.6 turbine hours round trip at $1,400 an 
hour. Car rental - over-mileage, out-of-state use penalties: $346. Compensation 
to one Walter R. Duncan for unauthorized use of his 1968 Caprice station wagon: 
$500."
Mulder: Why don't you bill me?
AD Kersh: I'll bill your partner instead. You too obviously relish the role of 
martyr.
Mulder: Okay. So are we done here? Back to the bozo work investigating huge 
piles of manure?
AD Kersh: You can always quit.
[Mulder looks at Scully; leaves the office, slams door.]
Scully: Sir, Agent Mulder has been through a lot.
AD Kersh: And you apologize for him a lot. I've noticed that about you.
Scully: I'm not apologizing for this. Because of his work, the DOD is shutting 
down their antenna array in northeastern Nevada. Our participation in this case 
has saved lives.
AD Kersh: I don't see you proving that. The Department of Defense admits no 
culpability whatsoever. Furthermore, they say the closing of the facility was 
coincidental.
Scully: ("yeah, right" tone) Right.
AD Kersh: Don't misunderstand me, Agent. I don't care if you and your partner 
saved a school bus full of doe-eyed urchins on their way to Sunday bible camp. 
You no longer investigate X-Files. You are done and the sooner you and Mulder 
come to recognize that, the better for both of you.
Scully: (mutters angrily as she leaves) Big piles of manure.
%
Mulder: My name's Mulder. Fox Mulder.
Sailor: That a name? Mulder?
Mulder: I got ID in my pocket.
Sailor 2: (pulling out and reading Mulder's badge) "Fox Mulder, Federal Bureau 
of Investigation." Sorry, mate, never heard of it! [They begin dragging Mulder 
below decks.]
Mulder: (surprised) Never heard of it?
Sailor: Tell you what we do with foxes. (laugh) Care to know?
Mulder: You never heard of the FBI?
%
First Mate: Sir, the Germans, sir. They've taken control of the bridge. 
Steering a course for their homeland.
Captain Marburg: Not on the watch of captain Yip Harburg, they're not. Lock the 
prisoner up in here.
Mulder: It's okay. The war's over. Let them take you to Germany. They make nice 
cars.
[They all ignore him and leave.]
Mulder: (to himself, grinning, thrilled) This is unbelievable.
%
[Mulder is moving across the dancefloor when one of the dancing couples bumps 
into him.]
WOMAN: (accusingly) Excuse me.
[Mulder sees that the woman is a 1939 version of Scully, wearing a long dress 
and dancing with an older man. He grabs her arm, surprised.]
Mulder: Scully?
1939 Scully: (boldly) I suggest you get your Nazi paws off me before you get 
one in the kisser.
Mulder: (lifting his hat so she can see him) Scully, it's me, Mulder.
1939 Scully: Oh, you speak English, do you? Well, how'd you like to see the 
stars on the American flag? (holds her fist in front of his face)
Mulder: (hurt, confused) I'm not a Nazi.
1939 Scully: Oh, sure. You just look like one, right? (returns to dancing)
Mulder: I had to steal this uniform! (putting his hands on her back) Scully?
Singer: (stops singing, points at Mulder) Hier ist der Mann, den sie wollen! 
(Here is the man you want!)
Nazi: (fires gun into air) Halt! Hände hoch! Hände hoch! (Stop! Hands up! 
Hands up!)
[Mulder looks at 1939 Scully for help.]
1939 Scully: (translating) He said, "Put your hands up."
[Mulder puts his hands up; is grabbed by Nazis]
Mulder: (to 1939 Scully) You see, I told you.
%
[Scully sitting at her desk; the Lone Gunmen approach.]
Scully: What are you guys doing here?
Frohike: Mulder's in trouble.
Langly: Big trouble.
Scully: What do you mean?
Byers: Let's take a walk.
Scully: Okay, where are we going?
Frohike: The walls have ears.
Scully: (impatient) I have ears. Will you tell me what's going on?
%
Scully: Sir, I couldn't waste time explaining myself to your assistant.
Skinner: Tell me what is so urgent.
Scully: It's about Agent Mulder. He's done something incredibly rash.
Skinner: I can't.
Scully: He may be lost at sea.
Skinner: I can't, Agent Scully.
Scully: You can't what?
Skinner: I can't help you. There's nothing I can do.
Scully: This isn't for me; it's for Agent Mulder.
Skinner: My hands are tied. I'm not your direct superior any longer.
Scully: Don't you want to know what this is about?
[They walk back toward door.]
Skinner: No, I don't. I don't even what to hear it.
Scully: (pleading) Sir, this is about a man's life.
Skinner: (louder) I'm not allowed to have contact with you - any contact with 
either you or Mulder.
Skinner's secretary: She walked right past me, sir.
[Scully closes the door between the offices.]
Skinner: You're out of line, Scully.
Scully: No, sir, you're out of line. I'm sorry, but I'm coming to you for help 
and I've got nowhere else to go. I would hope that after everything that we 
have been through that you would at least have the courtesy and the decency and 
not to mention the respect to listen to what I have to say. Now, all I need is 
information. (Skinner takes note; glances at it.) You don't have to do anything 
else. Look, sir, if you know anybody at the Office of Naval Intelligence it 
would be of great help.
Skinner: (pauses; hands back the note) I could lose my job, my pension, I could 
even be subject to legal action.
[Scully sighs, exasperated; Skinner slams the door and holds it shut.]
Skinner: Use your head, Scully. It'll save your ass.
Scully: Save your own ass, sir. You'll save your head along with it.
%
[Scully exits the elevator and enters the X-Files office.]
Scully: (direct) I want you to do me a favor. It's not negotiable. Either you 
do it or I kill you. You understand?
[Spender, alone, gets up and comes over to her]
Spender: You okay, Agent Scully?
Scully: No, I'm not. I'm a gun ready to go off so don't test me, Spender. Don't 
even think about trying to weasel me.
Spender: What is it that you need?
Scully: (writing it down) Navy AWACS SLAR 100 K swath. South-southeast of 
Bermuda. I am looking for a boat, maybe a ship. 1939 luxury liner.
Spender: 1939?
Scully: Don't ask too many questions. I don't care what you do or who you do or 
who you have to grease, I need that information and I need it now. Are we clear 
on that?
Spender: Crystal.
Scully: And, Agent Spender... If you're not back in a hurry I am going to hunt 
you down, and so help me God... (makes a fist)
Spender: Right.
%
[Scully runs into Kersh's secretary.]
Kersh's secretary: Oh, Agent Scully.
Scully: I was just, uh...
Kersh's secretary: I was sent to come get you.
Scully: Yeah, I was waiting for Agent Spender, he was, uh... I'm supposed to 
pick up a delivery from him.
Kersh's secretary: Agent Spender is with Assistant Director Kersh.
Scully: (furious) That rat bastard!
[Scully runs to elevator.]
Scully: (to herself) Stupid!
%
Skinner: (joining her in the elevator) I've been trying to reach you. I got the 
information you needed.
[Scully takes the paper, grabs him and kisses him on the lips.]
Scully: How?
Skinner: Don't even ask.
Scully: (grateful) Sir, what you've done...
Skinner: Is save Mulder's ass. I know.
Scully: Yes.
[Doors open. Other agents are in the hall.]
Skinner: (sternly) And if you ever ask me to break policy or protocol I will 
have you written up, wrapped up and tossed out of the FBI for good. Am I 
understood, Agent Scully?
Scully: Yes. (gets back on the elevator; excited) Yes!
[Another agent is also in the elevator; he looks baffled at her joy.]
%
Sailor: Oi... American, right? Saved your life, mate. Krauts don't want no 
reason to bring you Yanks into the war.
Mulder: I got two words for you, buddy-- Pearl Harbor.
Sailor: What?
Mulder: After Poland, Hitler's on his way to Denmark, Holland and France with a 
few stops in between. The French all but roll over on us, the Italians seize 
their opportunity and the Japanese come through the back door. It's a long, 
bloody story. It fortunately has a happy ending.
Sailor: We win?
Mulder: Yeah, you come out on the side of history with no small amount of help 
from us. Not much to apologize over the next 50 years except for maybe the 
Spice Girls.
%
[Mulder and 1939 Scully run out of ballroom and into hall.]
Mulder: (taking her hand) Come on.
Nazi: Stehen bleiben! Stehen bleiben... Oder ich erschiesse Sie. Hände hoch... 
Hinter Ihren Kopf. Machen Sies! (Stand still! Stand still. Or I will shoot you. 
Hands up... behind your heads. Do it!)
[They stop running; 1939 Scully sighs; both put their hands behind their heads.]
1939 Scully: Now what, Einstein?
Nazi: Machen Sies! (Do it!)
[Gunshot; both jump then turn to see the Nazi dead on the floor. 1939 Skinner 
appears.]
1939 Skinner: God bless America. Now get your asses out of here.
%
1939 Scully: So, if I don't turn this ship around...?
Mulder: In all likelihood, I won't exist.
1939 Scully: (disbelieving) Oh...
Mulder: And neither will you.
1939 Scully: Okay...
Mulder: So, in case we never meet again...
[Mulder grabs her and kisses he; she kisses back. She looks at him; pulls back 
her right fist and punches him. Mulder rubs his jaw appreciatively.]
Mulder: I was expecting a left.
%
[Mulder lying on his side in a hospital bed, unconscious; Scully leans over 
him.]
Scully: Mulder? Mulder, it's me. Hmm?
Mulder: (waking) Where am I? (tries to sit up)
Scully: You're in a hospital.
Mulder: Ooooo.
Scully: Lie still.
Mulder: I feel... Like hell.
Scully: I don't blame you. You've been through the wringer, I'd say.
Mulder: What happened to me?
Scully: You did something incredibly stupid.
Mulder: What did I do?
Scully: You went looking for a ship, Mulder. In the Bermuda Triangle.
Mulder: Say that again?
[Lone Gunmen enter the room.]
Frohike: Gilligan awakes.
Mulder: You were there.
Scully: Hmm?
Mulder: You were there, Scully.
[Skinner enters.]
Langly: (to the others) He's delirious.
Mulder: (referring to Skinner) And he was there, too.
Skinner: (dropping a bouquet of flowers on the nightstand) Right - Me and my 
dog Toto.
Mulder: No, you were there with the Nazis.
Scully: Mulder, will you settle down? It's an order.
Skinner: Not that he takes orders...
[Mulder rests the back of his hand on Scully's waist which is against his bed 
rail. Is happy, but obviously drugged.]
Mulder: You saved the world, Scully.
Scully: Yeah... You're right. I did.
Frohike: What kind of drugs is he on?
Langly: I want some.
Mulder: No, no, no... The Queen Anne- I found it. You were there with Thor's 
Hammer. I told you you had to turn the ship around and then I jumped overboard.
Scully: Yeah, I bet you did. The boat that you were on was busted into a 
million pieces. And as for the Queen Anne... it was nothing more than a ghost 
ship.
Mulder: No, no, no. You and I were on that ship, Scully. In 1939.
Skinner: Get some rest, Mulder, 'cause when you get out of here I'm going to 
kick your butt but good.
[Mulder grins, Skinner and the Gunmen leave the room.]
Mulder: I would've never seen you again. But you believed me.
Scully: In your dreams. (as if talking to a child) Mulder, I want you to close 
your eyes and I want you to think to yourself "there's no place like home."
Mulder: Mmm. (chuckles) [Scully starts to leave; he calls her back.] Hey, 
Scully. (leans up on his elbow)
Scully: [Comes back and leans close to his face.] Yes?
[Long pause. They look deeply at one another.]
Mulder: I love you.
Scully: Oh, brother... (turns away and leaves the room)
[Mulder watches her go; starts to lie down, but as his face touches the pillow 
he leans back up in slight pain and rubs his jaw where 1939 Scully hit him. He 
gazes after her and smiles.]
%
Mulder: (pointing at a sign) Milepost 134. Two miles to go.
Scully: (dryly) I'm all a-tingle. (they share a look) So, Mulder, this supposed 
clandestine source who's contacted you how do we know that he's not just 
another crackpot whose encyclopedic knowledge of extraterrestrial life isn't 
derived exclusively from reruns of Star Trek?
%
Scully: Mulder, it's the dim hope of finding that proof that's kept us in this 
car, or one very much like it for more nights than I care to remember. (Mulder 
looks at her fondly) Driving hundreds if not thousands of miles through 
neighborhoods and cities and towns where people are raising families and buying 
homes and playing with their kids and their dogs, and... in short, living their 
lives. While we - we - we just keep driving.
Mulder: What is your point?
Scully: Don't you ever just want to stop? Get out of the damn car? Settle down 
and live something approaching a normal life?
Mulder: (defensive) This is a normal life. [Scully smiles to herself.]
%
Mulder (as Morris): Okay, well, uh... Everybody have a, uh... a good day at 
your various, uh... (realizes no one is paying attention) All right. (Turns to 
leave.)
Chris: Mom!
Mrs Fletcher: Morris! What about Chris?
Mulder (as Morris): Chris?
Chris: You said you'd give me an answer today.
Mrs Fletcher: Her nose. You said you'd give her an answer about her nose.
[Family waits in anticipation. This is obviously a very important decision.]
Mulder (as Morris): Um... I think... [Chris gives him a little girl look.] I 
think she's a little young for plastic surgery don't you think? [Chris cries 
again.]
Mrs Fletcher: Oh, for God's sake, Morris - a nose ring! She said she wants a 
nose ring!
Chris: (to Mulder) I hate you! I wish you were dead.
Mulder (as Morris): Well, my work here is done. Have a nice day.
%
Mulder (as Morris): [Looks into "his" closet, filled with black suits and white 
shirts.] Ladies and gentlemen, Mr. Johnny Cash.
%
[Mulder is again asleep on the recliner; Joanne wakes him.]
Joanne Fletcher: This is not a marriage. It's a farce.
Mulder (as Morris): What?
Joanne Fletcher: You're not attracted to me anymore. I disgust you, don't i?
Mulder (as Morris): No. No. It's not... It's not that you're disgusting. 
I-i-it's just that...
Joanne Fletcher: It's just that you don't want to ever make love to me ever 
again, that's all. That and you mumble something about Scully in your sleep. 
Who is Scully, Morris? Is it another woman?
Mulder (as Morris): Does Scully sound like a woman's name to you?
Joanne Fletcher: Who is Scully? Tell me.
Mulder (as Morris): Oh, Joanne, I'm sure I've told you many times in the past 
that there are things about my work that unfortunately, I have to keep a secret.
Joanne Fletcher: Oh, no, buster. That's not going to fly this time.
Mulder (as Morris): My point is that there are a lot of things you don't know 
about me. And... I've just... I've been under a lot of pressure lately. I mean, 
up is down and black is white. I don't know where I stand anymore. I don't even 
know... who I am really anymore. I just... I know for sure that I am not the 
man you married. I'm just not. And I'm sorry. I'm truly sorry.
Joanne Fletcher: Oh, god, Morris. I didn't know. They have that pill now. 
(understanding laughter) We can work this out. There's other ways to be 
intimate.
[Mulder looks horrified; she hugs him. The doorbell rings.]
%
Scully: I'm sorry. Uh, Morris Fletcher?
Mulder (as Morris): (quietly) Scully, it's me. It's Mulder. [Mulder closes the 
door and pulls Scully into the driveway.]
Scully: (nervous) You're, uh... You're the man from the other night? From Area 
51?
Joanne Fletcher: (yelling from inside the house) Liar!
Scully: You phoned me. Would you mind telling me what this is about?
Mulder (as Morris): I'm Mulder. I'm really Mulder. I switched bodies, places, 
identities with this man Morris Fletcher the man that you think is Mulder, but 
he's not. (sees his reflection in the car window - of Morris) Of course you 
don't believe me. Why was I expecting anything different? Your full name is 
Dana Katherine Scully. Your badge number is... Hell! I don't know your badge 
number. Your mother's name is Margaret. Your brother's name is Bill Jr. He's in 
the Navy and he hates me. (no response from Scully) Lately, for lunch, you've 
been having this six-ounce cup of yogurt, plain yogurt, into which you stir bee 
pollen because you're on a bee pollen kick even though I tell you you're a 
scientist and you should know better.
Joanne Fletcher: (opens the door and dumps all of Morris' black suits onto the 
front steps) Cheater!
Scully: Look... Any of that information could have been gathered by anyone.
Mulder (as Morris): Even that yogurt thing? That is so you. That is so Scully. 
Well, it's good to know you haven't changed. That's somewhat comforting.
%
Morris: (voiceover) Once upon a time, there was a guy with the improbable name 
of Fox Mulder. He started out life happily enough, as these things go. He had 
parents who loved him, a cute kid sister. He had a roof over his head, got all 
his flu shots, had all his fingers and toes and aside from being stuck with the 
name "Fox" which probably taught him how to fight - or not - he pretty much led 
a normal life. But the worst thing by far - the biggest kick in the slacks this 
kid Fox ever got - was what happened to his sister. One day, she just 
disappeared. Now, Fox buckled down and worked his butt off. Graduated top of 
his class at Oxford then top of his class at the FBI academy. None of that hard 
work made up for his sister, though. It was just a way of putting her out of 
his mind. Finally, the way I figure it, he went out of his mind and he's been 
that way ever since. Fox Mulder pissed away a brilliant career, lost the 
respect of supervisors and friends and now lives his life shaking his fist at 
the sky and muttering about conspiracies to anyone who will listen. If you ask 
me, he's one step away from pushing a baby carriage filled with tin cans down 
the street. But now, all that's going to change.
%
[Morris (as Mulder) enters with groceries; looks around the apartment.]
Morris (as Mulder): Uh-huh. (sets the bags down and gets out some candles) A 
little mood lighting for the bedroom. (looks around; pauses) No bedroom.
[Goes over to a closed door; tries to open it several times with no result; 
finally gets it open. Several boxes and porno magazines fall out; the room is 
shown to be filled with boxes, old furniture and papers.]
Morris (as Mulder): This guy hasn't been laid in ten years.
%
Mulder (as Morris): Joanne, listen to me. There's something I got to tell you.
Joanne Morris: I've heard enough from you for one lifetime, Morris. Go tell it 
to that tramp of yours, that Scully, whatshername.
Mulder (as Morris): Dana Scully. Special Agent Dana Scully.
Joanne Morris: Special Tramp Dana Scully.
Mulder (as Morris): She's my partner, Joanne.
Joanne Morris: I'm supposed to be your partner.
Mulder (as Morris): My name is not Morris Fletcher. It's Fox Mulder. Special 
Agent Fox Mulder with the FBI. Dana Scully is my FBI partner. I am not your 
husband we are not married, we are complete strangers and I have a whole other 
life that I'm desperately trying to get back to.
Joanne Morris: You know, Morris, most men, when they have a mid-life crisis - 
they go out and buy themselves a sports car. They don't run around calling 
themselves Fox.
%
[Scully and Morris (as Mulder) pull up in their car next to Mulder (as Morris). 
Scully gets out to stand next to Mulder; Morris stays in the car.]
Mulder (as Morris): You don't look too happy. Don't tell me I'm going to have 
to put two kids through school.
Scully: (hesitantly) That is you in there, Mulder, isn't it? (Mulder nods; 
Scully folds her arms, hugging herself) I, uh... I just got off the phone with 
Frohike. They were able to download and analyze the crash data and, yes, there 
was an anomalous event that night.
Mulder (as Morris): And how do I get back?
Scully: (not easy for her to say) Well, that's just it. It's all about random 
moments in time... About a series of variables approaching an event horizon. 
And even if we... could recreate that moment if we could sabotage another 
craft... Mulder, if we were... If we were off... If the event were off by even 
one millisecond...
Mulder (as Morris): I might wind up with my head in a rock.
Scully: Something like that, yeah. (long pause)
Mulder (as Morris): (depressed) What about him? I mean, me. Whatever. Whoever 
he is.
Scully: Agent Mulder has become AD Kersh's new golden boy. He's been tasked 
with returning the flight data recorder that he and I stole. The son of a bitch 
confesses to Kersh even more than I do to my priest. I'm just tagging along for 
the ride.
Mulder (as Morris): What do you mean, "just tagging along?"
Scully: I'm out of the Bureau. I've been censured and relieved of my position.
Mulder (as Morris): No. You can explain it to them like you explained it to me. 
You have the data. You can make them understand. You can get your job back.
Scully: (can't help but smile; looks up at him fondly) I'd kiss you if you 
weren't so damn ugly. (Mulder smiles back)
Morris (as Mulder): (honking the horn; yelling out the window) Take a picture - 
it'll last longer!
[Mulder and Scully pause and look at the car.]
Mulder (as Morris): (through clenched teeth) If I... shoot him, is that murder 
or suicide?
Scully: Neither, if I do it first. (Squeezes his arm, then walks toward the 
car. He stops her.)
Mulder (as Morris): Hey, Scully...
[He holds out his closed hand to her; she holds out her palm. He drops a 
handful of sunflower seeds into her hand; takes one back and eats it. They look 
at each other. Mulder watches, depressed, as Scully drives away.]
%
Mulder: (on phone) Mulder.
Scully: (on phone; in her office) Mulder, it's me. I just wanted to let you 
know that we slipped under Kersh's radar. Our little field trip to Nevada went 
unnoticed.
Mulder: Oh, yeah?
Scully: Mulder, I'm sorry that your confidential source didn't pan out.
Mulder: Well, I guess you were right, Scully. Just another crackpot who watches 
too much Star Trek.
Scully: Good night.
Mulder: Hey, Scully? I, uh, know it's not your normal life, but... Thanks for 
coming out there with me.
Scully: (surprised, pleased) You're welcome.
%
Scully: Check out lines were worse than rush hour on the 95. If I heard "Silent 
Night" one more time, I was going to start taking hostages.
%
Scully: Let's hear it. Give me the details.
Mulder: Look, if you've got Christmas stuff to do I don't want to... you know...
Scully: Mulder, I drove all the way out here. I might as well know why. Right?
Mulder: I just thought you'd be more... curious.
Scully: Who lives in the house?
Mulder: No one.
Scully: Then who are we staking out?
Mulder: The former occupants.
Scully: They've come back?
Mulder: That's the story.
Scully: I see. (dryly) The dark, gothic manor... the, uh, omnipresent low fog 
hugging the thicket of overgrowth... Wait- is that a hound I hear baying out on 
the moors?
Mulder: No. Actually that was a left cheek sneak.
%
Mulder: (mysteriously) Christmas, 1917. It was a time of dark, dark despair. 
American soldiers were dying at an ungodly rate in a war-torn Europe while at 
home, a deadly strain of the flu virus attacked young and old alike. Tragedy 
was a visitor on every doorstep while a creeping hopelessness set in with every 
man, woman and child. It was a time of dark, dark despair.
Scully: (unimpressed) You said that.
Mulder: But here at 1501 Larkspur Lane for a pair of star-crossed lovers 
tragedy came not from war or pestilence - not by the boot heel or the 
bombardier - but by their own innocent hand.
Scully: Go on.
Mulder: His name was Maurice. He was a... a brooding but heroic young man 
beloved of Lyda, a sublime beauty with a light that seemed to follow her 
wherever she went. They were likened to two angels descended from heaven whom 
the gods could not protect from the horrors being visited upon this cold, grey 
earth.
Scully: And what happened to them?
Mulder: Driven by a tragic fear of separation they forged a lovers' pact so 
that they might spend eternity together and not spend one precious Christmas 
apart.
Scully: They killed themselves?
Mulder: And their ghosts haunt this house every Christmas Eve. (Scully laughs) 
I just gave myself chills.
Scully: It's a good story, Mulder, and very well told, but I don't believe it.
%
[Mulder and Scully are searching a haunted house]
Scully: These are tricks that the mind plays. They are ingrained cliches from a 
thousand different horror films. When we hear a sound, we get a chill. We-we 
see a shadow and we allow ourselves to imagine something that an otherwise 
rational person would discount out of hand. The whole... the whole idea of a 
benevolent entity fits perfectly with what I'm saying. That a spirit would 
materialize or return for no other purpose than to show itself is silly and 
ridiculous. I mean, what it really shows is how silly and ridiculous we have 
become in believing such things. I mean, that... that we can ignore all natural 
laws about the corporeal body... that-that we witness these spirits clad in-in 
their own shabby outfits with the same old haircuts and hairstyles never aging, 
never... never in search of more comfortable surroundings-- it actually ends up 
saying more about the living than it does about the dead.
Mulder: Mm-hmm.
Scully: I mean, Mulder, it doesn't take an advanced degree in psychology to 
understand the... the unconscious yearnings that these imaginings satisfy. You 
know, the-the longing for immortality the hope that there is something beyond 
this mortal coil... that-that we might never be long without our loved ones. I 
mean, these are powerful, powerful desires. I mean, they're the very essence of 
what make us human. The very essence of Christmas, actually.
[A door slightly opens by itself]
Mulder: Tell me you're not afraid.
Scully: All right. I'm afraid... but it's an irrational fear.
%
[Mulder and Scully have just found a corpse.]
Scully: You know what's weird?
Mulder: What?
Scully: Mulder, she's wearing my outfit.
Mulder: How embarrassing.
%
Maurice: You drink? Take drugs?
Mulder: No.
Maurice: Get high?
Mulder: No.
Maurice: Are you overcome by the impulse to make everyone believe you? (Mulder 
looks surprised) I'm in the field of mental health. I specialize in disorders 
and manias related to pathological behavior as it pertains to the paranormal.
Mulder: Wow. I didn't know such a thing existed.
Maurice: My specialty is in what I call soul prospectors - a crossaxial 
classification I've codified by extensive interaction with visitors like 
yourself. I've found you all tend to fall into pretty much the same category.
Mulder: And what category is that?
Maurice: Narcissistic, overzealous, self-righteous egomaniac.
Mulder: That's a category?
Maurice: You kindly think of yourself as single-minded but you're prone to 
obsessive compulsiveness, workaholism, antisocialism... Fertile fields for the 
descent into total wacko breakdown.
Mulder: I don't think that pegs me exactly.
Maurice: Oh, really? Waving a gun around my house? Huh? Raving like a lunatic 
about some imaginary brick wall? (Mulder looks over at the brick wall in the 
doorway) You've probably convinced yourself you've seen aliens. You know why 
you think you see the things you do?
Mulder: (like it's obvious) Because I have seen them?
Maurice: 'Cause you're a lonely man. A lonely man chasing paramasturbatory 
illusions that you believe will give your life meaning and significance and 
which your pathetic social maladjustment makes impossible for you to find 
elsewhere. You probably consider yourself passionate, serious, misunderstood. 
Am I right?
Mulder: "Paramasturbatory"?
Maurice: Most people would rather stick their fingers in a wall socket than 
spend a minute with you.
Mulder: All right, now just, uh... Just back off for a second.
Maurice: Spend every Christmas this way? Alone?
Mulder: (confident) I'm not alone.
Maurice: More self-delusion.
Mulder: No, I came here with my partner. She's somewhere in the house.
Maurice: Behind a brick wall? (Mulder smiles and nods) How'd you get her to 
come with you? Steal her car keys? (Mulder's smile fades) You know why you do 
it - listen endlessly to her droning rationalizations. 'Cause you're afraid. 
Afraid of the loneliness. Am I right?
Mulder: I'd just like to find my partner.
%
Lyda: I think maybe the ghosts have been playing tricks on you.
Scully: I don't believe in ghosts.
Lyda: Then what are you doing here?
Scully: It's my partner.
Lyda: He believes in ghosts?
Scully: Yeah.
Lyda: Oh, you poor child. You must have an awful small life. Spending your 
Christmas Eve with him... Running around chasing things you don't even believe 
in.
Scully: Don't come any closer.
Lyda: (coming closer) I can see it in your face... The fear... The conflicted 
yearnings... A subconscious desire to find fulfillment through another. 
Intimacy through co-dependency.
Scully: What?
Lyda: Maybe you repress the truth about why you're really here pretending it's 
out of duty or loyalty-- unable to admit your dirty little secret. Your only 
joy in life is proving him wrong.
Scully: You don't know me.
%
Lyda: I hope you're not expecting any great advantages to all this.
Mulder: To all what?
Lyda: I'm assuming you came here with similar misconceptions.
Mulder: We came here looking for you.
Lyda: Oh, yeah? You didn't come here to be together for eternity?
Mulder: (chuckling) No.
Lyda: Because you're filled with despair and woeful Christmas melancholy?
Mulder: Why?
Lyda: (sighing) Maybe it was your partner then.
Mulder: (folding his arms) What about her?
Lyda: You knew this house was haunted.
Mulder: Yeah.
Lyda: Maybe you two should have discussed your real feelings before you came 
out here. I'm speaking from experience.
%
Lyda: I don't show my hole to just anyone.
Mulder: (grimaces, looks away) Why are you showing it to me?
%
Lyda: The bodies under the floor - maybe that was just some kind of Jungian 
symbolism. Or maybe... there's a secret lovers' pact.
Mulder: (sighs; smiles) We're not lovers.
Lyda: And this isn't a pure science. But you're both so attractive and there'll 
be a lot of time to work that out.
%
[Mulder is still dressed, watching TV through the night; there's a knock at the 
door; he opens it to show Scully, also still dressed.]
Scully: I, uh... I couldn't sleep. I was, um... (sighs)
Mulder: (puts his arm around her shoulders and pulls her in to the apartment) 
Come in. Aren't you supposed to be opening Christmas gifts with your family?
Scully: Mulder... None of that really happened out there tonight... That was 
all in our heads, right?
Mulder: (unsure) I-it must have been.
Scully: Mmm. Not that, uh, my only joy in life is proving you wrong.
Mulder: When have you proved me wrong?
Scully: Well... Why else would you want me out there with you?
Mulder: You didn't want to be there?
[She doesn't respond; they both look thoughtful for a moment.]
Mulder: (self-analyzing) Oh, that's, um... That's self-righteous and... 
narcissistic of me to say, isn't it?
Scully: No, I mean... Maybe I did want to be out there with you.
Mulder: (they look at each other for a moment) Now, um... I know we said that 
we weren't going to exchange gifts but, uh... I got you a little something. 
(holds out a present to her - the only wrapped gift shown in the apartment the 
whole episode)
Scully: Mulder...
Mulder: Merry Christmas.
Scully: Well, I got you a little something, too.
[She hands him his gift, and he chuckles and shakes it. She grins and they run 
over to the couch to open their presents happily.]
%
Scully: (on phone) Mulder, we are supposed to be doing background checks, not 
chasing X-Files.
Mulder: (on phone) Scully, Spender just round filed this case - it's 
unconscionable.
Scully: And what do you call rooting through his trash?
Mulder: Like that's any different from the assignment we're stuck with.
Scully: "We," Mulder? I'm stuck with it. You're not here.
%
[Wayne comes out of the house to see Mulder encouraging the three boys to play 
with his car.]
Wayne: (annoyed) I want those kids out of my car.
Mulder: (cheerfully) Okay, speed racers. That's enough driver's education for 
today.
%
Mayor: Agent Mulder, welcome to Kroner. I'm Jim Gilmore, the mayor. We spoke on 
the phone.
Mulder: Nice to meet you, sir.
Mayor: If I'd have known you was bringing the missus, I would've arranged for 
fancier accommodations.
[Mulder purses his lips, smiles, and looks away as if to say "I'm staying away 
from that one."]
Scully: (professional) I'm Agent Scully, Agent Mulder's partner. I'm... sure 
the accommodations will be just fine.
%
Scully: Well, sir, if this man Mootz could, in fact, somehow produce rain then 
what's the crime?
Mayor: I believe Daryl's causing the drought... so he can charge folks for the 
rain.
Scully: And this is what you told Agent Mulder when you spoke earlier?
Mayor: Yes, ma'am. He seemed real eager to help us.
[Scully looks at Mulder; he tries to look innocent.]
%
Sheila: Oh! We were beginning to worry that you wouldn't make it. Is this your 
first time in a TV studio? How exciting. I couldn't be happier for the two of 
you.
Scully: I'm not su-
Sheila: (runs over to get Holman, then brings him back to them) Holman, I'd 
like to introduce you to the Gundersons.
Holman: (shaking their hands) Congratulations! I hope you have a truly romantic 
getaway.
Sheila: Aren't you glad you watch Channel Five weather?
Scully: (showing badge) We're Agents Mulder and Scully. We're with the FBI.
Sheila: FBI? Oh, my goodness! I thought you were the "Watch the Weather and 
Win" contest winners.
Holman: See, we haven't had any rain in months and... well, people tend to 
blame the messenger.
Sheila: Oh, there's the Gundersons. Over here!
[The Gundersons, an older, plain-looking farm couple come over. They look 
nothing like Mulder and Scully.]
Mulder: (smiling at Scully) It's like looking in a mirror.
%
Mulder: How do you explain your unique ability?
Daryl: I don't. It's complicated.
Mulder: Try me. I watch the Weather Channel.
Daryl: If you're wondering did I ask for this gift no, sir, I did not, no more 
than I asked to lose this here limb. But I should've expected it and I'll tell 
you why. Because I come from a long line of healing people. I'm a spiritual 
man, in touch... with the really real. The... the unseen real.
%
Hotel manager: Oh, miss, we moved your boyfriend's things into your room.
Scully: He's my partner, and we prefer separate rooms.
Hotel manager: Oh, old-fashioned are you, huh? Well, we're booked solid with 
the high school reunion. You can take it or leave it.
%
Mulder: Scully, I don't think it's a coincidence that a cow gets hurled at me 
just as we're down here investigating the weather.
Scully: (checking his scalp and forehead) Mulder, did they check you for head 
trauma?
Mulder: I'm telling you, that cow had my name on it.
%
Scully: (on phone) Mulder, it's me.
Mulder: (on phone) I'm on my way.
Scully: I'm not so sure. Have you looked outside lately? It's pea soup. Our 
plane can't take off until after this fog lifts.
Mulder: Fog? (looks accusingly at Holman) Holman!
[Holman shrugs.]
Scully: Holman?
Mulder: Yeah... he wants advice. Dating advice.
Scully: Dating advice? From whom?
Mulder: Yours truly. (VERY long pause) Hello? Hey, Scully. Scully, you there?
Scully: I heard you. Mulder, when was the last time you went on a date?
Mulder: (pauses; in a controlled way, one word at a time) I will talk to you 
later.
Scully: (to herself, after hanging up) The blind leading the blind.
%
Holman: I've been envious of men like you my whole life. Based on your physical 
bearing, I'd assumed you were... More experienced. I mean... You spend every 
day with agent Scully a beautiful, enchanting woman. And you two never, uh...? 
(no response from Mulder) I... confess I find that shocking. I... I've seen how 
you two gaze at one another.
[Long pause. Mulder puts his arm on Holman's shoulders; they walk toward 
Sheila's office.]
Mulder: This is about you, Holman. I'm here to help you. I'm perfectly happy 
with my friendship with Agent Scully.
Holman: So according to your theory I walk in there, tell her I love her and 
the drought will end?
Mulder: Just tell her how you feel. (Holman starts walking inside) And Holman. 
I do not gaze at Scully.
%
Scully: (about Sheila and Holman) Well, it seems to me that the best 
relationships - the ones that last - are frequently the ones that are rooted in 
friendship. You know, one day you look at the person and you see something more 
than you did the night before. Like a switch has been flicked somewhere. And 
the person who was just a friend is... suddenly the only person you can ever 
imagine yourself with. (seems to realize she could be talking about herself and 
Mulder)
%
[All the couples at the reunion are dancing and kissing, including Holman and 
Sheila.]
Mulder: I didn't know reunions could be so...
Scully: Wet?
[Holman and Sheila approach.]
Mulder: Well, how'd it go?
Holman: You should try it sometime.
%
SKINNER: (voiceover) Every minute of every day we choose. Who we are. Who we 
forgive. Who we defend and protect. To choose a side or to walk the line. To 
play the middle. To straddle the fence between what is and what should be. This 
was the course I chose. Trying to find the delicate balance of interests that 
can never exist. Choosing by not choosing. Defending a center which cannot 
hold. So death chose for me.
%
Mulder: What happened today? Anything out of the ordinary?
Skinner: I'm not going to play this game.
Scully: Look, it could've been anything. It could have been the slightest 
touch, or a handshake.
Mulder: This morning, you woke up...
Skinner: I woke up.
Mulder: Alone?
Skinner: (defensive) Yes. Alone.
%
Tunisian diplomat: (something Arabic and angry)
Mulder: Yeah, so's your mom.
%
Skinner's assistant: (hearing someone going through Skinner's things in his 
office, opens the door) Sir? Is that you? (sees that it's actually Mulder) 
Agent Mulder!
Mulder: Hey, do you have the key to this drawer?
%
Mulder: (looking at hairs from a blonde wig) Don't hate me 'cause I'm beautiful.
%
[Scully enters Skinner's room at the hospital. He looks very sick, but smiles 
as she enters.]
Scully: Sir, there's something I'd like to try. It's a treatment called 
therapeutic plasmapheresis. It requires filtering all of the blood in your 
body. It's a radical procedure and there is a danger that your body might go 
into shock.
Skinner: I'm in your hands. (weakly) I think I owe you an apology, Scully. You 
and Mulder.
Scully: Sir?
Skinner: I've been lying here thinking. Your quest... it should have been mine.
Scully: What do you mean?
Skinner: If I die now, I die in vain. I have nothing to show for myself. My 
life...
Scully: Sir, you know that's not true.
Skinner: It is. I can see now that... I always played it safe. I wouldn't take 
sides. Wouldn't let you and Mulder... pull me in.
Scully: You've been our ally more times than I can say.
Skinner: Not the kind of ally that I could have been. (Scully touches his wrist 
gently)
%
Mulder: So they're splitting us up, huh?
Scully: (firmly) No.
Mulder: No?
Scully: This is a one-time thing.
Mulder: Who told you that? Obviously, if you do a good job they're not going to 
stick you back here. (Scully sees Ritter coming in) Right?
Agent Ritter: Agent Scully, we're all set.
Scully: Peyton Ritter, this is Fox Mulder.
Agent Ritter: It's a pleasure to meet you, Fox.
Mulder: (stays seated; polite, but unenthusiastic) A pleasure to meet you... 
Peyton.
Scully: We should get going.
Agent Ritter: Off to New York.
[The two of them leave; Mulder watches them go wistfully.]
%
Scully: (on phone) Scully.
Mulder: (on phone, disguising his voice jokingly) Hi. My name is Fox Mulder. We 
used to sit next to each other at the FBI. (both smile)
%
Scully: (on phone) I don't know what to think. (looks up as Fellig passes her) 
He's, uh... unusual.
Mulder: (on phone) As in he, uh, plugs up like a cork when you stab him? 
(looking at an image of Fellig's stab wounds on his computer)
Scully: Mulder, where are you getting this stuff?
Mulder: Well, young man Ritter has been sending progress reports to Kersh. My 
computer may have inadvertently intercepted a few of those. He's got nice 
things to say about you, though... mostly. Why don't you let me do a little 
background check on Fellig for you.
Scully: Mulder...
Mulder: Come on. It's, you know... it's what I do now. I'm getting good at it.
[Scully sighs.]
%
Scully: He's right. Tell me, Ritter, did he have any help concocting that story?
Agent Ritter: (defensive) Look, Fellig is a murderer. Whether or not he did 
this specific one, I don't care-- not if it buys me a few days in the box with 
him.
Scully: No judge is going to issue a warrant based on this.
Agent Ritter: No, no, no. I know the judge. We'll have it by noon. (she stares 
at him in shock, then turns to leave) You know, Kersh warned me about you.
Scully: Uh, he did?
Agent Ritter: Yeah - you and your partner. God knows his reputation precedes 
him so I guess I should have seen this coming. You muck up my case, and 
Kersh'll hear about it. Are we clear, Dana?
Scully: (coldly correcting him) Scully. (cell phone rings) And we're done with 
this conversation.
%
Mulder: (on phone) Hey, Scully, uh, how's that X-File coming? And before you 
tell me that it's not an X-File...
Scully: (on phone) It is.
Mulder: What happened?
Scully: Alfred Fellig seems to know an awful lot about death.
Mulder: Oh, yeah? Well, that's not surprising, given that he's reached the ripe 
old age of 149.
%
Mulder: Want to know what L.H. Rice's birthday is? April 4, 1849. I'm not good 
at math, but I'm figuring that's a whole lot of candles on the cake.
%
[A group of men are in a basketball court playing, including Mulder. He makes a 
basket; stops when Scully enters the gym.]
Basketball player: (to Mulder) Hey, Milk, let's play ball. (Mulder waits for 
Scully to walk closer; player is irritated) Yo, Homestyle, cough up the rock.
[Mulder throws the ball over his shoulder; catches it when thrown back and 
casually makes a basket.]
Mulder: Game.
Basketball player: (shaking his hand) Oh, no, no. Aw, it don't work like that.
Mulder: (joining Scully, ignoring the game) Hey, Homegirl, word up.
Scully: Mulder it's my distinct impression that you just cheated. And that 
you're not coming in again today.
Mulder: Oh, Scully, I got game.
Scully: Yeah, you got so much game I'm wondering if you have any work left in 
you.
Mulder: No, I'm ready to J-O-B just not on some jagoff shoeshine tip.
Scully: (VERY small smile) No "jagoff shoeshine tip"?
Mulder: (smile) No background checkin' jagoff shoeshine tip.
Scully: Well, about your J-O-B, Mulder somebody's been trying very hard to 
reach you by phone. Somebody who wants you back at the FBI ASAP.
Mulder: (more serious) About what?
Scully: About an X-File.
%
Mulder: You looking for work, Agent Spender? 'Cause if you are, I got a whole 
pile in that middle drawer that I'd love to shove down someone's throat.
Spender: I was just writing you a note. I think you know why I'm here.
Mulder: They found your mother.
Spender: She wants to talk to you.
Mulder: I didn't hear the magic word.
Spender: Look, Agent Mulder, I'm not going to get down on my knees here.
Mulder: Are you asking me, Agent Spender?
Spender: My mother's been gone for almost a year. She turns up in a train car 
where she's been operated on by a group of doctors who were burned alive. I 
just want the truth.
Mulder: The truth is out there, Agent Spender. Maybe you should find it for 
yourself.
%
Cassandra Spender: Agent Mulder?
Mulder: Shh. Shhh. Shhhh.
Cassandra Spender: Oh, my god. (laughing) Oh, my god, I think I'm going to pee 
the floor.
Mulder: (nervous chuckle) Don't... don't do that.
%
Mulder: (opening voiceover; about Cigarette Smoking Man and his father, Bill 
Mulder) Two men, young, idealistic - the fine product of a generation hardened 
by world war. Two fathers whose paths would converge in a new battle - an 
invisible war between a silent enemy and a sleeping giant on a scale to dwarf 
all historical conflicts. A 50-years war, its killing fields lying in wait for 
the inevitable global holocaust. Theirs was the dawn of Armageddon. And while 
the world was unaware, unwitting spectators to the hurly-burly of the 
decades-long struggle between heaven and earth there were those who prepared 
for the end; who measured the size and power of the enemy, and faced the 
choices: stand and fight, or bow to the will of a fearsome enemy. Or to 
surrender - to yield and collaborate. To save themselves and stay their enemy's 
hand. Men who believed that victory was the absence of defeat and survival the 
ultimate ideology... No matter what the sacrifice.
%
Mulder: There must be some kind of mistake. I signed up for the aroma therapy 
treatment.
%
Scully: (frustrated) They've burned our clothes.
Mulder: Hey... I heard gray is the new black.
Scully: Mulder, this stinks, and not just because I think that woman is a... 
well, I think you know what I think that woman is.
Mulder: (dryly) No. Actually, you hide your feelings very well.
%
Mulder: (pointing gun at him) Sorry. Nobody home. What are you doing here?
Cigarette Smoking Man: The door was open. I came in.
Mulder: Interesting company you keep.
Cigarette Smoking Man: No more interesting than your apparent... lingerie 
fetish.
%
AD Kersh: The way these people died... the loss of life here - it is beyond 
words. I can't imagine how it must be for you - losing your mother.
Spender: Yes, sir. But that's not why I asked for this meeting.
AD Kersh: Why did you ask for it?
Spender: Because I'm responsible for the deaths of those people at the Air Base 
hangar in no small way. I certainly didn't prevent them.
AD Kersh: I can assume then you can explain how they died? Because I have yet 
to hear any explanation.
Spender: Agent Mulder can explain it. I think Agent Scully, to an extent. They 
might have even prevented what you see in those photos.
AD Kersh: Agents Scully and Mulder have been suspended by the FBI.
Spender: Also my doing... and my mistake.
AD Kersh: I would ask...
Spender: I'd ask, sir - before you tell me that it's not my business - that you 
do everything you can to get them back on the X-Files. Far worse can happen... 
and it will.
AD Kersh: Where are you going?
Spender: To pack up my office.
AD Kersh: Agent Spender... (Spender leaves; Kersh turns to Mulder, angrily) You 
have answers now? Why didn't I hear about those answers before?
Mulder: I've had answers for years.
AD Kersh: Then why didn't we hear about them?
Mulder: No one would ever listen.
AD Kersh: Who burned those people?
Mulder: They burned themselves. With a choice made long ago by a conspiracy of 
men who thought they could sleep with the enemy. Only to awaken another enemy.
AD Kersh: What the hell does that mean?
Mulder: It means the future is here, and all bets are off.
AD Kersh: Agent Scully, make some sense.
Scully: Sir, I wouldn't bet against him.
%
[Cigarette Smoking Man sits in the X-Files office looking at picture of himself 
and Bill Mulder; Spender enters.]
Spender: Get out of here.
Cigarette Smoking Man: This picture you have - I haven't seen it since you were 
born. You probably don't even know who the other man is.
Spender: I don't care. Get out.
Cigarette Smoking Man: It's Bill Mulder, Fox Mulder's father. Isn't that 
something. He was a good man... a friend of mine... who betrayed me in the end.
Spender: I know more than enough about your past... enough to hate you.
Cigarette Smoking Man: Your mother was right. I came here hoping otherwise. 
(takes out gun) Hoping that my son... might live to honor me... ...like Bill 
Mulder's son. (takes out his gun and fires, then leaves the office)
%
Deputy Greer: Oh, no. You're going to kill me.
Mulder: (annoyed) No, I'm not, but I'd like to.
Scully: (holds up badge) Deputy...
Deputy Greer: (surprised) The FBI? For real?
Scully: (smiles tightly; nods) I'll be in the car.
%
Mulder: (in nature documentary narrator voice) If the sea is where life began - 
where our ancestors first walked ashore - then who's to say what new life may 
be developing in its uncharted depths.
Scully: You know what? Maybe you are a member of the Manson family. (he smiles)
%
Scully: Sir, it's important that we evacuate the area. We're FBI agents and we 
need to get to where we're going.
Road block deputy: (sighing) Don't all the nuts roll downhill to Florida.
Scully: (annoyed) I'd be happy to show you my ID-
Mulder: (talking over her; rolls up window) Thank you very much, sir. I 
appreciate the concern. (pissed off; turns the car and drives quickly)
Scully: Mulder.
Mulder: I was just one "howdy do" over the line.
%
Mulder: You know, Scully, someday we're going to look back on this and we're 
going to laugh. We'll just think of it as, uh... you know man pitted against 
the forces of nature. Think of it as a test of our mettle.
Scully: I don't need my mettle tested.
%
Mulder: You don't know this man, mister...?
Walter: Uh, Suarez. Walter Suarez. (shines light at looter) Uh, no. He's not 
with you?
Looter: (looks at Mulder awkwardly) I'll put it back.
Mulder: Yeah. Everything in your pockets, too.
%
Angela: (pushing toward bathroom) Supertanker coming through.
Walter: Here, Angela, you can't go in there.
Angela: My bladder is pressing against your unborn child, Walter. He's going to 
have a head like a tortilla.
Walter: This thing is in the plumbing!
Angela: The volume alone could push it right back out to sea!
%
Arthur Dales: Oh, it's amazing. It's truly amazing.
Scully: What's that?
Arthur Dales: That you could come here in the face of a hurricane chasing a sea 
monster, yet, and end up bringing a new life into the world. And then slaying 
the monster and save this one's life as he was quite literally circling down 
the drain.
Mulder: (embarrassed) She didn't save my life, really...
Arthur Dales: Oh, yes, she did. Yes, with a gun to her head, no less.
Scully: (rationalizing) Well, you wouldn't have known to go out in the rain if 
I hadn't pointed it out that to you that it was the fresh water that killed the 
organism...
Mulder: No. No no no no... I-I saw the Shipley's cat!
Arthur Dales: Uh, well, I-I can't swallow that... No, no, no.
Mulder: I saw the cat, which had been saved which had been in the washing 
machine. And the Shipleys had boarded up their house which means that the only 
way they could have vanished was if the creature came up through the plumbing 
in a backwash of seawater. Seawater. And then the deputy who vanished from a 
bathtub full of Epsom salts.
Arthur Dales: If Agent Scully had not been there with you, I shudder to think 
what would have happened to you. I'd say you owe her your life. It takes a big 
man to admit this, but... if I had had someone as savvy as her by my side all 
those years ago in the X-Files I might not have retired. (both Mulder and 
Scully look a little embarrassed)
%
Mulder: I know. I missed the meeting.
Scully: You didn't miss the meeting. You're extraordinarily late for the 
meeting. It's still going on.
Mulder: What are you doing down here?
Scully: We took a short break and I came looking for you. What are you doing 
down here, Mulder?
Mulder: (sarcastically) I'm having the best damn day of my life. Any moment I'm 
about to burst into song. (dryly) "Zip a dee doo dah." My, uh, waterbed sprung 
a leak and shorted out my alarm clock. (Scully looks surprised) My cell phone 
got wet and crapped out on me and the check I wrote my landlord to cover the, 
uh, damages is going to bounce if I don't deposit my pay. You ever have one of 
those days, Scully?
Scully: Since I've been working here? Yeah. When did you get a waterbed, Mulder?
Mulder: (he pauses, thinking; ignores the question) Bank's just down the 
street. I'll be back in ten. Cover for me, will you? (leaves)
Scully: (to herself) When do I not?
%
Mulder: I know. I missed the meeting.
Scully: Well, not yet, but, uh, only because it's the longest in FBI history.
Mulder: What are you doing down here, then?
Scully: Well, I came looking for you. We took a five-minute break (looks at 
watch) three minutes ago. Mulder, your cell phone's not working. (He glances up 
at her.) Did you oversleep?
Mulder: Scully, did you ever have one of those days you wish you could rewind 
and start all over again from the beginning?
Scully: Yes. Frequently. But, I mean, who's... who's to say that if you did 
rewind it and start over again that it wouldn't end up exactly the same way?
Mulder: So you think it's all just fate? We have no free will?
Scully: No, I think that we're free to be the people that we are - good, bad or 
indifferent. I think that it's our character that determines our fate.
Mulder: And all the rest is just preordained? I don't buy that. There's too 
many variables. Too many forks in the road. I meant to be on time to work this 
morning but my waterbed springs a leak flooding my apartment (Scully looks 
surprised) and the apartment below me so that makes me late for the meeting. 
Then I realize I got to write a check to cover the damages to my landlord but, 
as I'm walking to work, I realize that that's gonna bounce unless I deposit my 
pay. So now I got to go to the bank, which makes me even later.
Scully: (curious) Since when did you get a waterbed?
Mulder: I might just as easily not have a waterbed then I'd be on time for this 
meeting. You might just as easily have stayed in medicine and not gone into the 
FBI, and then we would never have met. Blah, blah, blah...
Scully: Fate.
Mulder: Free will. With every choice, you change your fate.
%
Mulder: I just got the weirdest sensation of deja vu. I've been having it all 
morning.
Scully: Well, that's fairly common.
Mulder: Yeah, but never to this degree. I mean, I woke up, I opened my eyes I 
was soaking wet... (Scully looks confused and curious) It's a long story but I 
had the distinct sensation that I had lived that moment before.
Scully: Well, you may have. Did you do a lot of drinking in college?
%
Mulder: (about the very strict neighborhood) Oh, yeah. Nothing weird going on 
around here. (following Scully into the house) Hey... ooh, wait a minute. You 
didn't let me carry you over the threshold.
%
Pat Verlander: (very friendly) You must be the Petries. Hi. Welcome. Welcome to 
The Falls.
Mulder: (shaking her hand) I'm Rob (puts hands on Scully's shoulders) and this 
is my lovely wife, Laura.
Pat Verlander: Rob and Laura Petrie.
Scully: We pronounce it "Pee-trie," actually.
Pat Verlander: Oh.
Mulder: (cheerfully) Like the dish!
%
Scully: (videotaping the house) The local police departments were at a dead end 
so they turned to the FBI. AD Skinner, in assigning us this case thought a 
fruitful approach to the investigation would be if we went undercover posing as 
prospective home buyers as this planned community would seem to hide a dark, 
possibly murderous conspiracy of silence.
Mulder: (gets up close to the camera; seductively) You want to make that 
honeymoon video now?
Scully: Rob and Laura Petrie?
Mulder: "Pee-trie."
Scully: Mulder, if we ever go undercover again I get to choose the names, okay?
Mulder: Fine.
Scully: It just tells me that you're not taking this seriously.
Mulder: I'm taking it seriously. I just don't understand why we're on it. It's 
our first catch back on the X-Files. This isn't an X-File.
Scully: Sure it is. It's unexplained. What do you want, aliens? Tractor beams?
Mulder: Wow. Admit it: you just want to play house. (demanding, jokingly) 
Woman, get back in here and make me a sandwich! (She stops, smiles slightly; 
throws her latex gloves at at his head; heads toward the door) Did I not make 
myself clear?
%
Scully: Mulder...
Mulder: The name... is Rob.
%
Mulder: Morning.
Win Shroeder: Oh! Oh, Rob, Laura. ("accidentally?" sprays their legs with the 
hose) I'm so sorry. So, good morning. So how was your first night? Peaceful?
Mulder: (looking fondly at Scully) Oh, it was wonderful. We just spooned up and 
fell asleep like little baby cats. Isn't that right, Honeybunch?
Scully: (forced smile) That's right, Poopyhead.
%
Gene Gogolak: All right, then, let's see. Basketball hoop and backboard. 
Portable. Nope, I'm sorry. It's not allowed.
Mulder: You're kidding?
Gene Gogolak: I'm afraid not. Rules are rules. It may not sound like anything-- 
a simple basketball hoop-- but from there, it's just a few short steps to 
spinning daisy reflectors and a bass boat in the driveway.
Mulder: In other words, anarchy.
%
Win Shroeder: Sweetheart? Did you use the dolphin-safe tuna this time?
Cami Shroeder: Dolphin-safe all the way, Honey.
Win Shroeder: We always use the dolphin-safe.
Mulder: (eating) You've got to love those dolphins ... although they're pretty 
tasty, too.
[Win and Cami look shocked and horrified; Scully laughs awkwardly to try to 
break the tension.]
Win Shroeder: So... where'd you two meet?
[Scully opens her mouth to speak but is interrupted by Mulder.]
Mulder: Actually, it was at a UFO conference.
Win Shroeder: Flying saucers? Interesting. Wouldn't have thought you folks 
would have been into that.
Mulder: (puts arm around Scully) Well, it's not me so much as Laura. She's 
quite the New-Ager. I mean, she's into those magnetic bracelets and crystals 
and mood rings, what have you. I mean, God bless her she's a sucker for all 
that stuff.
Cami Shroeder: Well, I wouldn't have guessed that, would you?
Win Shroeder: Mm-mm.
Scully: (fake smile) No kidding.
%
Mulder: Yeah, there's no sign of him in his house. I didn't see him in the 
storm drain, either. I take it he's dead, Scully.
Scully: (correcting him, from the bathroom) Laura.
[Mulder sarcastically mouths "Okay.")
%
Scully: (from the bathroom) Mulder, speaking of cleaning up, whoever taught you 
how to squeeze a tube of toothpaste? (Her arm, coming from the bathroom 
doorway, shows him the tube squeezed in the middle; he ignores it)
Mulder: Hey, what do we know about this stuff?
Scully: I'm driving down to San Diego tomorrow and have it analyzed.
Mulder: All right.
Scully: Third warning: (sound of toilet seat falling) Toilet seat. (toilet 
flushes)
Mulder: (sprawls out on the bed) Why kill Big Mike? (Scully comes out of the 
bathroom wearing a bright green mud mask; Mulder looks up and is startled) Whoa!
Scully: What's missing here is intent. What would be the motive? (throws 
sweatshirt at his head)
Mulder: Compulsive neatness, or a lack thereof. Have you noticed how everybody 
around here is obsessed with the neighborhood rules and the CC&Rs? You know 
what? You fit in really well here.
Scully: (pointedly looking at him lying on the bed) And you don't.
Mulder: (adjusting the pillows) Well, anyway, tomorrow I got a, uh, a surefire 
way of testing out my theory. (pats the bed beside him seductively; waggles his 
eyebrows at her; she raises her eyebrows; he tries coaxing) Come on, Laura, you 
know... we're married now.
Scully: (correcting) Scully, Mulder. Good night.
Mulder: (gets up and takes a pillow; pauses next to her; looks very serious) 
The thrill is gone. (Scully sighs)
%
[Mulder has just put a pink plastic flamingo in the front yard; looks around 
confidently and pumps his fists]
Mulder: Bring it on.
%
Scully: Look, Mulder, huge creatures aside do you care to hear what I think?
Mulder: (not quite sarcastic) Always.
%
Scully: (walking in to the X-Files office, where Mulder is pinning pictures to 
the wall) Aren't you going home?
Mulder: (not turning around) I am home. I'm just feathering the nest.
%
Scully: (looking through the file) What happened to the dog?
Mulder: (sitting close to her) Dog gone... Dog gone... (proudly) Doggone.
Scully: (dryly) Yeah, I got it.
%
Scully: (stares at him) You're not going to tell me that a dog did this.
Mulder: (sounding serious, but grinning) A bad dog.
%
Scully: (looking in the crate) What did you find?
Officer Jeffrey Cahn: Nothing conclusive, really, but I can tell you the dog's 
not likely still on the ship.
Mulder: How did you determine that?
Officer Jeffrey Cahn: You ever owned a dog, sir?
Mulder: Yeah.
Officer Jeffrey Cahn: Had to clean up after it? (Mulder grins and agrees)
Scully: I don't suppose you can tell us what kind of dog this is.
Officer Jeffrey Cahn: I'm not really sure. The man it was shipped to's name is 
Detweiler. Dr. Ian Detweiler. Calls himself a "cryptozoologist."
Mulder: (interested) Cryptozoologist?
Officer Jeffrey Cahn: They deal with animals thought to be extinct.
Mulder: (continuing) Animals that aren't supposed to exist like Sasquatch and 
the Ogopogo and the Abominable Snowman and-
Scully: (interrupting) Don't mind him. He'll go on forever.
%
Scully: Jake Conroy, age 30. He was employed as a customs agent by the Federal 
Government. The bite marks match those of the victims on the Chinese freighter. 
In this case, it bit off the man's hand. There's some talk in the house that he 
may be involved in the theft of the animal and that it turned on him.
Mulder: Talk about biting the hand that feeds you.
%
Mulder: I think we're speaking in too common terms about an animal we're 
calling a dog but which displays none of the behavior of man's best friend.
Scully: You mean covering up crime scenes?
Mulder: (smiles) You get a biscuit, Scully.
%
Stacy: You two looking for Karin about boarding?
Mulder: No, it's actually more of a behavior problem.
Scully: (glancing up at Mulder) Yeah, he doesn't listen and he chews on the 
furniture.
%
Scully: (reading some of Karin's book titles) Ah. "The Wolf Inside." "Dogs 
Don't Lie." "Better Than Human." (pause) "Better Than Human?"
Mulder: (shrugging apologetically) She's not a real people person.
%
Mulder: Everything okay, Scully?
Scully: How well do you know this woman, Mulder?
Mulder: How well do you know anybody you meet on the Internet? She likes to 
talk.
Scully: Well, I question her motives.
Mulder: You're suggesting that this case was a way to get me out here, to meet 
me? (no response; Mulder smiles) I'm flattered, but, no. I don't know this 
woman. I'd go out on a limb and say there's no way in hell she has anything to 
do with those four people being dead.
Scully: She's enamored of you, Mulder. Don't underestimate a woman. They can be 
tricksters, too. (They share a look.)
%
Karin Berquist: Where's Fox?
Scully: Continuing his investigation.
Karin Berquist: You're not working together?
Scully: No. This is my investigation.
Karin Berquist: Of...?
Scully: You.
Karin Berquist: I have no idea what you mean.
Scully: I thought at first that they were eccentricities or affectations - the 
dark, the clothes - but it's photosensitivity. Your sleeves cover up skin 
lesions. It's why you're here amongst the humans instead of out in the field. 
Systemic lupus erythematosus.
Karin Berquist: Lupus... From the Latin for "wolf." Ironic, isn't it?
Scully: Ironic or perverse?
Karin Berquist: I've ignored the symptoms for years. I've always felt more like 
a wolf than a person.
Scully: But not with Mulder. With Mulder, you found somebody you could 
communicate with.... someone who challenged you... But that wasn't enough. You 
needed to lure him out here.
Karin Berquist: (flatly) I lack your feminine wiles.
Scully: (looks away for a moment) You don't believe it, do you - not for a 
minute - that there's an animal out there killing?
Karin Berquist: I don't believe that this man, Dr. Detweiler, ever caught it. I 
lived in Asia. I know about the Wanshang Dhole and if it survived for over a 
century it was because it was more cunning than man, more cunning than this man 
Detweiler ever dreamed of.
Scully: More cunning than you? (Karin looks surprised; Scully warns her) I'm 
watching you.
Karin Berquist: You watch... But you don't see.
%
Mulder: Through some blood curse, this man undergoes some kind of nocturnal 
transformation. He becomes the same shape-shifting trickster as that mythical 
dog.
Scully: So, what is he going to do? Walk in here, skitter across the linoleum 
and pee in the corners?
Mulder: It's about territoriality. He's going to come back here tonight to make 
sure his dominance isn't challenged. He's going to put down the threat he 
failed to eliminate when he attacked Cahn. Karin Berquist confirmed it.
Scully: Mulder, the only thing Karin Berquist is interested in is you. (he 
chuckles dismissively) You're kidding yourself if you think that she hasn't 
manipulated this entire situation for her own purposes.
%
Scully: (about the body, chopped in half) Should we arrest David Copperfield?
Mulder: (seriously) Yes, we should... but not for this.
%
Scully: I don't know. It's not a simple bisection. There's a considerable 
amount of his abdomen missing. I mean, it almost looks like a burning but it's 
too localized. Maybe an industrial acid.
Mulder: (looking at the report) There's, um... no acid found in his office.
Scully: Oh. (long pause; seriously) Spontaneous human combustion.
Mulder: (grinning happily in disbelief) Scully...!
Scully: Well, isn't that where you're going with this?
Mulder: (smiling) "Dear Diary: Today my heart leapt when Agent Scully suggested 
spontaneous human combustion."
Scully: (defensive) Mulder, there are one or two somewhat well-documented 
cases. (He says nothing; looks off to the side and nods thoughtfully; she 
sighs) Mulder, shut up. (He tries to look innocent and totally fails)
%
Phillip Padgett: (voiceover, as Scully looks at the charm left under Mulder's 
door) Her prompt mind ran through the golconda of possibilities - was this 
trinket from the killer? Was there a message contained in its equivocal 
symbolism? Was he a religious fanatic who had, in fervid haste licked the 
envelope, leaving the telltale DNA that would begin his unraveling? She had a 
condign certainty the killer was a male... and now, as she held the cold metal 
at her fingertips she imagined him doing the same trying to picture his face.
Phillip Padgett: It would be a plain face, an average face... A face people 
would be prone to trust. She knew this inherently, being naturally trusting 
herself. But the image she conjured up was no better than the useless sketch 
composites that littered her files. Preconsciously, she knew this wasn't her 
strength as an investigator. She was a marshall of cold facts, quick to 
organize, connect, shuffle, reorder and synthesize their relative hard values 
into discreet categories. Imprecision would only invite sexist criticism that 
she was soft, malleable not up to her male counterparts.
Phillip Padgett: Even now, as she pushed an errant strand of titian hair behind 
her ear she worried her partner would know instinctively what she could only 
guess. To be thought of as simply a beautiful woman was bridling, unthinkable. 
But she was beautiful... fatally, stunningly prepossessing. Yet the 
compensatory respect she commanded only deepened the yearnings of her heart... 
to let it open, to let someone in.
%
[Scully enters a church to look at a painting of Christ with a burning heart. 
Phillip Padgett comes up next to her.]
Phillip Padgett: I often come here to look at this painting. It's called "My 
Divine Heart" after the miracle of Saint Margaret Mary. Do you know the 
story... The revelation of the Sacred Heart? Christ came to Margaret Mary his 
heart so inflamed with love that it was no longer able to contain its burning 
flames of charity. Margaret Mary... so filled with divine love herself, asked 
the Lord to take her heart... and so he did placing it alongside his until it 
burned with the flames of his passion. Then he restored it to Margaret Mary 
sealing her wound with the touch of his blessed hand.
Scully: Why are you telling me this?
Phillip Padgett: You came here specifically to see this painting, didn't you?
Scully: Yes. How did you know that?
Phillip Padgett: I saw you enter. The way you knew right where it was.
Scully: I know you. You live next to somebody I work with. Why are you 
following me?
Phillip Padgett: I'm not. I'd only imagined that you'd come here today.
Scully: You imagined it.
Phillip Padgett: Yes.
Scully: (dryly) Yeah.
Phillip Padgett: I'm a writer. That's what I do - imagine how people behave. I 
have to admit I've noticed you. I do that... Notice people. I saw that you wear 
a gold cross around your neck so I was taking a chance with the painting - 
explaining something you may have already known. I saw Georgetown parking 
permits on your car dating from 1993 and a government-exempt sticker that lets 
you park anywhere you like. You don't live in this area but as a federal 
employee, you have reason to frequent it. You're fit, with muscular calves so 
you must exercise or run. There's a popular running route right nearby that you 
might use at lunch or after work. You'd have noticed this church in passing and 
though parking is always a problem in this part of town your special privileges 
would make it easy to visit... not as a place of worship but because you have 
an appreciation for architecture and the arts... and while the grandeur is what 
you'd take away from your visit, this painting's religious symbolism would have 
left a subconscious impression jogged by the gift you received this morning.
Phillip Padgett: I have to admit to a secret attraction. (she looks away and 
rolls her eyes) I'm sorry I didn't include a note explaining that but you 
didn't know me then.
Scully: Yeah, and I don't know you now and I don't care to.
Phillip Padgett: I see this is making you uncomfortable (she rolls her eyes, 
like "obviously") and I'm sorry. It's just that I'm taken with you. That never 
happens to me. We're alike that way.
%
Phillip Padgett: (voiceover) The overture in the church had urged the beautiful 
agent's partner into an act of Hegelian self-justification. Expeditiously 
violating the fourth amendment against mail theft, he prepared to impudently 
infract the first. But if she'd predictably aroused her sly partner's 
suspicions Special Agent Dana Scully had herself become... simply aroused.
[Cuts to scene of Scully and Padget in bed together.]
Phillip Padgett: (voiceover) She felt an involuntary flush and rebuked herself 
for the girlish indulgence. But the images came perforce and she let them 
play-- let them flood in like savory-- or more a sugary confection-- from her 
adolescence when her senses were new and ungoverned by fear and self-denial. 
'Ache,' 'pang,' 'prick,' 'twinge'-- how ironic the Victorian vocabulary of 
behavioral pathology now so perfectly described the palpations of her own 
desire. The stranger had looked her in the eye and knew her more completely 
than she knew herself. She felt wild, feral, guilty as a criminal. Had the 
stranger unleashed in her what was already there or only helped her discover a 
landscape she, by necessity, blinded herself to? What would her partner think 
of her?
%
Phillip Padgett: Best not to question it. (pause) See? You are curious about me.
Scully: Well, you lead a curious life.
Phillip Padgett: It's not so different from yours I imagine - lonely.
Scully: (looks away) Loneliness is a choice.
%
Phillip Padgett: I made a mistake myself.
Mulder: What's that, Mr. Padgett?
Phillip Padgett: In my book, I'd written that Agent Scully falls in love but 
that's obviously impossible. (looking at Mulder) Agent Scully is already in 
love.
%
Phillip Padgett: But what is the truth?
Ken Naciamento: Man imagines that he, too, can open up his heart and expose the 
burning passion - the flames of charity - like the creator himself but this is 
not in his power.
Phillip Padgett: But I have love in my heart.
Ken Naciamento: Yes, as a thief has riches, a usurer money. You have it... but 
man's only power, only true power is to destroy it.
Phillip Padgett: Then what's the end of my story?
Ken Naciamento: There can only be one true ending if it is to be perfect.
Phillip Padgett: She dies?
Ken Naciamento: See? It almost writes itself.
%
Scully: Mulder, it is such a gorgeous day outside. Have you ever entertained 
the idea of trying to find life on this planet?
Mulder: I have seen the life on this planet, Scully, and that is exactly why I 
am looking elsewhere. (Scully opens a paper bag and takes out something that 
looks like ice cream) Did you bring enough ice cream to share with the rest of 
the class?
Scully: (smugly, eating) It's not ice cream. It's a nonfat tofutti rice 
dreamsicle.
Mulder: (returning to his book, disgusted) Ugh. Bet the air in my mouth tastes 
better than that. You sure know how to live it up, Scully.
Scully: (continuing to eat) Oh, you're Mr. Live-it-up. Mulder, you're really 
Mr. Squeeze-every-last-drop-out-of-this-sweet-life, aren't you? On this 
precious Saturday you've got us grabbing life by the testes - stealing 
reference books from the FBI library in order to go through New Mexico 
newspaper obituaries for the years 1940 to 1949, and for what joyful purpose?
Mulder: Looking for anomalies, Scully. Do you know how many so-called "flying 
disc" reports there were in New Mexico in the 1940s?
Scully: I don't care. Mulder, this is a needle in a haystack. These poor souls 
have been dead for 50 years. Let them rest in peace. Let sleeping dogs lie.
Mulder: No, I won't sit idly by as you hurl cliches at me. "Preparation is the 
father of inspiration."
Scully: "Necessity is the mother of invention."
Mulder: "The road of excess leads to the palace of wisdom."
Scully: (taking another bite) "Eat, drink and be merry, for tomorrow we may 
die."
Mulder: "I scream, you scream, we all scream for"- nonfat tofutti rice 
dreamsicles! (sets the book down; lunges for Scully. He grabs her arm and takes 
a bite of the dreamsicle, breaking it; it splatters on the page)
Scully: No-ho-ho-ho-ho-ho! (laughing) Mulder! (she looks at the page; 
accusingly) Mulder!? You cheat. I can't believe that you've been reading about 
baseball this whole time.
Mulder: Reading the box scores, Scully. You'd like it. It's like the 
Pythagorean Theorem for jocks. It distills all the chaos and action of any game 
in the history of all baseball games into one tiny, perfect, rectangular 
sequence of numbers. I can look at this box and I can recreate exactly what 
happened on some sunny summer day back in 1947. It's like the numbers talk to 
me, they comfort me. They tell me that even though lots of things can change 
some things do remain the same. It's...
Scully: (interrupting) Boring. Mulder, can I ask you a personal question?
Mulder: Of course not.
Scully: Did your mother ever tell you to go outside and play? Mulder?
Mulder: (looking at the page the ice cream spilled on; to himself) Is that 
...Arthur Dales?
Scully: Mulder?
Mulder: (fake) Ah... Choo! (fake sneezes and rips the page out; Scully pretends 
to be horrified)
Scully: You just defaced property of the U.S. Government. (he grabs the page 
and his jacket and runs out of the office; she smiles slightly) You rebel.
%
Mulder: How do you know my name?
Arthur Dales: My brother told me all about you. He said you were the biggest 
jackass in the Bureau since he retired. (sarcastic) Yeah, we're big fans. 
Sometimes we'd stay awake hours at night just talking about you. Just 
fascinating. Now, unless you're hiding some Chinese food let's call it a day.
%
Mulder: I don't really care about the baseball, so much, sir. What I care about 
is this man in the picture with you. I believe to be an alien bounty hunter.
Arthur Dales: (opening the door a crack) Of course you don't care about the 
baseball, Mr. Mulder. You only bothered my brother about the important things 
like government conspiracies and alien bounty hunters and the truth with a 
capital "T."
Mulder: Wait a minute. I like baseball.
Arthur Dales: You like baseball, huh?
Mulder: Yeah.
Arthur Dales: How many home runs did Mickey Mantle hit?
Mulder: (thinks) 163. (Dales begins shutting the door, disappointed; Mulder 
pushes it open) Righty. 373 lefty. 536 total. (Arthur Dales nods, impressed; 
opens door all the way)
%
Arthur Dales: Mr. Mulder... maybe you'd better start paying a little less 
attention to the heart of the mystery and a little more attention to the 
mystery of the heart.
%
Young Arthur Dales: Mr. Exley, I'm not a big sports hero like yourself, sir and 
I really don't have an opinion on Negroes or Jews or Communists or even 
Canadians and vegetarians, for that matter but I cannot stomach the murder of a 
man of any persuasion or any color being flaunted and solicited in my town. 
(shows him the flyer) Not on my watch. So you can be safe with me in a cell 
down at the precinct or you can be safe with me here on the bus. Seeing as how 
this is still America you're free to choose, sir.
%
Mulder: Let me get this straight: a free-spirited alien fell in love with 
baseball and ran away from the other non-fun-having aliens and made himself 
black, because that would prevent him from getting to the majors where his 
unspeakable secret might be discovered by an intrusive press and public and 
you're also implying that...
Arthur Dales: You certainly have a knack for turning chicken salad into chicken 
spit.
Mulder: You're also implying that this baseball-playing alien has something to 
do with the famous Roswell UFO crash of July '47, aren't you?
Arthur Dales: You're just dying to connect the dots aren't you, son? Look, I 
give you some wood and I ask you for a cabinet. You build me a cathedral. I 
don't want a cathedral. I like where I live. I just want a place to put my TV. 
Understand my drift?
Mulder: (pauses) Drift it is, sir.
Arthur Dales: Trust the tale, Agent MacGyver, not the teller. That which 
fascinates us is by definition true. Speaking metaphorically, of course.
Mulder: Okay, so was Ex a man who was metaphorically an alien or an alien who 
was metaphorically a man or a something in between that was literally an 
alien-human hybrid? (Dales sighs; hands Mulder alcohol) It's official. I am a 
horse's ass.
%
Josh Exley: Don't get cornball on me, man. Next thing you'll be telling me is I 
owe it to all the little kids to break the home-run record, or I owe it to the 
black folks who think I'm one of them, to make it to the majors or I should 
just keep playing out of some meaningless human concept of pride or loyalty.
Young Arthur Dales: I don't know, Ex.
Josh Exley: We don't think like that, man. We may be able to look like y'all, 
but we ain't y'all. You know the big thing that separates us from you?
Arthur Dales: What's that?
Josh Exley: We got rhythm. (both pause, then crack up)
%
Alien Bounty Hunter: Show me your true face or you will die without honor.
Josh Exley: This is my true face.
%
[Nighttime at a baseball field; Mulder is wearing a "Grays" jersey, hitting 
balls thrown by a pitching machine.]
Scully: So, uh... I get this message marked "urgent" on my answering service 
from one "Fox Mantle" telling me to come down to the park for a very special 
very early or very late birthday present. And, Mulder... I don't see any nicely 
wrapped presents lying around so, what gives?
Mulder: You've never hit a baseball, have you, Scully?
Scully: No, I guess I have, uh... found more necessary things to do with my 
time than- (a foul ball hits the fence; she jumps) slap a piece of horsehide 
with a stick.
Mulder: Get over here, Scully. (he holds the bat out to her, she takes it, but 
he keeps his hands on it, wrapping his arms around her and holding the bat with 
her, around her hands)
Scully: (warily, not thrilled) This my birthday present, Mulder? You shouldn't 
have.
Mulder: This ain't cheap. I'm paying that kid ten bucks an hour to shag balls. 
Hey, it's not a bad piece of ash, huh? (gives him a "Look.")The bat - talking 
about the bat. Now, don't strangle it. You just want to shake hands with it. 
(doing silly voices) "Hello, Mr. Bat. It's a pleasure to make your 
acquaintance." "Oh, no, no, Ms. Scully. The pleasure's all mine." (she laughs, 
and they hold onto the bat) Okay, now, we want to... we want to go hips before 
hands, okay? (holds his hand a few inches from her hip) We want to stride 
forward and turn. That's all we're thinking about. So, we go hips... before 
hands, all right? (gingerly touches her hip and, with his hands and his own 
hips pressed against her, turns her correctly)
Scully: Okay.
Mulder: One more time. (he touches and turns her hips more confidently) Hips... 
before hands, all right?
Scully: Yeah.
Mulder: What is it?
Scully: Hips before hands.
Mulder: (speaking right into her ear) Right. We're going to wait on the pitch. 
We're going to keep our eye on the ball. Then, we're just going to make 
contact. We're not going to think. We're just going to let it fly, Scully, okay?
Scully: Mm-hmm.
Mulder: Ready? (he tries to readjust their grips on the bat; they struggle with 
it for a moment)
Scully: I'm in the middle. (gets her hands back between his; both grining)
Mulder: All right, fire away, Poorboy. (a ball comes at them; they hit it 
together) Ooh! That's good. All right, what you may find is you concentrate on 
hitting that little ball... The rest of the world just fades away - all your 
everyday, nagging concerns.
[Scully giggles; they continue hitting the ball.]
Mulder: The ticking of your biological clock. (hit) How you probably couldn't 
afford that nice, new suede coat on a G-Woman's salary. (hit) How you threw 
away a promising career in medicine... (intimately into her ear) to hunt aliens 
with a crackpot, albeit brilliant, partner.
[She gives him another "Look"]
Mulder: Getting into the heart of a global conspiracy. Your obscenely overdue 
triple-X bill. Oh, I... I'm sorry, Scully. Those last two problems are mine, 
not yours. (hit)
Scully: (smiling happily) Shut up, Mulder. I'm playing baseball.
[They continue to hit the balls. Scully laughs. As the balls fly up into the 
black, star-studded night sky, we see them turn into shooting stars.]
%
Byers: My name is John Fitzgerald Byers. I was named after our 35th president, 
and I keep having this beautiful dream. In my dream, the events of November 
22nd, 1963, never happened. In it, my namesake was never assassinated. Other 
things are different, too, in my dream. My country is hopeful and innocent; 
young again. Young in spirit. My fellow citizens trust their elect officials, 
never once having been betrayed by them. My government is truly "of the people, 
by the people, for the people." All my hopes for my country, for myself... all 
are fulfilled. I have everything a person could want: home and family... and 
love. Everything that counts for anything in life... I have it. But the dream 
ends the same way every time. I lose it all.
%
Byers: And that man that you're with...
Susanne Modeski: My fiance? I'm sorry, John, I think you better go.
Byers: No, wait. Wait. Ten years ago, I saw you thrown into a car. Kidnapped 
right in front of me. Did that not happen? Did I just dream all of that?
Susanne Modeski: It happened. But things got better.
%
Langly: What if 'they' did something to him? You know, to make him pancake 
himself?
Scully: Who's "they?"
Langly: You know... "them."
Scully: (rolling her eyes) I'll begin with the Y-incision.
%
Scully: What happened?
Langly: I'm thinking that you got a little queasy and took a header. You know, 
blood and guts can bother some people. (gags)
Scully: (seems intoxicated) Yeah. I guess.
Langly: You gonna be alright?
Scully: Sure, cutie.
[Both stand to examine Jimmy's corpse]]
Langly: So, you're done with Jimmy?
Scully: Done. Done. Done. (tries to push examining table with no success) How 
do you roll this thing?
Langly: Uh, Scully?
[Scully continues to try to figure out the examining table]
Langly: What killed him?
Scully: In my medical opinion -- BEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEP!! *claps*
Langly: And that's all you found?
Scully: That's all I know.
[Scully slips trying to push the examining table]
Langly: Scully?
%
Frohike: Hey Timmy. I'm sorry about Jimmy.
Timothy Landau: Hey Langly, the guys are all up in my room for a round of 
Dungeons and Dragons, in honor of Jimmy.
Langly: (hand on heart for a moment) Lord Manhammer will be in attendance. (to 
Frohike) I'm going to go play a little D&D, uh, in memoriam.
Frohike: That's touching, man.
%
[Frohike hears Scully's laugh, and leaves his slot machine to see her 
surrounded by a huge group of men.]
Frohike: Scully?
Scully: Aw, hey. Long time, no see. (a man whispers something into her ear) No, 
that's not nice. I like Hickey. (she rubs his head, messing up his hair. Agent 
Morris Fletcher [from Dreamland I/II] holds out a pack of cigarettes to her)
Morris: Cigarette? (she leans in and takes out a cigarette with her lips 
seductively)
Frohike: You don't smoke.
Scully: But who's got a match? (a dozen lighters are in front of her instantly) 
Well ... I just can't decide who lights my fire.
Frohike: That's it. (grabs cigarette from Scully's mouth) Alright, you dandies, 
back off. This is Special Agent Dana Scully of the FBI. If you so much as touch 
her, you may be committing a federal offense. (to Scully) Come on, come on. (he 
pulls her away)
Morris: We could have been stardust.
Scully: Maybe next time. (she slaps his ass as Frohike drags her off)
%
Scully: (laughing) Hi.
Frohike: Settle down, settle down. (sits her on the bed)
Scully: (laughing and grinning) Okay, okay, okay, okay.
Frohike: I found Agent Scully-go-lightly holding court... (Scully grabs 
Frohike's ass) ...bar!
Byers: I've never seen her drunk before ...
Modeski: (checks Scully's eyes) God, this can't be.
Scully: (she pretends to tickle her) Hi...
%
Frohike: I don't understand. Why would the government want to turn Scully into 
a bimbo?
%
Scully: Hello, Mulder? Can you hear me? I'm at the hotel. Where are you? What 
do you mean, "What hotel?" Las Vegas. I'm in Las Vegas, aren't you? You called 
me. What do you mean you didn't call me? ...Oh, man, I am going to kick their 
asses.
%
Frohike: So you want to hit the slots?
Langly: You know, Byers, growing old with us ain't so bad.
Frohike: Oh, shut up, Langly. You really want him to kill himself?
%
Mulder: It doesn’t sound like you Scully. I can’t believe you’re buying 
this.
Scully: Mulder, I’m admitting that I was wrong.
%
Scully: (voiceover) From Space, it seems an abstraction-- a magician's trick on 
a darkened stage. And from this distance one might never imagine that it is 
alive. It first appeared in the sea almost four billion years ago in the form 
of single-celled life. In an explosion of life spanning millions of years, 
nature's first multicellular organisms began to multiply... and then it 
stopped. 440 million years ago, a great mass extinction would kill off nearly 
every species on the planet leaving the vast oceans decimated and empty. 
Slowly, plants began to evolve, then insects, only to be wiped out in the 
second great mass extinction upon the Earth. The cycle repeated again and 
again. Reptiles emerging, independent of the sea only to be killed off. Then 
dinosaurs, struggling to life along with the first birds, fish, and flowering 
plants - their decimations Earth's fourth and fifth great extinctions. Only 
100,000 years ago, Homo Sapiens appear-- man. From cave paintings to the bible 
to Columbus and Apollo 11, we have been a tireless force upon the earth and off 
cataloguing the natural world as it unfolds to us. Rising to a world population 
of over five billion people all descended from that original single cell, that 
first spark of life. But for all our knowledge, what no one can say for 
certain, is what or who ignited that original spark. Is there a plan, a purpose 
or a reason to our existence? Will we pass, as those before us, into oblivion, 
into the sixth extinction that scientists warn is already in progress?
Scully: Or will the mystery be revealed through a sign, a symbol, a revelation?
Scully: It began with an act of supreme violence-- a big bang expanding ever 
outward, cosmos born of matter and gas, matter and gas ten billion years ago. 
Whose idea was this? Who had the audacity for such invention? And the reason? 
Were we part of that plan ten billion years ago? Are we born only to die? To be 
fruitful and multiply and replenish the earth before giving way to our 
generations? If there is a beginning, must there be an end? We burn like fires 
in our time only to be extinguished. To surrender to the elements' eternal 
reclaim. Matter and gas... will this all end one day? Life no longer passing to 
life, the Earth left barren like the stars above, like the cosmos. Will the 
hand that lit the flame let it burn down? Let it burn out? Could we, too, 
become extinct? Or if this fire of life living inside us is meant to go on, who 
decides? Who tends the flames? Can he reignite the spark even as it grows cold 
and weak?
%
Scully: (voiceover) I came in search of something I did not believe existed. 
I've stayed on now, in spite of myself. In spite of everything I've ever held 
to be true. I will continue here as long as I can... as long as you are beset 
by the haunting illness which I saw consume your beautiful mind. What is this 
discovery I've made? How can I reconcile what I see with what I know? I feel 
this was meant not for me to find but for you... to make sense of - make the 
connections which can't be ignored... connections which, for me, deny all logic 
and reason. What is this source of power I hold in my hand - this rubbing - a 
simple impression taken from the surface of the craft? I watched this rubbing 
take its undeniable hold on you, saw you succumb to its spiraling effect. Now I 
must work to uncover what your illness prevents you from finding. In the source 
of every illness lies its cure.
%
Scully: (about to cry) I don't know what to believe anymore. Mulder, I was so 
determined to find a cure to save you that I could deny what it was that I saw 
and now I don't even know... I don't know... I don't know what the truth is... 
I don't know who to listen to. I don't know who to trust. (pauses; is crying) 
Diana Fowley was found murdered this morning. I never trusted her... but she 
helped save your life just as much as I did. She gave me that book. It was her 
key that led me to you. I'm sorry... I'm so sorry. I know she was your friend. 
(she puts her arms around him; they hold each other)
Mulder: Scully, I was like you once. I didn't know who to trust. Then I... I 
chose another path... another life, another fate, where I found my sister. The 
end of my world was unrecognizable and upside down. There was one thing that 
remained the same. (gently holds her face; looks in her eyes) You... were my 
friend, and you told me the truth. Even when the world was falling apart, you 
were my constant... my touchstone.
Scully: And you are mine.
[They move their faces close together; Scully kisses him on the forehead for a 
long time. They pull slightly apart; Scully puts his hat back on his head, cups 
his face in her hands. They look in each others' eyes before she gently touches 
his lips with her fingers before leaving. He stands in the doorway and closes 
his eyes.]
%
Rob Roberts: Welcome to Lucky Boy. May I take your order?
Mulder: Yeah, we'll have it our way. (both flash their badges)
Scully: FBI. Special Agents Scully and Mulder. We'd like a word with your 
manager, please.
%
Mr Rice: But look - there's four Lucky Boys in Costa Mesa alone and something 
like 30 in Orange County.
Scully: (sighing) Thirty-two.
Mulder: (quickly, annoyed) Yeah, long day. So let's make this quick. Does 
everybody have their button?
%
Mulder: What is that? Next to it. Is that, uh... oh, my... ugh. Is that brain? 
Is that brain matter there?
Scully: No, I'd say that's ground beef.
Mulder: Ground beef.
Scully: Yeah.
%
Mulder: You live here alone?
Rob Roberts: Yeah, it's just me.
Mulder: Uh-huh. Mom or girlfriend?
Rob Roberts: What?
Mulder: (grinning) Come on, man, who cleans up after you?
Rob Roberts: Neither. It's just me I-I live here alone.
Mulder: Well, bravo. You know, they say single guys are just bears who own 
furniture, (smiles) but... I mean, my place... (wistfully) Oh, but here... you 
can smell the Pine-Sol.
%
Mulder: If there's anybody that can tell us about the Millennium Group, it's 
him. He used to consult for them. Later, he fought to bring them down at the 
expense of his own career and reputation.
Scully: Single-minded.
Mulder: Yeah.
Scully: Sounds like someone I know.
%
Mulder: He's not our murderer, and those four dead bodies aren't dead and the 
millennium is... (looks at his watch) 14 hours away.
Scully: Mulder, those people, even when they were alive mangled biblical 
prophecy to the extent that it's unrecognizable. The year 2000 is just their 
artificial deadline - and besides, 2001 is actually the start of the new 
millennium.
Mulder: (slight smile) Nobody likes a math geek, Scully.
%
[Mulder and Scully are watching the New Year's celebrations on TV, which is 
showing kissing couples and everyone celebrating. They look a little awkward. 
Both turn to look at each other, then lean close and kiss gently for a few 
seconds, then smile.]
Mulder: (smiling) The world didn't end.
Scully: (calmly pleased) No, it didn't.
Mulder: Happy New Year, Scully.
Scully: Happy New Year, Mulder.
[He puts his arm around her shoulders and they walk off together.]
%
Mulder: Come on, you were cruising, right? I mean, a small town like this 
you're not exactly living La Vida Loca. I know-- I grew up in Dullsville, too, 
you know. Nothing to do but drive and park.
Tony: How long ago was that? (Mulder raises his eyebrows) Look. Don't you think 
I know what you're doing? You're like the tenth cop who's come in here trying 
to relate to me till I confess.
Scully: If you didn't do it, it's all the more reason to clear it up.
Tony: Everything I know is in my statement.
Mulder: Okay, but bear with us 'cause we're old and stupid. (Scully hides a 
smile by looking down)
%
Mulder: I don't know-- some kind of territorial or spiritual entity, maybe. 
(Scully sighs) Poltergeists have long been associated with violent acts like 
this and they tend to manifest around young people. They seem to be drawn to 
the turmoil of adolescence.
Scully: (innocently, almost coy) Mulder. Rather than spirits... can we at least 
start with Tony's friends? (looks like she is playing with his tie) Please? 
Just... for me?
%
Max: (to Scully) You must have been a Betty, back in the day. (walks away)
Scully: A "Betty"?
Mulder: (smiling) Back in the day.
%
Mulder: I'll show you my theory if you show me yours.
%
Mulder: This man fell for 30 floors, plus the distance down this shaft, because 
these doors just happened to be open-- straight through, nothing but net.
Scully: Ouch.
Mulder: I'm guessing that's what he said. After, he got up, climbed out of here 
and scampered off into the night.
%
Scully: You know in 1998, there was a British soldier who plummeted 4,500 feet 
when his parachute failed and he walked away with a broken rib?
Mulder: What's your point?
Scully: My point is that if there's a wind gust, or a sudden updraft and, plus, 
if he landed in exactly the right way, I mean, I don't know. Maybe he just got 
lucky.
Mulder: What if he got really, really lucky? That's your big scientific 
explanation, Scully? I mean, how many thousands of variables would have to 
convene in just the right mixture for that theory to hold water?
Scully: I don't know.
Mulder: Well, thousands.
%
[There is a creaking sound, and Mulder suddenly crashes through the floor to 
the room below]
Scully: You okay, Mulder?
Mulder: (looking slightly embarrassed) Yeah, it's all right. My ass broke the 
fall.
%
Mulder: A programmed behavior prompted and manifested by suggestion in this 
case, a rhythmic motion of the hands producing a unconscious act in a conscious 
state. (Raises and lowers his hand; she gives him a Look.) Doesn't work on you. 
(She smiles.)
%
Mulder: You know, it's funny, when all is said and done, there's not much 
mystery in murder.
%
Billy LaBonge: Yo. Can't you do anything that ain't a hundred years old? That 
ain't old school, that's decrepit.
Maleeni: (patiently) Young man, shall I come heckle you on your job? Make sure 
you count out the requisite number of McNuggets?
%
Mulder: So, basically he died of a heart attack, somebody crept up behind him, 
sawed his head off and then glued it back on all in the space of 30 seconds. 
(begins laughing) Does that make sense to you?
Scully: No. Which makes it even stranger still because, as far as I can tell 
this body has been dead for over a month. I see signs of refrigeration.
Mulder: And yet he performed yesterday. What a trooper.
%
Pinchbeck: Come in. Good morning, Mr. And Mrs...?
Mulder: (quickly; taking out his badge) Agents... Mulder and Scully. FBI.
%
Billy LaBonge: What's in it for me? I mean, let's say I help you out. What do I 
get in return?
Scully: (hopefully) The feeling of pride that comes from performing your civic 
duty?
%
Mulder: How did this impersonator switch out the dead body?
Billy LaBonge: With ease. You're going to kick yourselves when I show you how 
he did this, it's so simple. 'Cause magic is all about... (wiggles fingers 
mysteriously) misdirection.
[Mulder does the same silly finger-waggle at Scully; she smiles and tries to 
ignore him.]
Billy LaBonge: Your impersonator simply made sure everyone was looking the 
other way when he pulled Maleeni's body from its secret hiding place 
underneath... the floor. (Dramatically lifts one of the floor panels up from 
the bottom of the van, revealing... nothing; none of the other panels show 
anything either; surprised) Man, this guy's good.
%
Mulder: Don't you find it odd that the amazing Maleeni's a lousy poker player? 
I mean, this is a guy who's adept at manipulating cards.
Scully: Maybe he wasn't so adept. LaBonge certainly doesn't have a high opinion 
of his skills.
Mulder: There's another possibility. Behold - an ordinary household quarter. 
(holds up a quarter) I'm going to take the quarter from my right hand and place 
it into my left hand. (flourishes) Where is it?
Scully: It's in your right hand.
Mulder: (shows empty right hand) Oh, no, no, no.
Scully: (taps his right hand; nothing still. She smiles, impressed) Ah... 
That's not bad.
Mulder: (reaches out to grab her nose) Blow your nose, Scully.
Scully: (warning him) Mulder...
Mulder: (holding her nose between his fingers) Blow your nose.
Scully: (deadpan) Ah-choo.
Mulder: (quarter falls into his hand) Ta-da.
Scully: (amused) Amazing!
Mulder: (proudly) The great Muldeeni!
%
Scully: You know, Mulder, there's still one thing that you haven't explained.
Mulder: What's that?
Scully: How the Amazing Maleeni was able to turn his head completely around.
Mulder: I don't know that.
Scully: I do. I'll show you. Observe. (gets down on hands and knees on the 
floor; Mulder grins. Puts her hands on the floor, turns one hand a full 360 
degrees; Mulder is impressed)
Mulder: Gee! Very nice. How'd you do that?
Scully: Well... magic. (keeps walking down the hall; he follows)
Mulder: No. Seriously, Scully, how'd you do it? You know, it's not the same 
thing. It's different with the head. Come on. Look at this. (does the 
disappearing thumb trick; she ignores him)
%
Scully: Snake handling. I didn't learn that in catechism class.
Mulder: That's funny. I knew a couple of Catholic schoolgirls who were expert 
at it.
%
Scully: Rattlesnakes and medieval visions of damnation. Well, I for one, feel a 
whole lot closer to God.
Mulder: I don't know, Scully. When you... when you get right down to it is 
snake handling any harder to buy into than communion wafers or 
transubstantiation...?
Scully: Or believing in flying saucers, for that matter.
%
Mulder: Reverend, do something about these snakes, please.
Reverend O'Connor: You got nothing to fear if you're righteous people.
Mulder: (very nervous) Just in case we're not, we could use a little righteous 
help here.
%
Reverend O'Connor: Your FBI partner could've learned something about herself if 
you hadn't stopped me. Some powerful good news, maybe.
Mulder: I'd say it's good news for you that she's not here right now, 
considering what you tried to do to her.
%
Mulder: [Whispers after finding her] Samantha.
%
Scully: Mulder, where'd you go?
Mulder: End of the road. (Goes to Harold) He's OK, it's OK.
Harold: My son! You...you saw my son?
Mulder: He's dead, they're all dead, Harold. Your son, Amber Lynn, my sister.
Harold: No!
Mulder: Harold, you see so much, but you refuse to see him. You refuse to let 
him go. But you have to let him go now Harold, he's protected, he's in a better 
place, they're all in a better place, we both have to let go, Harold.
Harold: You're wrong. I'm gonna find him...I don't believe you!
Scully: Mulder, what happened? Are you sure you're all right?
Mulder: I'm fine. I'm free.
%
Mulder: I'm sorry, but you're going to have to be isolated and kept under guard.
Sergeant Duthie: With all due respect what the *bleep* are you talking about?
Mulder: I'm talking about preventing this man from becoming a danger to himself 
and to others.
Sergeant Duthie: Can I see your badge again?
Scully: [smiling sweetly] Agent Mulder, can we have a word a second?
Mulder: Excuse me.
Mulder: What is it?
Scully: "What is it"? Mulder, have you noticed that we're on television?
Mulder: I don't think it's live television, Scully. She just said *bleep*.
Scully: Look, Mulder, you want to talk about werewolves to me you can knock 
yourself out. I may not agree with you but at least I'm not going to hold it 
against you but this... Mulder, this could ruin your career.
Mulder: [laughing] What career? Scully, I appreciate it. You don't want me 
looking foolish. I do. I appreciate that.
Scully: I don't want me looking foolish, Mulder.
%
Deputy Wetzel: And it's hard to have a fast-track career in law enforcement 
when everybody thinks you're nuts.
Mulder: Tell me about it.
%
Coroner's Assistant: Well, we got murder victims stacked three-deep in the 
freezer. Plus you got this camera crew reporting everything. Why?
Scully: [to the camera, smiling pleasantly] Because the FBI has nothing to hide.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: That which makes miracles, can also make great evil.
%
Mulder: [on the phone] Mulder.
Scully: Mulder, please tell me I can go home.
Mulder: Oh, hey, Scully. How's the stakeout?
Scully: Well, the furnace broke and I can just about see my breath in here.
Mulder: Ouch. I'm sorry to hear that.
Scully: That... and I've witnessed a couple hundred things I'd like to erase 
from my brain. Eww. But as of yet, no mystery woman.
Mulder: Well, she'll come, you know? It's just a matter of time. She'll show up 
- I'm sure of that.
Scully: Yeah, well not before I die of malnutrition.
Mulder: Hey, Scully, tough it out. Whatever doesn't kill you makes you 
stronger. Right? [to Ellen, who is putting some dishes on his plate] No, no, 
no, no. No capers, thank you.
Scully: I'm sorry. What?
Mulder: I said, "What a... what a crazy caper." I'll talk to you later... and, 
uh, keep warm. Bye.
%
Mulder: [on the phone] Mulder.
Scully: Mulder, when you find me dead, my desiccated corpse propped up staring 
lifelessly through the telescope at drunken frat boys peeing and vomiting into 
the gutter just know that my last thoughts were of you and how I'd like to kill 
you.
%
Scully: [voice over] Time passes in moments ... moments which, rushing past 
define the path of a life just as surely as they lead towards its end. How 
rarely do we stop to examine that path, to see the reasons why all things 
happen, to consider whether the path we take in life is our own making or 
simply one into which we drift with eyes closed. But what if we could stop, 
pause to take stock of each precious moment before it passes? Might we then see 
the endless forks in the road that have shaped a life? And, seeing those 
choices, choose another path?
%
Mulder: But that was merely prelude of what was to come. Three years later, in 
1994 even more complex formations occurred simultaneously on opposite ends of 
the English countryside with the Mandelbrot Set, were it still there, at its 
center. Then, in 1997, even more complex formations occurred... [Scully is 
completely engrossed in her salad; doesn't listen to him at all. Mulder pauses] 
... and I'm not wearing any pants right now.
%
Security Guard: Do you have an appointment?
[Skinner and Mulder flash their badges.]
Security Guard: (rudely) Do you have an appointment?
[They look at each other, surprised, and flash their badges again.]
Skinner: (insistent) Maybe you missed this the first time around.
%
Skinner: Dr. Voss, can you enlighten us as to what Dr. Scobie intended to tell 
the grand jury? We know it had to do with company research.
[The Lead Counsel, a large lawyerly looking man sitting next to Voss interrupts 
as Voss is about to answer]
Lead Counsel: I'm sorry. Dr. Voss would be in violation of his employment 
confidentiality clause in answering that question.
Skinner: Dr. Scobie was your friend?
Dr. Peter Voss: Yeah, for 14 years, mm-hmm.
Skinner: And yet you demoted him five weeks ago. You took him off a particular 
project. Can you tell us why that happened?
Lead Counsel: [interrupting] As before, Dr. Voss would be in violation of his 
confidentiality clause in answering questions regarding the nature of his work 
here at Morley. I'm sure you understand our cooperation cannot extend itself to 
revealing corporate secrets.
Skinner: [getting pissed] Yeah, I'm not sensing any "cooperation" whatsoever. 
In fact, I'm one more non-answer away from getting a federal warrant and 
searching this entire building.
Lead Counsel: Then this meeting is over. Dr. Voss. [The lawyers all begin to 
get up from the table. Mulder pulls an evidence bag from his pocket]
Mulder: Dr. Voss... can you tell me what that is? [He tosses the bag to Voss. 
Inside is the dead beetle from Jim Scobie's glass]
Dr. Peter Voss: It's a tobacco beetle. Why?
Mulder: We found it at Jim Scobie's house.
Dr. Peter Voss: Well, you'll find a lot of these around here. They're 
everywhere. There's probably a dozen in the grill of your car right now.
Lead Counsel: May I ask where you're going with this, Agent?
Mulder: [sarcastically] I'm sorry, I can't. Answering that question would 
violate FBI confidentiality due to the sensitive nature of our investigation.
%
Mulder: Sir, have I pissed you off in a way that's more than normal?
%
Mulder: One more pun and I pull out my gun.
%
Wayne Federman: You're both crazy.
Mulder: Well, why do you say that?
Wayne Federman: (to Mulder) Well, you're crazy for believing what you believe. 
(to Scully) And you're crazy for not believing what he believes. I'll leave you 
with that. Thank you. (leaves)
Mulder: I miss him already.
%
Cardinal O'Fallon: Is being made a fool of a crime, Agent Mulder?
Mulder: I'd be doing life if it were, sir.
%
Scully: How...?
Mulder: [answering the question before she asks] 42.
Scully: You've seen this movie 42 times?
Mulder: Yes.
Scully: Doesn't that make you sad? It makes me sad.
%
Mulder: (on the phone with Skinner) Uh... So what are you up to right now, sir?
Skinner: I'm taking a bubble bath.
Mulder: Uh, hold on just one second, sir. (clicks over on the receiver to talk 
to Scully, grinning with delight) Hey, Scully, Skinman is calling me from a 
bubble bath.
Skinner: It's still me, Mulder.
[Scully takes a sip of her wine, not hearing anything. Mulder is embarrassed.]
Mulder: Uh, sir, well, hold on one second, sir. (He clicks the receiver again) 
Scully?
Scully: Yeah?
Mulder: Yeah, Skinner is calling me from a bubble bath.
Scully: Wow, he's really gone Hollywood.
Mulder: Totally.
Scully: You know, Mulder, speaking of Hollywood, I think that Tea Leoni has a 
little crush on you.
Mulder: Oh, yeah, right. Like Tea Leoni's ever going to have a crush on me.
Scully: I think that Shandling likes you a bit, too.
Mulder: Really?
%
Mulder: This is an FBI fleet sedan from our Kansas City field office 
requisitioned by two seasoned agents there driven into a tree at 43 miles an 
hour by the female agent in a novel effort to kill her male counterpart. Now, 
you might think I'm going to suggest psychokinesis-- pk-- someone or something 
controlling the agents with remote, mind-bending power.
Scully: But it's not?
Mulder: Both agents sustained critical injuries. Their stories eerily similar 
...
[Two slides of the woman who looks like Scully lying in full body cast in the 
hospital.]
Mulder: ...as if they temporarily lost control of their minds unable to alter 
their behavior.
[Two slides of the man who looks like Mulder, also in full body casts]
Mulder: You may think that I'm going to say it's past lives unresolved or fate, 
stalking the agents like an animal ...
Scully: ... but you're not.
Mulder: No, the interesting thing about these agents is they had worked 
together for seven years previously without any incident.
Scully: Seven years?
Mulder: Yeah, but they are not ... romantically involved if that's what you're 
thinking.
Scully: Not even I would be so farfetched.
[Mulder smiles slightly. The next slide shows that the two agents are in the 
same hospital room, with their matching injuries.]
Mulder: You have any ideas, Scully, any thoughts?
Scully: What I'm thinking, Mulder, is how familiar this seems. Playing Watson 
to your Sherlock. You dangling clues out in front of me one by one. It's a 
game, and... and, as usual, you're, you're holding something back from me. 
You're not telling me something about this case.
Mulder: (finger to his mouth, pretending to think hard about it) Hmm...
Scully: Okay, so these agents were investigating something. (Mulder chuckles) 
Something... much like what they themselves were almost killed by. Uh, 
something they came into contact with. Uh... Third party? (Mulder, playing with 
her, holds up two fingers) Two third parties. Twins? Relatives? A doppelganger? 
(Mulder shakes his head and taps his nose) A corporeal likeness that appears 
unbidden from the spirit world the sight of which presages one's own death 
or... a double, conjured into the world by a technique called bilocation... 
(Mulder stops teasing and looks up at her in awe as she continues) which in 
psychological terms represents the person's secret desires and impulses 
committing acts that the, uh, real person cannot commit himself... or herself? 
(he smiles at her; she's annoyed) Mulder, the slide, please! (He finally 
advances the projector to show a slide of the Kansas driver's license of Betty 
Templeton. Scully proudly claps her hands.) Yes!
Mulder: (pouting) Don't go thinking I'm going to start doing the autopsies.
%
Mulder: Who is it?
Scully: It's me.
Mulder: (lets her in; she goes and sits on the bed) What's wrong, Scully? You 
look sick.
Scully: I don't know what's wrong.
Mulder: Come in.
Scully: I, um... I was starting to get ready for bed and I started to feel 
really dizzy - vertigo or something - and then I just... I started to get 
chills.
Mulder: You want me to call a doctor?
Scully: No, I just... I just want to get warm. Thank you. (she climbs under the 
covers, he tucks her in before crawling in next to her and spooning with her)
Mulder: It's not worth it, Scully.
Scully: What?
Mulder: I want you to go home.
Scully: Oh, Mulder, I'm going to be fine.
Mulder: No, I've been thinking about it. Looking at you tonight, holding that 
baby... knowing everything that's been taken away from you. A chance for 
motherhood and your health and that baby. I think that... I don't know, maybe 
they're right.
Scully: Who's right?
Mulder: The FBI. Maybe what they say is true, though for all the wrong reasons. 
It's the personal costs that are too high. There so much more you need to do 
with your life. There's so much more than this. There has to be an end, Scully.
%
Scully: Mulder, if any of this is true...
Mulder: If it is, or if it isn't, I want you to forget about it, Scully.
Scully: Forget about it?
Mulder: You're not going back out there. I'm not going to let you go back out 
there.
Scully: What are you talking about?
Mulder: It has to end sometime. That time is now.
Scully: Mulder...
Mulder: Scully, you have to understand that they're taking abductees. You're an 
abductee. I'm not going to risk... losing you.
Scully: I won't let you go alone.
%
Agent Short: I see the money bleed out, but it just doesn't seem to make the 
results of your work any better. So many of the cases you investigate are left 
unexplained. Makes it hard to justify the expense.
Scully: So much of the work that we do cannot be measured in standard terms.
Agent Short: How would you measure it?
Scully: We open doors with the X-Files, which lead to other doors.
Agent Short: Doors leading to... "A conspiracy of men who cooperated with alien 
beings to create human alien hybrids." So we could all become slaves of an 
alien invasion.
Scully: I believe that there was once a conspiracy. I believe I was taken by 
men who subjected me to medical tests, which gave me cancer and left me barren.
Agent Short: But you don't believe in aliens?
Scully: I've seen things that I cannot deny.
%
Skinner: (enters her hospital room) Agent Scully.
Scully: Hi.
Skinner: Hi. How you feeling?
Scully: I'm feeling fine. They're just running some tests on me.
Skinner: Well... um... (he looks like he's in pain; he can't say it)
Scully: (almost crying) I already heard.
Skinner: (voice breaking) I lost him. I don't know what else I can say. I lost 
him. I'll be asked... what I saw. And what I saw, I can't deny. I won't.
Scully: (crying) We will find him. I have to. (Skinner nods and starts to 
leave) Sir, um... there's something else I need to tell you. Something that I 
need for you to keep to yourself. (she looks torn between laughing and crying) 
I'm having a hard time explaining it. Or believing it. But, um... (she smiles - 
half joy, half pain) I'm pregnant.
[Skinner is speechless. Scully tries to smile but is both laughing and sobbing.]
%
Scully: I don't believe this.
Skinner: This isn't about finding Mulder - this is about Kersh covering the 
FBI's ass.
Scully: Why do I get the feeling they'd be happy if we never found him at all?
Skinner: Look... I saw what I saw. I have to make a statement in there. I'm not 
going to tell them it didn't happen.
Scully: Well, you heard Kersh. They don't want the truth. You give them the 
truth, and they'll hang you with it.
Skinner: They can hang me with a lie, too. I'm not going to sell Mulder out.
Scully: What good are you to Mulder if you give them the power to ruin your 
career? (he doesn't answer) We will find him.
%
Scully: What's my theory? My theory is you don't know Mulder at all. You never 
did. (flips his badge over, showing his name) "John Doggett." Kersh's task 
force leader. You might have just introduced yourself.
Doggett: Well, I was getting around to it.
Scully: (throws a cup full of water in his face) Nice to meet you, Agent 
Doggett.
%
Scully: (voiceover) We live in a darkness of our own making... blind to a 
habitant world all but unseen by us. A world of beings traveling through time 
and space imaginable to us only as flights of fancy. Who are these beings we 
dare to imagine but fear to accept? What dark work goes on inside their 
impossible machines... cloaked from us by invisible forces? If they know our 
secrets, why can't we know theirs?
%
Skinner: This has gone too far, Scully.
Scully: No. That's what's wrong here. It hasn't gone far enough. I need those 
car keys.
Skinner: And what do you think you're going to do?
Scully: (tearing up) Look, we are being hampered here by the FBI, by John 
Doggett, by doubt, by our own mistrust. Whatever it is, it is working... as 
long as we let it.
Skinner: You told me Mulder wouldn't allow it. Wouldn't let me ruin my career 
over this. Over him. But what about you, Scully? I mean, my god, you've got 
even more at stake.
Scully: (voice cracking; nearly crying) I-I can't take the chance that I'm 
never going to see him again.
%
Scully: Well... do you have any questions?
Doggett: (understatement, chuckling) Just a few. Maybe first you could tell me 
where your area is here and... uh... where mine's going to be.
Scully: (firmly) This is my partner's office, Agent Doggett. You and I will 
just be using it for a while. (sets Mulder's nameplate on the front of his desk)
%
Doggett: You know, there is a more obvious explanation.
Scully: Mm-hmm.
Doggett: The more basic answer is what we're dealing with here is simply a man. 
A psychotic killer with a deformed foot. You're familiar with the principle of 
Occam's Razor?
Scully: Yeah. You take every possible explanation and you choose the simplest 
one. Agent Mulder used to refer to it as "Occam's Principle of Limited 
Imagination."
%
Scully: Can you hot-wire it?
Doggett: (confident) Can I hot-wire it? Gone in 60 seconds, Jack. I'm going to 
strand these lunatics.
%
Scully: There are X-files cases that describe similar paranormal findings. 
Alien abductees, who came back with anomalous medical stats.
Doggett: You know, these words - "anomalous," "supernatural," "paranormal" - 
they propound to explain something by not explaining it. That's lazy!
%
Sharon Pearl: (looking at watch) Is this going to happen?
Doggett: Shouldn't you be telling us that?
Sharon Pearl: (smiles) You're no doubt confused, Agent Doggett. I take psychic 
readings, not see through walls.
%
Doggett: (knocking on the door) FBI! I saw your curtains move. I know you're in 
there.
Trina: (opens door) M-Mr. Wells, I...
Martin Wells: Trina, you knew about the Nanny-cam, didn't you? You told the 
killer about it. You must have given him my key card, too.
Trina: Mr. Wells, I-I-I wasn't even there that night.
Doggett: (unholsters his gun) First thing you're supposed to say is: "What 
nanny-cam?" (pushes the door open suddenly, pushes her to the ground)
%
Martin Wells: (voiceover) The passage of time in prisons is not in a cell of 
brick and mortar but in one of hopes dashed and tragedies unaverted. How 
precious, then, the chance to go back only to discover that in facing the past 
you must face up to yourself... that exiting the prison of time doesn't free 
you from the prison of your own character... one from which there is no escape.
%
Doggett: If I'm working this case, I'd appreciate a heads up before you tell 
the Deputy Director any more science fiction stories.
Skinner: Hey, I don't have another explanation.
Doggett: Those guys in there are right. This whole story doesn't make a damn 
bit of sense.
Skinner: I'm supposed to give those guys in there answers, Agent Doggett. 
You're supposed to help me do that.
Doggett: Tipet's on the run. Find him, and we just might.
%
Doggett: I'm a good investigator but you know as well as I do I'm not the Agent 
that should be investigating this case.
Skinner: Agent Scully can't be here.
Doggett: You spoke to her?
Skinner: Tonight. She told me to tell you she's fine. She's taking some 
personal time.
Doggett: I've got 22 people dead, and she's taking personal time? (he picks up 
the phone, frustrated; Skinner grabs it to stop him)
Skinner: (firmly) You're not listening to what I'm telling you. Do your best 
without her. (hangs up the phone and walks off)
%
Frohike: We all have a third eye. If we could open it, we'd see a new reality, 
one closer to God. At least that's what Kesey told me on the bus back in '64.
Langly: You were not on the bus with Kesey in '64.
Frohike: Hey, I got the pictures to prove it, my longhaired friend.
Langly: Before or after you partied with the Stones at Altamont?
Frohike: Don't be a boob, Altamont was in '70s.
Langly: Whatever.
%
Doggett: Wait, you, you're not saying this guy has X-ray vision?
Scully: I am remarking that these wavelengths exist and the only thing that is 
stopping us from seeing them, if you will, is the biochemical structure of our 
eyes. I am conjecturing that if this structure was somehow different we'd have 
the ability to see things that we don't.
Doggett: (leans in and whispers) Call in Clark Kent.
%
Doggett: Were you aware Mulder carried a second weapon, a Walther PPK?
Skinner: Yeah, in an ankle holster.
Doggett: I found it hidden under his sink. The clip was three rounds shy.
Skinner: What's this about?
Doggett: Three shots were fired in a house where Mulder investigated a case 
last May. He never filed a report on the case or the discharge of his weapon. 
Do you know any reason why?
Skinner: If Mulder did these things, he would've reported them.
Doggett: Mulder submitted case reports, all right but they indicate he was here 
in Washington on days his cell phone records prove he was in Pennsylvania.
Skinner: Are you calling Mulder a liar?
Doggett: (pointing to computer screen) This is the muzzle of Mulder's pistol. 
You see that there?
Skinner: It's blowback.
Doggett: Macrospatter of dried blood in a semi-circular pattern, which 
indicates Mulder fired close-range at something or someone.
Skinner: I've heard enough. (starts to leave)
Doggett: Where are you going?
Skinner: It's where you're going, Agent Doggett. You're trying to build a case 
that what? Mulder killed a man and then made himself disappear? That's not what 
happened. I told you before, he was abducted. I saw it!
Doggett: Agent Mulder signed falsified case reports.
Skinner: (angry) Oh, come on, John, this isn't about Mulder, it's about you! 
Your career. You give the FBI a narrative for Mulder's disappearance, you're 
off the X-Files and back on the fast-track to the directorship.
Doggett: I'm just trying to find the truth.
Skinner: You want the truth? Then ask Agent Scully!
Doggett: I can't do that.
Skinner: Why not?
Doggett: Because she... (sighing) she signed those case reports, too.
Skinner: (looks at the file; flatly) You take that story to OPR, the accusation 
alone could cost Scully her job.
Doggett: I'm not taking it to OPR. I'm taking it to you.
%
Doggett: Looks like you missed a spot, Mr. Hangemuhl.
%
(The Lone Gunmen are talking to Doggett and Skinner via webcam, and are wearing 
pajamas, bathrobes, etc. They look tired and slightly annoyed.)
Byers: We learned what we could. This is somewhat short notice, of course.
Frohike: And a little outside our area of expertise.
Langly: Plus the fact we were sleeping.
Doggett: You wearing pants, Langly?
Langly: Uh...yeah. (hurriedly gets out of the range of the camera)
%
Scully: Hi.
Mulder: Hi.
Scully: Come on in.
Mulder: Thanks.
Scully: (shuts the door) Can I take your coat?
Mulder: No, I can't stay. I gotta get back to the office for a while.
Scully: Obviously you've had some time to think about my request.
Mulder: Um, it's... it's not something that I get asked to do every day. Um, 
but I am absolutely flattered. (she is embarrassed) No, honestly.
Scully: Okay, if... if you're trying to politely say "no," it's okay. I, I 
understand. (avoids eye contact)
Mulder: See what's weird is... this sounds, and this sounds really weird, I 
know, but I, I just wouldn't want this to come between us.
Scully: (very hurt, pretends otherwise) Yeah. I know... I, I understand. I do.
Mulder: (realizes she doesn't understand what he's saying; reaches out to touch 
her cheek but stops himself) Well ... the answer is "yes."
Scully: (she is overjoyed, and they smile at each other then embrace) Um... 
Well, I'll call Dr. Parenti and... (Mulder nods and smiles) I assume that he'll 
want to meet you and go through the, uh, the donor procedure.
Mulder: At that part, I'm a pro.
%
[Skinner, in a tshirt, opens his door to see Scully standing outside. She's 
been crying.]
Scully: (weakly) What if he's dead? (He doesn't respond; she's embarrassed) I'm 
sorry. I just had a bad dream.
Skinner: (pauses) Let me get some clothes on. (She nods; he closes the door 
then comes out to join her in the parking lot.)
Scully: I once had a talk with Mulder about starlight. How it's billions of 
years old. (Both of them look upwards.) Stars that are now long dead whose 
light is still traveling through time. It won't die, that light. (Skinner 
watches her as she looks up.) Maybe that's the only thing that never does. He 
said that's where souls reside. I hope he's right.
Skinner: (long pause; he puts his arm around her shoulders) If you're trying to 
prepare yourself I want you to stop. Nothing says that we're going to stumble 
over him in some field. Nothing says he won't be fine.
[Scully nods, then she turns and buries her face in his chest, sobbing; he 
holds her and strokes her hair.]
%
Reyes: What do you think happened?
[Skinner looks at Scully.]
Scully: Isn't that what you're here to tell us?
Reyes: Oh, I have my own thoughts. It's just, what we think happened and what 
actually happened aren't always the same thing but not altogether 
insignificant, either.
Scully: I'm sorry, this feels like therapy.
%
Krycek: We all have a life in our hands. I have yours... you have Mulder's... 
and Scully has her unborn child. It's who's willing to sacrifice.
%
Mulder: Look, Scully, I need to make sense of what happened to me. So that I 
can stop it. Because if I can't stop it, it could happen to anyone. It could 
happen to you. And who's to say it's going to stop there?
Scully: Mulder, if you go down the X-Files will go down, too. I mean, 
theoretically, they could put you in prison for what you're doing here.
Mulder: Yeah, well, compared to where I just was, prison would be a Princess 
cruise.
%
[Mulder closes the laptop and removes the hard drive.]
Scully: What are you doing?
Mulder: I'm going to book myself on that Princess cruise.
Scully: I'll book it for you. (takes the harddrive - and the responsibility - 
from him. He covers up the boxes, smiles and follows her.)
%
[Frohike opens the door of Scully's apartment for Mulder. They both smile.]
Frohike: You know, it's really not fair. You've been dead for six months and 
you still look better than me. But not by much. (they hug tightly, Mulder 
laughs softly)
Mulder: Melvin. I'd be a whole lot happier to see you if you'd just take your 
hands off my ass.
Frohike: (embarrassed, lets go and steps back) Sorry.
Byers: I think it goes without saying that we're all, uh, tremendously relieved.
Langly: (smiling) And not just because we got big questions about your 
involvement in a certain... blessed event.
[Langly glances significantly at Scully. Mulder appears surprised and looks 
over at her; she ignores his look and the comment.]
%
Mulder: Well, just remember, boys, this is America. Just because you get more 
votes doesn't mean you win.
%
Mulder: (on radio) Frohike? Langly? Byers? Let's go. I'm dying out here.
Frohike: (on radio) Well, let us just finish our cappuccino and biscotti, and 
we'll see what we can do.
[All three Gunmen are held up by harnesses in what looks like an elevator shaft 
filled with wires.]
Byers: (on radio) You can start walking now, Mulder.
Mulder: Is the system bypassed?
Langly: You'll know if it's not.
Mulder: Great.
%
Doggett: I don't need someone using me to get another man killed.
Knowle Rohrer: You think this about Mulder. It's about the truth, John.
Doggett: What truth?
Knowle Rohrer: You got it all right in front of you. It's all in the X-Files. 
I'm just one man trying to point you in the right direction.
%
Mulder: [knocks on Scully's door]
Scully: [exasperated] Mulder!
Mulder: [startled] What?
Scully: I was just about to get in the shower, but I was waiting for the 
pizzaman.
Mulder: [mock suspiciously] You got something going on with the pizzaman I 
should know about?
Scully: [laughing] The pizzaman?
Mulder: Correct me if I'm wrong, but you just said you were waiting for the 
pizzaman to jump in the shower.
Scully: No, what I mean was, the pizzaman's usually late, and so...
Mulder: [squints like he doesn't understand]
Scully: Do you want to come in?
Mulder: Thank you.
Scully: [turns and walks back into the apartment, doesn't see Mulder placing a 
gift under the pillows;] I feel like I'm in an episode of Mad About You.
Mulder: Yeah, well, small technicality... Mad About You was about a married 
couple, and we just work together.
Scully: Well, you know what I mean.
Mulder: I do, I do. And what I am saying is that we do not have much 
information about this man. And what I am saying [pointing at Scully's tummy] 
is that the pizzaman is not above suspicion.
Scully: I see.
%
Mulder: [hintingly glances towards the couch (he has placed a gift under the 
pillows)]
Scully: [looks and notices gift] Is that for me?
Mulder: Yep.
Scully: Nice package.
Mulder: (stutteringly quietly) Thank you.
%
[Knock on the door]
Mulder: Little Caesar, I presume?
%
[Scully nods, sits down with her present. Mulder opens the door, and turns to 
squint suspiciously at Scully.]
Scully: [to deliveryman] Hi. Just give it to the man with the funny look on his 
face.
%
Harrison: Can I ask you something?
Mulder: Sure.
Harrison: When you went to Antarctica to save Agent Scully from being taken by 
that spaceship and you ran out of gas in your Sno-cat... how did you get back?
[Scully looks curiously at Mulder. They start talking over each other, Scully 
being scientific, Mulder being typical Mulder, and Harrison just sits back and 
enjoys herself.]
Scully: Um, well, first of all, it was never (coughs) actually proven that it 
was a spaceship ...
Mulder: It wasn't?
Scully: Well, no, what happened was that we fell off of something that ...
Mulder: Something?
Scully: ...that rose out of the ice.
Mulder: Well what do you think that was?
Scully: Well, I don't know what it was. But we never got, we didn't actually 
get to see a spaceship.
Mulder: I can't believe that you're saying it's not a spaceship.
Scully: Well, it couldn't have been a spaceship.
Mulder: 'Course it was a spaceship.
Scully: Well, we don't know it was a spaceship. But you don't have a picture of 
it or anything.
Mulder: You know it was a spaceship. You saw it.
Scully: No, no, no, no, remember, I was unconscious and when I woke up there 
was no spaceship.
Mulder: Now, come on, Scully. It was a spaceship.
Scully: Mulder, n-n-n-no.
Mulder: And you were frozen, and I hugged you .... (Their voices trail off.)
%
Mulder: We call it the miracle of life. Conception - a union of perfect 
opposites - essence transforming into existence - an act without which mankind 
would not exist and humanity cease to exist. Or is this just nostalgia now? An 
act of biology commandeered by modern science and technology? God-like, we 
extract, implant, inseminate... and we clone. But has our ingenuity rendered 
the miracle into a simple trick? In the artifice of replicating life can we 
become the creator? Then what of the soul? Can it, too, be replicated? Does it 
live in this matter we call DNA? Or is its placement the opposite of artifice, 
capable only by God. How did this child come to be? What set its heart beating? 
Is it the product of a union? Or the work of a divine hand? An answered prayer? 
A true miracle? Or is it a wonder of technology - the intervention of other 
hands? What do I tell this child about to be born? What do I tell Scully? And 
what do I tell myself?
%
Scully: This has got to be a conspiracy. (holds up two dolls - one a girl, one 
a boy)
Woman: Aw... Maybe it'll be twins.
Scully: Thank you, but I would settle for one very healthy boy.
Women: Oh?
Scully: Or girl.
Women: Aww!
Older woman: So many secrets, Margaret.
Margaret Scully: What do you expect? My daughter works for the FBI.
%
Doggett: What is this place?
Skinner: An illegal medical facility for the purpose of human cloning. It goes 
on from here. In fact, it occupies the entire warehouse.
Doggett: You read about these things but you don't imagine they exist.
Skinner: Yeah, just like aliens.
%
Skinner: Talk to you a minute?
Mulder: (follows him outside) You said there'd been a murder?
Skinner: Yeah, we'll get there. Some business we need to clear up. Personal 
business. About Scully's baby, about who the father is.
Mulder: (smiles) Ahh... Yeah, I hear there's a pool running down at the FBI, 
placing bets.
Skinner: I've had my suspicions. That is, until I found out that you had 
questions. Questions about Scully's pregnancy itself.
Mulder: You want to know who the father is, that's Scully's business. But if 
you're asking me how a woman who was diagnosed as barren and unable to conceive 
is about to give birth in a couple days, that's an answer I can't honestly give.
Skinner: Well, I need answers. In light of what we found in there and in light 
of Scully's due date I need good, hard answers. Fast.
%
Mulder: Whatever you can't get elsewhere, just throw it together.
Scully: (stops him) Mulder, to go where? No, just stop! Can you tell me what's 
wrong? Is it something to do with my baby?
Mulder: No, your, your baby is fine. It's you who's in danger now, Scully.
Scully: From who? Mulder, from what?
Mulder: I don't know, I'm not sure. I'm not sure about anything. I just know I 
got to get you out of here.
Scully: Look, Mulder, look, I can't take this! I can't live like this—as, as 
the object of some unending X-File.
Mulder: This isn't about the X-Files, Scully. It is only about you. Now, you 
are going to have this baby and I'm going to do everything I can to protect it. 
I just can't do that here.
%
Krycek: If I'm so full of crap, why all the precautions?
Skinner: Precisely because you are so full of crap, Krycek.
[He taps Krycek on the chest, then gets on the elevator with Mulder, Scully, 
and Doggett.]
Skinner: Your ass stays here.
[Krycek smirks at him as the door close.]
%
Reyes: I'm guessing I don't have time to go to the little girls' room?
%
Mulder: You told me that he told you he knew how to stop Billy Miles. Are you 
telling me now that you think he's a liar?
Doggett: He is or he isn't. What the hell difference does it really make?
Mulder: It doesn't make any difference at all. Unless you want to protect 
Scully and that baby.
Doggett: And then what? How long can you keep this up? How long until the next 
Billy Miles rears his head? The next threat? The next phantom? You ever stop to 
ask yourself? (Mulder looks a little uncomfortable) All the sacrifice, the 
blood spilled - you've given nearly a decade of your life. Where the hell is it 
all going to end?
Mulder: (thinks for a moment; softly) I don't know. Maybe it doesn't.
%
Krycek: I could've killed you so many times, Mulder. You've got to know that. 
I'm the one that kept you alive. Praying you'd win somehow.
Mulder: Then there really is no God.
Krycek: You think I'm bad. That I'm a killer. We wanted the same thing, 
brother. That's what you don't understand.
Mulder: I wanted to stop them. All you wanted was to save your own ass.
Krycek: No. I tried to stop them. Tried to kill Scully's baby to stop them. 
It's too late. The tragedy's that you - you wouldn't let it go. That's why I 
have to do this. 'Cause you know how deep it goes. Right into the FBI.
Mulder: You want to kill me, Alex, kill me. Like you killed my father. Just 
don't insult me trying to make me understand.
%
Mulder: What are you going to call him?
Scully: William. (he looks at her) After your father.
[They look into each other's eyes for a moment, then Scully smiles.]
Mulder: Well, I don't know. He's... he's got your coloring and your eyes. But 
he looks suspiciously like Assistant Director Skinner.
%
Mulder: I don't quite understand that either. Except that maybe he isn't what 
they thought he was. That doesn't make him any less of a miracle though, does 
it?
Scully: From the moment I became pregnant, I feared the truth... about how... 
and why. And I know that you feared it, too.
Mulder: I think what we feared were the possibilities. The truth we both know.
Scully: Which is what?
[With William held between them, he leans down and they kiss.]
%
Scully: What? What's the matter?
Doggett: What's the matter? I've been trying to call you.
Scully: Yeah, the phone's off the hook, because of the baby.
Doggett: I got panicked that you're not going to be here, that you left, too.
Scully: Come in.
Doggett: I've been looking for Mulder. I went to his apartment.
Scully: I know.
Doggett: Where did he go? Dana... where'd he go?
Scully: He's gone. He's just gone.
%
Reyes: [answering phone] Monica Reyes.
Scully: Yeah. It's Scully.
Reyes: Dana, what's wrong? Are you all right?
Scully: Is Agent Doggett there?
Reyes: Yeah, he's right here with me. [She hands the phone to Doggett]
Doggett: Dana. Something wrong?
Scully: Yeah. Yeah, something. [The mobile over William Scully's cot was 
spinning by inself] I think I might have been wrong, telling you to drop your 
investigation.
Doggett: Well, I didn't drop it. As a matter of fact, we found something, I'm 
not sure how it fits, but we're working on it.
Scully: What is it?
Doggett: A body.
%
[There is a knock on the door of Dogett's house. He looks through the peephole 
to see Frohike.]
Frohike: (sarcastically) Collecting for the needy and unemployed. Open the door.
Doggett: (opening the door) Thanks for doing this, guys.
Byers: Yeah, like we got anything better to be doing these days. [referring to 
the cancellation of their own series]
%
Skinner: Hi. Sorry about the hour.
Scully: I've just put him down.
Skinner: (troubled) I couldn't talk on the phone.
Scully: What is it?
Skinner: I was told to leave this alone. You and Mulder asked me to leave it 
be. To let Mulder disappear. We were concerned for the safety of the baby and 
for Mulder. Why am I risking that now? Why are you? Why are you getting mixed 
up with Doggett's investigation?
Scully: (looking away) Something happened, with my baby.
Skinner: What?
Scully: I can't explain it. It's er, it's unexplainable, it's, um, not normal.
Skinner: Whatever it is, I think you've made a terrible mistake. Letting 
Doggett pull you into this. He's hell bent. And Agent Reyes is following right 
in his tracks.
Scully: I need answers. I need to know. I can't just sit around wondering-
Skinner: If you can't tell me, tell Mulder. Tell him what happened.
Scully: Mulder can't know. He can't be brought back into this. He can't be 
brought back into the FBI. It's just too dangerous for him right now.
Skinner: (pauses) It's too dangerous for everyone.
%
Knowle Rohrer: I'm your new second-in-command.
%
Doggett: You planned this whole thing. I want to know why.
Kobold: I've been thinking a lot about you, Agent Doggett.
Doggett: You're not answering my question, Professor.
Kobold: About why someone so ill-suited would draw this duty. Clearly, you have 
feelings for her.
Doggett: You ordered Dr. Richmond to kill these people, didn't you?
Kobold: But you can't compete with the long-lost Agent Mulder. With his easy 
good looks, his Oxford education.
Doggett: (getting more and more angry) This is about you, Professor.
Kobold: Mulder has what you can't have. What you stumble for. The flat-footed 
cop, thinking he could put handcuffs on a demon.
Doggett: (very mad now) Answer the question!
Kobold: You want her, but she feels sorry for you. They both do.
%
Dr Bronzino: "So many flowers... so little time."
Scully: "Excuse me?"
Dr Bronzino: "Pheromones, Dr Scully. Heavy in the air. Nature's natural 
attractants. Driving the insect world to go forth and pollinate."
Scully: "I'm aware of how pheromones work. But according to this device there 
isn't a single pheromone to be found out here."
Dr Bronzino: "Well, that can't be right. The bio-sensor we use is an actual fly 
antennae over which the pheromones pass. But I modified the EAG to measure in 
picograms which makes it sensitive to traces a mile in any direction."
Scully: "But I'm still not sure why you think that pheromones might cause an 
otherwise harmless fly to attack a human so violently, Doctor..."
Dr Bronzino: "Rocky."
Scully: "Rocky."
Dr Bronzino: "Bugs are small-minded creatures, and therefore very predictable. 
They don't have moods, per se. They react to circumstance and stimuli, as they 
have been doing it for millennia."
Scully: "So what do you suppose they're reacting to out here?"
Dr Bronzino: "It may be the bugs are being somehow driven crazy with desire. 
You know, they say we humans respond to pheromones, too."
Scully: "Yeah, I tend to agree with that, yeah."
Dr Bronzino: "'Women's dormitory syndrome'. It's believed that pheromones are 
the reason that women who live together share the same menstrual cycle."
Scully: "Fascinating."
Dr Bronzino: "You know, when a male and female calliphorid fly mate they stay 
joined for up to one and a half hours. One and a half, doctor."
Scully: "You know, Rocky... I'm a mother."
Dr Bronzino: "Mothers are women, too."
Scully: (voiceover) One day, you'll ask me to speak of a truth - of the miracle 
of your birth. To explain what is unexplained. And if I falter or fail on this 
day, know there is an answer, my child, a sacred imperishable truth, but one 
you may never hope to find alone. Chance meeting your perfect other, your 
perfect opposite - your protector and endangeror. Chance embarking with this 
other on the greatest of journeys - a search for truths fugitive and 
imponderable. If one day this chance may befall you, my son, do not fail or 
falter to seize it. The truths are out there. And if one day you should behold 
a miracle, as I have in you, you will learn the truth is not found in science, 
or on some unseen plane, but by looking into your own heart. And in that moment 
you will be blessed - and stricken. For the truest truths are what hold us 
together, or keep us painfully, desperately apart.
%
Scully: (voiceover, reading an email from "trust_no1@mail.com," obviously 
Mulder) I've resisted contacting you for reasons I know you continue to 
appreciate. But, to be honest, some unexpected dimensions of my new life are 
eating away at any resolve I have left. I'm lonely, Dana, uncertain of my 
ability to live like this. I want to come home. To you, and to William.
[She begins writing an email response.]
Scully: (voiceover) I am physically shaking right now seeing your words. 
Wishing it were you speaking them to me. I want so badly to see you too, but 
you are still not safe here.
%
Doggett: What the hell are you doing?
Scully: I'm trying to teach a class.
Doggett: You understand what we're being offered here? If we know who these 
super-soldiers are we can go after them. This is somebody giving us a way that 
can make it safe for Mulder to come home.
Scully: That's the operative word here - somebody. Somebody that we don't know.
Doggett: And you don't want to check it out.
Scully: (insistent) What I don't want is Agent Mulder's life to be endangered 
any more than it already is.
Doggett: How long are you going to do this?
Scully: Do what, Agent Doggett?
Doggett: Refuse to trust me... or anybody. How else you going to get him home?
%
Scully: It's okay. I understand. I mean ... it's hard enough caring for a child.
Patti: You don't have anyone, do you?
Scully: No. (looks down.) But I wish I did.
Patti: (smiling) Maybe he'll come back.
%
Scully: These clothes that I'm wearing... they're my size. How the hell do you 
know my size?
Shadow Man: Your size? I know your blood type, your resting heart rate, your 
childhood fear of clowns. I know the name of your College boyfriend, your true 
hair color, your ATM pin number, favorite charities, pet peeves. I know you 
spend too much time alone. And I know... that on one lonely night you invited 
Mulder to your bed.
Scully: (her eyes well up with tears; speechless) Oh, my God.
Shadow Man: I was as surprised as you are.
Scully: (crying) Who authorizes you? I mean, what gives you the right? Who are 
you?!
Shadow Man: I'm the future, Agent Scully. And I risked my life being here.
Scully: Well, then why do it? I mean, why meet me?
Shadow Man: Because you can reach Mulder. Mulder needs to know what I know or 
he may have no future. Perhaps no one will. Another car is parked on the main 
road, half a mile out. If I see that you haven't contacted Mulder in the next 
twenty-four hours, I disappear and you never see me again. Do you understand, 
lady?
%
Doggett: Well, you can call the whole thing off?
Scully: I can't. I've already sent for him. Mulder's on a train. He'll be here 
at midnight.
Doggett: Maybe you can reach him.
Scully: You can't do that to me.
Doggett: I'm sorry.
Scully: (passionately) I want to see him so bad.
Doggett: I know. And I want to make sure that you get to, Dana. That's the 
whole reason I'm here.
Scully: Well, it's too late. And I have to go.
%
Scully: (voiceover of an email she's writing to Mulder) I hold no hope you can 
respond to this. Or that it reaches you. I only hope that you are alive.
Scully: I cannot help believing that you jumped off that train because you knew 
what I now know - that these "super-soldiers," if that's what they are, can in 
fact be destroyed. That the key to their destruction lies in the iron compound 
at that quarry.
Scully: I am scared for you, Mulder. And for William. The forces against us are 
unrelenting. But so is my determination. To see you again. To regain the 
comfort and safety we shared for so brief a time.
Scully: Until then, I remain forever yours... Dana
%
Kersh: Agent Comer - our undercover man - was sent to infiltrate the cult... 
based on a series of... threats.
Scully: What threats? Threats to who? To me, to my child...
Follmer: Threats... on Agent Mulder's life.
Scully: (looking at Follmer) That's what this is about? Then why pull me in 
here and show me those rubbings? I don't understand.
Follmer: (everyone else is silent) Before losing all contact with our 
undercover agent he sent us a communication. A communication we've been trying 
to confirm that, uh... (swallows nervously; gently) that Mulder was already 
dead.
[Scully meets his eyes, and he holds her gaze. She is visibly upset. Kersh 
looks sad and can't meet her eyes. Skinner can’t even look at her. Doggett 
seems to believe it's the truth.]
%
Scully: I'm on my way. That was Agent Doggett again. They're waiting. Mom, I've 
got to go.
Margaret Scully: It's the middle of the night, Dana. I just don't understand 
what can't wait 'til tomorrow.
Scully: Mom, it's important. I wouldn't go if it weren't.
Margaret Scully: Yes, I know, Dana. You say it's about getting answers.
Scully: Answers about William, Mom.
Margaret Scully: I know you're worried about him... that there are things about 
him that you just can't explain - but even if you were to get those answers 
what would it change?
Scully: Mom, he's my child.
Margaret Scully: And you have to love him and raise him in spite of everything. 
Dana, god has given you a miracle. A child that wasn't supposed to be. Maybe 
it's not to question... just to be taken as a matter of faith.
Scully: Mom, I can't take this on faith. I need to know. I need to know if it's 
really God I have to thank.
%
Reyes: So, big plans for the weekend?
Doggett: Oh, huge. Microwave pizza, satellite TV.
Reyes: Wow. Thanks for making my life sound exciting. Maybe we both need pets. 
They say people with pets live longer.
Doggett: (confesses) I was thinking about getting a cat.
Reyes: There's dog people, and there's cat people. You are a dog person, John.
Doggett: How do you figure?
Reyes: (chuckles) You're faithful, you're dependable, you're without guile, 
you're very comfortable to be around. So why a cat?
Doggett: Low maintenance. They don't expect much from you, so you can't 
disappoint 'em.
Reyes: I don't see you ever disappointing anyone, John.
%
Doggett: Hell of a thing to wake up to, huh? We stopped after work. She had a 
beer.
Scully: Well, the man who hit her had fifteen. Don't do this to yourself, John.
%
Doggett: You work here?
Audrey Pauley: Uh, I-I'm a patient aide. I deliver the flowers mostly. Are you 
her husband?
[Doggett shakes his head no.]
Audrey Pauley: You love her, though. She's not gone. Not her soul.
Doggett: I wish I could talk to her. I wish I could tell her... Guess I wish a 
lot of things.
%
Reyes: Audrey, I'm Monica. Stephen and I just want to get out of here. Will you 
show us the way out?
Audrey Pauley: I can't. I can't help you.
Stephen Murdoch: Why not?
Audrey Pauley: I came to tell you your friend ... loves you very much.
Reyes: My friend? Did you talk to John? Does he know where I am?
Audrey Pauley: They all think you're dead. (starts to leave)
Reyes: Wait! Give my friend a message. Tell him he's a dog person.
%
Doggett: Morris Fletcher?
Morris: (perks up a little) Finally. What took you so long? You must be Reyes. 
Enchanté.
Reyes: (rolls eyes) Yeah.
%
Morris: The one that saves my furry pink ass. People are tryin' to kill me. Did 
you hear about my boat?
Reyes: Yeah. Your female companion told us what she witnessed.
Morris: My fem... Oh, you mean they didn't kill... (tries to think of her name)
Reyes: Brittany? Brittney?
Morris: Brittany. Oh... Oh, thank God she's still alive.
%
Morris: Agents, I'm tellin' ya, you don't want these three involved. I mean, 
they don't even have their ridiculous tinker toy gizmos. This place is like 
"How The Grinch Stole Radio Shack."
%
Morris: "Area 51 Exposé!" Ooo! (sarcastic) Where's your new issue? This one's 
a year old.
Frohike: Back off, Skeezick.
%
Morris: (looking at Langly's t-shirt) So, who's Joey?
Langly: What? Joey Ramone? Leader of the greatest punk rock band in human 
history. Now shut up! (notices Morris looking at him closely) What?!
Morris: (sigh) What are you, 34, 35? Why don't you cut your hair and grow up, 
huh?
Langly: I need to remind you, Fletcher, that Doggett and Reyes aren't here to 
save you.
Morris: Get yourself a real hero, anyway. Not some dead teeny bopper.
Langly: (angrily) You want to know why Joey Ramone's my hero? 'Cause people 
like you never managed to grind him down. They never stole his spirit. He never 
gave in, never gave up, and never sold out. Right till his last breath. And 
he's not dead. Guys like that? They live forever.
%
Morris: (patting Jimmy; sarcastically) Cheer up, Gomer. You're bringin' the 
whole room down.
%
Morris: (sighs) So, you're too broke to publish, huh? Pencil neck told me. It's 
a shame. This little rag always was such a hoot. I'm gonna miss it. But, hey, 
the world spins on, right? Maybe saving it is a younger man's game. Or a 
woman's.
Frohike: (considers) Maybe it is. You gotta admit, Byers. It hasn't exactly 
been our year. And to top it all off, we screwed the pooch pretty good today. 
Maybe we should pack it in.
Byers: And do what instead? We never gave up. We never will. In the end, if 
that's the best they can say about us... it'll do.
%
Byers: Lone Gunman Newspaper Group. Byers speaking.
%
Professor Gillnitz: (grinning triumphantly, checking his watch) Now you have a 
minute forty.
[The three Gunmen stand still for a second, thinking. Frohike notices a fire 
alarm, turns to the others, and signals his intention.]
Frohike: Guys?
[Langly and Byers look at the fire alarm, then at each other. They both agree.]
Byers: Whatever it takes.
%
Doggett: Cadet Hayes? Rudolph Hayes? I'm Agent Doggett. This is Agent Reyes. 
(Hayes is smelling a dead arm; Doggett is confused) Is that part of the 
training here, Cadet - smelling body parts?
Hayes: This man's flesh smells of creosote... but his skin is soft. Untanned. 
He worked indoors. A hardware store, probably. The tear marks at his elbow go 
from left to right. He was broadsided in a car accident. His hands gripped the 
wheel so hard... his thumb bone snapped on impact.
Doggett: You determined all that just by looking at that arm?
Hayes: (stands, looks at them) I see things.
Reyes: We came to thank you. Because of your analysis, we were able to work up 
a profile to catch the man who murdered those women.
Hayes: What's the profile?
Doggett: White male, twenty-five to thirty-five, ex-military. Employed near the 
bars where he met... why are you shaking your head?
Hayes: The profile's wrong. Your killer is in his forties. A felon recently 
arrived from out of state. His parole officer thinks he's looking for a job. He 
already has one - working for organised crime. He's killed many people. He's 
going to keep on killing. (walks away)
Reyes: (smiles) Kind of annoying, isn't he?
%
Reyes: What are you lookin' at?
Doggett: I want to check somethin' out. (finds identical pieces of roof tile in 
the garbage can) Ah-ha. Hold this, please? (she takes the bag, he climbs up on 
the roof to see it's been re-tiled)Ah-ha.
Reyes: Twice with the "ah-ha's."
Doggett: (sigh) The roof's been patched. When I was inside, I knew I smelled 
fresh plaster.
Reyes: So, are you gonna fill me in?
Doggett: A - Eyewitness places the deceased inside this house just prior to the 
time of his demise. B - We found a fragment of roofing shingle at the scene of 
the impact. It would seem it matches the discarded piece you now hold in your 
hand. C - There's a hole in the roof, recently patched, this big around. 
Connect A to B to C.
Reyes: Much in the fashion of, say, Daffy Duck or Wiley Coyote, the deceased 
shot straight up through the roof, flew high into the air and landed on his 
buddy's car? (skeptically) You're serious?
Doggett: A to B to C. I gotta tell ya, I think I'm finally gettin' the hang of 
this job.
%
Reyes: Well, why name himself after cousin Oliver? None of the other Brady's 
particularly liked Oliver. He was a self-described pest.
Scully: A jinx. Cousin Oliver, the Jinx. (SCULLY tries to explain her knowledge 
of the show.) Oh, so maybe I watched an episode or two.
%
Doggett: Okay, so be it. Just tell me how this helps me bust him, and uh, I'm 
happy.
Scully: Well, I'm starting to hope that it doesn't come to that.
Reyes: What do you mean?
Scully: Well, the power that this man seemingly possesses is extraordinary. It 
needs to be studied.
Dr Reits: It could expand the scope of human knowledge. It could change 
everything.
Scully: It very well could. I mean, I've... I've been working this unit for 
nine years now. I-I've investigated nearly 200 paranormal cases. We are due for 
some incontrovertible proof. I want vindication, for... for Mulder and... for 
all of us.
%
Doggett: One big question. Why "The Brady Bunch"? Seriously, you two are fans. 
Why are people still watchin' a 30 year old TV show?
Reyes: Because... they're the family everyone wishes they had. Loving parents, 
lots of brothers and sisters, everybody getting along.
Scully: They're the, uh, perfect family. And since Oliver didn't have one as a 
child, he ... created one.
Doggett: Sure, I'd buy all that. But in this case, why "The Brady Bunch"? Why 
not "The Partridge Family"? Why not "Eight Is Enough"? (to Dr Reits) Where was 
Oliver when you first saw "The Brady Bunch"? He was with you, right?
Dr Reits: He'd always insisted we watch it together, every week I was there.
Doggett: And the longer you two were together, the more his psychokinetic power 
faded, until finally it went away completely. Now, what do you think that was?
Dr Reits: (slowly realizes) Because for the first time in his life, he was 
happy.
Doggett: Because he was with you.
Scully: Well, what are you suggesting is the course of action, John?
Doggett: A - Oliver's gonna die if he continues to use his power. B - his power 
goes away when he's happy. And C - you're the father he never had, and he loves 
you. A to B to C.
%
Doggett: So close, Dana. I'm sorry you don't get your proof.
Scully: Me too. Well, maybe I've had it these past nine years. If not proof of 
the paranormal, then ... of more important things. (looks at Oliver for a 
moment, then leaves)
Doggett: Well, here's hopin' the TV stays off and he learns how to love the 
real world.
Reyes: (smiles and takes his hand) I think you are getting the hang of this job.
%
Mulder: [After escaping Knowle Rohrer with help from Krycek's ghost] No! You're 
dead!
Krycek: Go. There's others. [An alarm rings & Krycek vanishes]
%
Guard: What are you thinking?
Mulder: Where am I?
Guard: Wrong answer! What are you thinking?
Mulder: I'm thinking about getting the hell out of here.
Guard: Wrong... answer! [He hits Mulder and walks to the door of the cell] No 
sleeping!
%
Guard: What are you thinking?
Mulder: About my son... about his mother.
Guard: Wrong answer! [He swings at Mulder and misses] What are you thinking?
Mulder: What do you want from me?!
Guard: Wrong... answer! [He swings at Mulder again, they grapple before the 
guard throttles Mulder with his baton] I want answers, you hear me? I want 
answers! [He leaves]
%
Scully: Mulder. Mulder!
Mulder: I smelled you coming, Clarice.
Scully: Oh... Damn it, Mulder. It's not funny to see you putting on that act.
Mulder: No, that is funny. What's not funny is what they do to you in here if 
you don't put on that act. [They embrace, Skinner averts his eyes allowing them 
a little privacy] Come here, you big, bald, beautiful man.
Skinner: The only thing you're going to be kissing, Mulder, is your sweet ass 
good-bye, with the trouble you're in.
Mulder: Uh-huh, I kind of gathered that, right around the 50th brainwashing 
session. (he kisses Scully on the hand)
Scully: Mulder, why are they doing this to you?
Mulder: They think they're preparing me for my trial. For my testimony.
%
Scully: Mulder, it's me.
Mulder: Oh. Is it time to go?
Scully: No. That's why I'm here. Mulder, I need you to talk to me. Confide in 
me... or we'll lose.
Mulder: We can't win, Scully. We can only hope to go down fighting.
Scully: You're scaring me. Mulder, I'm so scared that I've just got you back 
and now I'm going to lose you again.
Mulder: I know what I'm doing.
Scully: Well... whatever you're doing... you have no idea how much has already 
been lost... What I've had to do...
Mulder: I do know. Skinner told me.
Scully: Our son, Mulder... I gave him up. Our son. I'm so afraid you could 
never forgive me.
Mulder: I know you had no choice. I just missed both of you so much.
Scully: God, where have you been? Where have you been hiding?
Mulder: In New Mexico.
Scully: Doing what?
Mulder: Looking for The Truth.
Scully: You found something, didn't you? Huh? What did you find?
Mulder: I can't tell you.
Scully: You found something in that facility? That's what you were doing, 
right? Mulder, what did you find out there?
Mulder: Scully, I can't tell you.
Scully: That doesn't make sense.
Mulder: You've got to trust me, Scully. I know things. It's better you don't.
%
Mulder: I know why you're here and what you want. I can't give it to you.
Scully: Make them a deal, Mulder. Guilty on a lesser charge. Maybe they'll go 
for it and they'll let you walk out of here.
Mulder: I'd rather die, Scully.
Scully: How can you say that? How can you say that, Mulder, to me?
Mulder: Because this is greater than you or me. This is about everything we've 
worked for for nine years. The truth that we both sacrificed so much to uncover 
and to expose.
Scully: Well, then, expose it, Mulder! Take the stand. Whatever it is that 
you're withholding, take the stand and hit them full force.
Mulder: I can't.
Scully: Why?
Mulder: I just can't.
Scully: You say this is greater than us, and maybe it is, but this is us 
fighting this fight, Mulder, not you. It's you and me. That's what I'm fighting 
for, Mulder. You and me. [She leaves]
X: Get up.
Mulder: Who's that? Who's there?! [X steps forward] What are you doing here?
X: That's what I'm here to ask you.
Mulder: I'm putting the truth on trial.
X: What truth? Who's truth? You think these men will even hear it?
Mulder: They're afraid to hear it.
X: They're not afraid. They have too much power to be afraid. You're going to 
learn that just like I did. You'll die learning it.
Mulder: I'm not afraid of that.
X: There's a truth even you're afraid to speak now, because you know it's 
futile.
Mulder: No. Because I refuse to accept it.
X: Then you're going to need help.
Mulder: How can you possibly help me? [X hands him a piece of paper with Marita 
Covarrubias' name & address on it]
%
Reyes: What is the point of all of this? To destroy a man who seeks the truth, 
or to destroy the truth so no man can seek it? Either way, you lose.
%
Mulder: (to Kersh) Yes. I'd like to congratulate you, on succeeding where so 
many before you have failed. A bullet between the eyes would have been 
preferable to this charade. But I've learned to pretend over the past nine 
years — to pretend that my victories mattered only to realise that no one was 
keeping score. To realise that liars do not fear the truth if there are enough 
liars. That the devil is just one man with a plan, but evil, true evil, is a 
collaboration of men, which is what we have here today. If I am a guilty man, 
my crime is in daring to believe; that the truth will out and that no one lie 
can live forever. I believe it still. Much as you try to bury it, the truth is 
out there. Greater than your lies, the truth wants to be known. You will know 
it. It'll come to you, as it's come to me, faster than the speed of light. 
[Notices the ghosts of Krycek & X standing behind the panel of judges] You may 
believe yourselves rid of your headache now, and maybe you are... but you've 
only done it by cutting off your own heads.
%
Doggett: [answering phone] Yeah... I'll tell her. [He hangs up]
Scully: Who was it?
Doggett: Skinner.
Scully: Agent Doggett?
Doggett: Death by lethal injection.
%
Frohike: [Mulder is urinating at the roadside] Hey hotshot. Might have the 
common courtesy of doing your little business downwind.
Mulder: Oh boy.
Langly: Why don't you finish draining the little lizard then we'll talk?
Byers: We're very worried about you.
Frohike: It's craziness, man. Turn around.
Langly: Just hang a big U-ie and never look back.
Mulder: I can't.
Byers: Why risk perfect happiness, Mulder? Why risk your lives?
Mulder: Because I need to know the truth.
Byers: You already know the truth.
Mulder: I need to know if I can change it.
Langly: Change it?
Frohike: For crying out loud. All you're going to do is get yourself killed.
Scully: Mulder! What are you doing?
Mulder: [The Lone Gunmen have vanished] I'll be right with you, Scully.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: What's the matter, Agent Mulder? You come to see the 
wise man but you look as if you've seen a ghost.
Mulder: You're not a wise man, you're a dead man. Just like Krycek and X.
Cigarette Smoking Man: You see a dead man, Agent Scully?
Scully: I hoped and prayed you were dead, you chain-smoking, son of a bitch.
Cigarette Smoking Man: You waste your time. Ask Mulder. He knows the futility 
of hope and prayers. He knows the truth now. You have told her the truth, 
haven't you, Fox? I helped you find it.
Mulder: You didn't help me. You sent me to that government facility knowing 
exactly what I'd find.
Cigarette Smoking Man: And now you've refused to speak it. Not to Scully, not 
to anyone, even though it would have saved your life. You damn me for my 
secrets, but you're afraid to speak the truth.
Mulder: You call me afraid? Look at you sitting alone in the dark like a fossil.
Cigarette Smoking Man: It's the final refuge. The last place to hide from those 
who are insidiously taking power now.
Scully: Who?
Cigarette Smoking Man: The aliens. They fear this place, its geology. 
Magnetite, like that which brought down the original UFO in Roswell. Indian 
wisemen realised this over 2,000 years ago. They hid here, and watched their 
own culture die. The original shadow government.
%
Cigarette Smoking Man: Leaves me to tell you what Mulder's afraid to, Agent 
Scully.
Mulder: Come on, let's go.
Cigarette Smoking Man: It's a scary story. Want to come sit on my lap?
Scully: You don't scare me.
Cigarette Smoking Man: My story's scared every president since Truman in '47.
Mulder: [To Scully] You don't have to hear this.
Scully: No, I wanna hear it, Mulder.
Cigarette Smoking Man: Ten centuries ago the Mayans were so afraid that their 
calendar stopped on the exact date that my story begins. December 22, the year 
2012. The date of the final alien invasion. Mulder can confirm the date. He saw 
it at Mount Weather... where our own 'Secret Government' will be hiding when it 
all comes down.
Mulder: Yeah, you smile... feeling drunk with power. The power to do nothing.
Cigarette Smoking Man: My power comes from telling you. Seeing your 
powerlessness hearing it. They wanted to kill you, Fox. I protected you all 
these years... waiting for this moment... to see you broken. Afraid. Now you 
can die.
%
Scully: What are you thinking? Mulder?
Mulder: I'm thinking... I'm a guilty man. I've failed in every respect. I 
deserve the harshest punishment for my crimes.
Scully: You don't believe that.
Mulder: I believe... that I sat in a motel room like this with you when we 
first met... and I tried to convince you of the truth. And in that respect, I 
succeeded, but... in every other way... I've failed.
Scully: You don't believe that either.
Mulder: Mm. I've been chasing after monsters with a butterfly net. You heard 
the man — the date's set. I can't change that.
Scully: You wouldn't tell me. Not because you were afraid or broken... but 
because you didn't want to accept defeat.
Mulder: Well, I was afraid of what knowing would do to you. I was afraid that 
it would crush... your spirit.
Scully: Why would I accept defeat? Why would I accept it, if you won't? Mulder, 
you say that you've failed, but you only fail if you give up. And I know you 
— you can't give up. It's what I saw in you when we first met. It's what made 
me follow you... why I'd do it all over again.
Mulder: And look what it's gotten you.
Scully: And what has it gotten you? Not your sister. Nothing that you've set 
out for. But you won't give up, even now. You've always said that you want to 
believe. But believe in what Mulder? If this is the truth that you've been 
looking for, then what is left to believe in?
Mulder: I want to believe that... the dead are not lost to us. That they speak 
to us... as part of something greater than us -greater than any alien force. 
And if you and I are powerless now, I want to believe that if we listen, to 
what's speaking, it can give us the power to save ourselves.
Scully: Then we believe the same thing.
Mulder: Maybe there's hope.
%